「No problem. I left the surface to you, you don’t mind?」

「I’m good. Then, what will you do?」

「I will invade the labyrinth with Dino and the others.」

The matter is briefly decided by Zero, Dino’s anxiety hit the mark

(Wh, what with this guy, there’s not even a discussion……)

Dino wanted to shout, but unfortunately Zero has the higher authority.

「Hey hey…… inside the labyrinth, the enemy will keep reviving――」

「Not a problem. I’ll erode the labyrinth itself.

Using the ability of the true『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』given to me by Velda-sama, you see.」

Interrupting Dino’s word, Zero declares so without any change in his expression.

Sensing from Zero’s attitude that any more argument is unnecessary, Dino given up as saying anything will be useless.

Because the matter is already decided, Dino’s words won’t change anything since Zero said it was Velda’s order.

「I understand, I will obey you. So, is it only me and you who enter the labyrinth?」

「I will enter the labyrinth with you three.

And, I will leave you three to earn me time as I am eroding the labyrinth.」

「……Understood.」

Dino responded so, Pico and Garasha also steeled themselves.

Thus, the members to capture Ramiris’ labyrinth were decided.

「When the plan start?」

To Dino’s question,

「Staring now.」

Zero answered.

And so――

With Zero’s word as the signal, the largest attack in history towards Tempest began.

Glittering flashes.

The angels attacked together to the extent of making sight impossible.

A heat wave mows down the surface, evaporating the town created by Rimuru and co.

Even the corps led by “Barrier Lord” Gerudo and “Dragon Lord” Gabil chose to withdraw in front of the rain of light that pouring from the sky which can’t be simply defended with barrier.

If there’s no defense correction from Gerudo’s ability that attack would have violently annihilated everything.

The ability correction of Mai’s Ultimate Skill『Weapon Lord (Bow Weapon)』enables precise shooting.

The angels who are united by Mai’s will, caught the target in Mai’s line of sight and attacks one point together.

A concentrated attack of 600.000 angels is terrifying.

The temperature of the focused point is impossible to be measured. If it’s not reflected and dispersed by Gerudo’s barrier, it won’t allow any resistance.

She should praise Gerudo as he was able to withstand it for a moment.

The part with the town was rapidly transformed into an empty land void of anything.

The angels move under one will, unlike when they were under Dino’s command.

Like one living being, they shown an orderly movement.

They become a threat to Tempest, it’s no longer possible to think them as they were same as before.

Zero nods as he confirmed that the surface corps has withdrawn into the labyrinth.

From the exit―― Entrance opened on the surface, he confirms several places of distorted space that release similar waves.

Mai also sighted the place and completed fixating the place as the target of the angels’ army.

「Don’t spare anyone who runs.」

「Gotcha.」

Conversing briefly, Zero begins to move into the labyrinth taking along Dino and co.

As if ridiculing Dino and co, Mai has shown that she easily won against the people acknowledged by Pico and Garasha.

Pico, frustratedly thought that she has no other choice but to admit it.

(Still, they seem to withdraw a bit too easily……)

Although she didn’t say it loud as it would make her looks like a sore loser, Pico can’t get rid of it from her mind.

After all, she experienced the bitterness during her fight against Gerudo, who boasts a much too high defensive power.

She thinks that Mai was amazing to repel such opponent so easily, but she still has some unsatisfied feeling.

(Oh well. If they retreated into the labyrinth, there might be a chance to fight them.

But, with that defensive power and immortality, it won’t be a joke……)

Thinking about the solution when the time comes, Pico follows Dino and the others into the labyrinth.

When the four people entered the labyrinth―― it was the moment when Zero’s Labyrinth Eroding Plan begun.

* * *

[1] 人造人間 Jinzou Ningen, Jinzou= Man-made/Artifical. Ningen = Human. It usually means Robot or Android, but in this context it’s an artificial human/being.





Chapter 227: Labyrinth’s Encroachment - Part 2


A control room was located on the lowest floor of the labyrinth.

The room, which could be called as the center of the labyrinth, was made to manage everything inside the labyrinth.

A big monitor was installed at the center of the room, showing the appearances of Zero and co in combat inside the labyrinth.

The inside of the control room had been remodeled with decorations that have no particular meaning and there were also devices and such that kept blinking.

「It started heh.」

「Yeah. Everything is going as planned――」

Ramiris nods to Benimaru’s mutters.

Ramiris is sitting on a luxurious chair which made exclusively for her personal use, taking a contemplative pose of putting her clasped hands in front of her chin.[1]

Benimaru stands on her right side, looking at the screen keenly.

Although the two people are conversing as if their atmosphere is serious……

「Don’t fool around, do your work!」

Shuna hits Benimaru’s head with a folded fan in her hand.

「Ouch! Hey, it’s hurts if it’s folded! Don’t you have any gentleness for your beloved older brother!?」

「There’s none. That kind of thing is unimportant, please do your job seriously!」

Shuna cut him down in single hit.

There’s another person who supporting Shuna with their words.

That person is Beretta.

「Why are you fooling around, Ramiris-sama…… If you don’t stop, I will report this to Rimuru-sama, you know?」

「Wai! You, what are you talking about! I’m being serious~!」

Ramiris panicking after hearing Beretta’s tsukkomi.

She stops doing her competitive behavior and starting to explain in panic.

「You too, Benimaru. It’s not time for playing around, a very serious crisis is approaching, be more conscious……」

Scolded by Souei, Benimaru meekly nods.

Although he and Ramiris are enjoying themselves with the atmosphere…… it seems to be taken negatively by the serious people.

(This is because these guys are not playful……)

(Hey. I only playing around a bit, I wish Rimuru wasn’t mad at me……)

Their gaze intersect, Benimaru and Ramiris are communicating their inner feelings.

However, they can read the mood and so they decided to stop playing anymore.

In fact, the situation is unsatisfactory.

The floors that have been invaded so far by the enemy are displayed on the big screen.

According to the display, the enemy is fighting the boss of the 50th floor currently.

With a terrifying speed, the enemy broke all of the past records.

In such critical situation, Benimaru and Ramiris still have time for their behavior.

Which isn’t surprising……

A little while ago, an order from Rimuru had reached Benimaru.

Rimuru conveyed the enemy’s predicted goal and the countermeasures.

As for defending the labyrinth, Benimaru and the others[2] are not needed.

To this matter, Ramiris and Zegion agreed, intercepting the intruder by themselves is decided unanimously.

Benimaru presents everybody’s intentions to Rimuru who still anxious about the labyrinth war potentials.

And then, from Rimuru, ‘Defend the labyrinth till the end!’ such order was received.

Benimaru still hasn’t recovered from the exhaustion after his fight with Kazaream, but there’s no worry about that.

After all, it’s due to the thick density of the magic essence inside the labyrinth which beyond comparison from the outside. Noticeably, he can feel that his energy is recovering.

Moreover, probably because he released magic essences to the limit once, he has a hunch that he can take in the energy of『Turn Null』while becoming more used to it.

Filling and mixing it while emptying the container little by little, in a sense replenishing magic essence at the same time.

(Huff! Like this, I think I can considerably control this energy!)

The top group of the defense war potential of the labyrinth is still alive, in the worst case; Benimaru might also need to go too.

Prediction of the enemy’s action can be made, and the war potentials are alive.

There’s no factor to be uneasy of.

「Well. Then, should we work seriously now?

Ramiris-sama, what is the percentage of the labyrinth that has been eroded by that guy currently?」

「That’s right…… right now, it’s 15% I think. There’s still more to spare!」

「Understood. So, when Gozurl and Mezurl on the 50th floor are defeated, do we commence the strategy?」

「Well. As my preparations will be done with just a bit more, it’ll be the right time.」

「Then, we will start.」

After such exchange, Benimaru began to issue instructions regarding the specific strategy.

Ramiris also resumes her work.

Gozurl and Mezurl who were defeated easily are revived on the lowest floor.

And then they come to the control room ashamed.

「Good work! Well, please rest at ease.」

「We’re very sorry, we have no excuse to offer, Benimaru-sama. We wanted to exhaust the enemy even a bit though……」

「We are not even an obstacle to that guy……」

「Don’t mind it. You guys aren’t weak, it's just those guys are strong.

Be relieved as everything is as planned.」

Gozurl and Mezurl who hanged their heads in front of Benimaru seem to have been relieved a little when they heard those words.

With meek faces, they sit on the reserved chairs.

At the same time――

「Well then. As planned, the strategy will start! Everyone, on your position!!

The strategy will be put into action now.

And then, at the time of the retrieval of the Demon Golem (Demon Lord Protector Colossus), the strategy will shift to its second stage.

Everything is as planned. Everyone, accomplish your own work without rushing! Leave the rest to the combat group!!」

Benimaru ordered so.

Tension runs through to the Ramiris’ subordinates, the Dragon Kings and the operator, the dryads with Trainee as their leader.

「Well then, Ramiris-sama. I shall depart too.」

Beretta respectfully told Ramiris.

「Ok! You can lose, but dying is not permitted!」

「Fufufu, what a joke. If I lost so many times, then I’ll be branded as a loser. I’ll surely triumph this time.」

Leaving behind those words, Beretta immediately teleport away.

Then, he already stood by Zegion’s side.

And so, the battle inside the labyrinth slowly intensifies……

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

The guardian of the 60th floor is the Demon Golem.

It received order to eliminate the intruder, showing its overwhelming destructive power, it’s a violence machine.

Modified by Gadra-roushi, it’s equipped with various weapons; its viciousness is nothing like before.

However, in front of Dino and co, even with its power, stalling the enemy didn’t come true.

「Geez, it’s so much trouble……this thing is stupidly strong……」

「Rather than that, why doesn’t it vanish as light particles?

Just probably though…… This golem won’t revive, right…..?」

「It won’t I guess. Oh well, even if it did, it’s not a threat anyway.

But if it’s about this thing is troublesome, I’d agree.」

To Dino’s grumble, Pico and Garasha respond respectively.

Indeed, Dino thinks that it’s absurd for Golem which is an artificial object to revive, but recalling Ramiris’ wicked smile, there was an uneasiness which makes Dino unable to deny it.

(If it’s that person, it might be possible……)

It’s not Ramiris who has the power to be a threat, but that can’t be said with the other people in the labyrinth.

Not to mention, their threat level are beyond imagination with the bestowed immortality inside Ramiris’ controlled area.

Besides, Ramiris’ ability is unreasonable, it won’t be strange if she was able to grant the effect even to an artificial being.

From Dino’s point of view, Ramiris’『Labyrinth Creation』 was such a threat.

「However, the enemy was suddenly gone. From floor 61, I’m sure that ghost type enemy would come out in swarms, right? 」

「That’s true. I sighted low-class wraiths, but they’re only small fry…… In that case, the upper floors were more troublesome, right?」

As Pico and Garasha said, they can’t see any appearance of enemies after they defeated the Demon Golem and descended a floor below.

But, Zero knew the reason why. That’s because Adalman and co went outside to intercept Dagruel, which Zero witnessed himself.

Because there’s no reason to tell it, Zero keeps his silence.

「Oh well, maybe because of that. Perhaps, they went to intercept Dagruel I guess.」

Dino carelessly said the correct answer.

Zero hears it, he thought that he needs to raise his evaluation of Dino a bit.

Zero thought that Dino is a foolish guy, but he’s surprised due to Dino’s sharpness in the situational awareness.

「Eh, did that means all monsters from here on were outside? Can you do such a thing?」

「Rather than that…… Using the monsters living inside the labyrinth as an army…… Honesty, isn’t that a foul play?」

「I dunno, don’t say it to me. Say your complains to Rimuru!」

Because enemies won’t come out, Dino and co have such free time to have such talkative quarrel.

Zero who indifferently watched them, opened his mouth.

「You guys, listen.

I’m going to return to the 60th floor, I’ll concentrate in my work to steal the authority of this labyrinth.

Even now I have eroded the labyrinth as we travelled, but only about 15% taken by me and it’s not advancing.

However, I succeeded in containing the transfer function.

Above the 60th floor has become my area.

However, it will take time to erode 61th floor and below.

As the way things are going, it won’t progress well.

I leave the rest to you guys, rampage as much as you can and earn me time.」

Zero was able to analyze mostly of the enemy’s war potential.

As he attacking with a small group of people, there’s no fear of the group being divided into parts.

It would be the suitable time soon.

With the roots of his ability stretched around since the time he entered, he succeeded in stealing a part of the authority of the labyrinth’s power.

After that he thought to concentrate himself in eroding the labyrinth and finish this mission quickly.

Shutting down the teleport means that a direct attack to Zero inside the labyrinth becomes impossible.

Then, he judged that by letting Dino and co advance and rampaging around, in that opportunity he would be able to concentrate in taking over the control of the labyrinth.

「Ahh, leave it to me!」

Dino responded powerfully to Zero’s words.

Zero nods to the answer, he says「Rampage as much as you want」and then he turned his back.

Zero returns to the 60th floor’s boss room while confirming the safety of the surroundings.

And then, he unleashes the ability of the completed and evolved Ultimate Skill『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』and begins the encroachment of the labyrinth.

In order to usurp the labyrinth complexly.

『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』has the ability to make clones infinitely by spreading its roots to the ground, but it was originally ability of『Energy Absorption』 on the surroundings.

It assimilates into surroundings’ natural environment, and make it possible to regenerate himself infinitely as part of the nature.

That’s, the truth of Ultimate Skill『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』 and its correct usage.

The environment that has its energy sucked up empty will be ruined and destroyed.

By assimilating to this labyrinth, he will plunder the authority of the labyrinth.

If he does so, Zero will be able to steal the power of Ramiris’『Labyrinth Creation』.

Even in case he fails, he could cancel the authority and nullify it.

Then, at his side has four strong people of awakened Demon Lord Class, they would be superior in fighting power, so was Zero’s calculation.

(In the worst case, I will suck up the energy of this labyrinth and destroy it

Then, in any case, the enemy doesn’t have refuge. They will hastily flee and rounded up by Mai’s concentrated attack. Although, if I finish assimilating with this labyrinth, I won’t let the enemy escape――）

Zero is convinced of the victory.

Zero thought that immortality inside the labyrinth is troublesome, and by manipulating the dimension and space making it impossible for an army to capture the labyrinth is invincible.

However, if ability of the labyrinth is sealed off, it’s Zero’s side’s turn to invade.

He didn’t think that it’s funny that Dino and co so abnormally wary inside the labyrinth.

Certainly, it’s a dangerous ability.

However, for Zero, the more dangerous the labyrinth is, greater the power as the reward after he deprives it.

(Velda-sama, it’s our victory!)

Zero sits with his legs crossed and concentrated his mind on eroding the labyrinth.

The three people go ahead, leaving Zero behind.

Although Dino declared his reply impressively to Zero, inside his mind is……

(Idiot. From the start, don’t expect someone else to help your work and such.

But, I can’t even run away from Velda-sama’s side……

Because there’s a thing with Rimuru too, I can’t do careless action……

Ahhhh how troublesomeーーー!!）

So, various conflicts jumbled together.

Consequently, with that gloomy Zero gone, it becomes very refreshing.

Dino and co felt uneasy due to being observed so much.

In either case, escaping was already impossible.

Dino and co give up and go to the other side.

「Hey~, isn’t that guy is super strict! Who do he think he is?」

「That’s right. Ordering us self-importantly, to be frank, I hate it. Why did you do exactly what he told you to do, Dino?」

「Right right! Dino, please beat that guy!」

「Yeah. If you kill that guy, we will cooperate so it will not be exposed Velda-sama, you know?」

‘That guy you mention, is Zero you know!?’ so Dino thought while laughing vaguely to dodge the issue.

There’s no way to not be exposed, and to be honest, it’s troublesome.

With this and that, Dino and co arrives at the 70th floor.

However, that place is naturally empty……

「As expected, Adalman has gone to the battlefield.

It would be troublesome if that guy remain here, aren’t we lucky?」

Dino thinks positively.

Pico and Garasha also agree and then they go ahead.

However, even below floor 71th, no enemies appear.

「Isn’t this strange? This place should be the paradise of the insect type monster though……」

When Dino says his doubt――

『Hoohohohoho! You came, Dino.

You had betrayed me not a long ago, I will make you regret it now!!』

Ramiris’s loud laughter echoed in the surroundings, suddenly, the structure of the floor changes.

And then 4 shadows appeared.

Gabil, Gerudo, Beretta and then Zegion.

Those 4 are the one who appear to meet Dino and Co.

「Tch. They come out as expected heh――」

Dino looked up above and saw Zegion.

『Eh? Dino, you guys are only three people?』

Ramiris asked Dino.

In Dino’s eyes who looking at Ramiris who waiting for answer, he saw Ramiris being projected with stereoscopic imaging.

(She does such elaborate action for weird stuff……)

‘Oh well whatever’ so he sighs,

「One person is late due to his business.」

So, Dino replied indifferently.

Besides,『Hmm.』 and nodding, Ramiris drops a bombshell statement.

『Well then, Dino’s opponents are Zegion and Beretta heh~』

So.

’What did she say?’ Dino fails to understand it.

But, when her words reach his brain, he understands the meaning.

「Don’t joke around, you idiot!! Like hell I could win!!」

Dino’s scream who understands the meaning of Ramiris’ words echoed inside the labyrinth.

* * *

[1] For those who didn’t realize what Ramiris doing, she’s doing Gendo Pose.

[2] Meant for those who went outside Tempest and not present and defending Tempest from the start like Gabil and Gerudo.





Chapter 228: Labyrinth’s Encroachment - Part 3


The discussion ended on a quiet note, as if disregarding Dino’s scream

Anticipating an unfavorable outcome, Dino promptly made a suggestion.

「Wait, listen to me. How about we do this in a knockout format?

Let each fight happen one by one to decide the outcome. Okay?」

This was Dino’s last resort.

Zero had said that he needed time, so Dino needed to buy that time somehow.

If they just went straight into the fight, nine times out of ten, it would end with the defeat of Dino’s side.

Especially Dino. He didn’t even think he would last longer than a few minutes.

(This is no joke. If those two become my opponent, I’d have to kiss goodbye to any hope of surviving this…)

Dino decided to push this proposal through one way or another.

Dino hoped to earn more time for themselves by making the fights happen one at a time. He was counting on Zero to finish his preparations by the time it came to his turn.

(Nevertheless, I can’t expect such a selfish proposal to go through easily. It’s way too convenient for our side—)

Dino didn’t believe his proposal would be accepted...

『Hmm, Okay! It’s convenient for our side too――』

『Hey!』

『Oops! Don’t mind that. It was nothing to be concerned about!

Anyway, the first one is Gabil, go~! 』

It seemed that Benimaru and Ramiris had some sort of shady conversation.

Conveniently for Dino, the other side also wanted to stall.

(So far so good, luck seems to be on my side!)

Dino was happy that his proposal went through, so he didn’t bother investigating Ramiris’s motives.

And so began a fight in the format of a pro-wrestling exhibition.

The first match was Gabil vs Pico.

The fight ended up being an aerial dogfight, since both were able to move freely in all three dimensions.

It was an interesting match-up, since they both used spears.

(How should I put it, this guy… How in the world did he get so strong!?)

Pico thought, astonished.

It was as if she were up against a completely different person compared to the one she had fought a few days before.

The current Gabil could probably have the strength of an Awakened Demon Lord, rivaling Pico.

Despite her shock, she recognized his strength.

As she continued the fierce aerial battle, she quickly decided that Gabil was a threat no longer to be underestimated.

The combatants merely probed the other’s strength for a while, before both going all out.

However, Gabil’s『Flame Breath』and『Thunder Breath』couldn’t hit Pico, and neither could Pico’s『Black Thunder』and『Heaven’s Judgment』hit Gabil.

In truth, Pico’s『Heaven’s Judgment』 was a very absurd ability. It could reproduce past wounds of previously defeated enemies. However, Gabil’s Ultimate Gift『Pierrot Star』had the Fate Change’s effect negating Pico’s ability.

Pico couldn’t conceal her surprise.

「You bastard! Stop bullshitting me! Why won’t you die already? It’s so strange!?」

「Is it so unexpected!? Does the fact that I’m not dead irk you so much? There is a reason I can’t die, so please forgive me, Miss!」

Despite Gabil’s answer, he was sweating bullets on the inside.

After all, he had already used his trump card, Fate Change.

Once a day, the ability could be used to nullify any kind of damage, but that meant that Gabil could die in one blow.

(Not good. This is really not good! Although I’m already using all of my strength, that lady seems to still have strength to spare… )

If she used her attack again, it would spell Gabil’s doom.

On the other hand, Pico was also bewildered.

Wary of Gabil, she refrained from using a bold attack.

(That guy… His strange confidence is spooky. He’s calm even after receiving my attack, as if it were nothing. I’m in trouble, if that attack can’t affect him, I don’t have any other decisive blow――）

Pico felt uneasy.

Actually, Pico still has some power to spare, but without any other alternatives, she decided to end the match in close combat.

If she took too long, it would end up as a battle of attrition.

No matter how much time Dino could buy them, she wouldn’t be able to recover her strength in time if it came to that.

They were in enemy territory. Even in a one-on-one match, they weren’t evenly matched.

She couldn’t afford to exhaust all her power just for the sake of winning, since Pico’s side couldn’t replenish their forces.

There was no guarantee that Ramiris’s side wouldn’t betray their promise and substitute their combatants with fresh fighters.

She worried that they could be defeated by a hidden enemy if she just burnt herself out.

(In the first place, attacking the enemy just with three people is so unreasonable! I can’t even count on Dino――)

Pico stole a glance at her companions, and saw Dino watching the match relaxedly, as if it weren’t his problem.

(That dummy, just because it isn’t his match, he really thinks it isn’t his problem!)

Pico was incensed.

She remembered that it was only necessary to buy time untill Zero completed his preparations. As a result, Pico decided to throw caution to the winds.

「The next one will finish it!」

「I was hoping the same!」

Both of them shared the same sentiments, and decided to end the match with their secret techniques.

「Fallen Spear!!」[1]

「Draconic Vortex!!」[2]

The two raced towards each other.

On impact, both were blown back at the same time.

As a testament to the terrifying power of their attacks, both of their bodies twirled in the air like a drill before crashing into the ground, giving neither a chance to break their fall.

『Okay, that’s a wrap! It’s a draw~!』

Ramiris proclaimed the end of the first match.

The result was a tie, but there was a big difference in the aftermath.

Gabil was covered with wounds all over his body, unable to fight any more.

On the other hand, Pico was only pretending to have sustained heavy damage.

「……Hey. Why did you hold back at the end?」

「Ah, you noticed? Well you see, if I don’t save some of my strength, won’t it be hard if I need to run away from this place?」

「I see. Apparently, you noticed my intentions?」

「Of course. You, how many times do you think I have accompanied you? I can tell what you’re thinking.」

「Okie dokie. That’s good. I intend to escape as soon as I see the chance; like hell I’m dying together with Zero.」

「Roger~! Garasha seems to have noticed too. I think that she will earn us a lot of time fighting that hardy guy, you know?」

「Really? That would be a great help. To be honest, my opponent is no joke at all, that Zegion guy is seriously dangerous… I really, really want to run away right now, you know? I don’t think he can take a joke…」

「We-well, good luck, I guess? It all depends on how well Garasha does…」

As Garasha left for the battlefield, Dino and Pico discussed their plans.

Pico has some energy left after the fight.

Dino thought that was good.

Dino wondered whether trusting in Zero was a good decision.

In this situation, it could be said that Pico made the correct decision.

「Good, then you should take a rest now. Just don’t be too at ease.」

「I’ll do just that.」

Pico started resting, and Dino turned his attention to Garasha.

“Good grief” Dino thought as he focused on the next fight.

The second match was Gerudo vs Garasha.

Both combatants specialized in defensive ability, so although it was not flashy, the battle steadily developed into an intimate exchange of skill between experts.

Gerudo wielded a Meat Crusher and a Huge Shield, while Garasha used a Longsword (Orthodox one-hand sword) and a Circle Shield (Round shield).

Gerudo’s fighting ability had evolved with him.

Although he did specialize in his defensive abilities, his offence was nothing to scoff at.

However, as it took some time to accumulate the power to activate it, he couldn’t use it to hit Garasha

To begin with, Gerudo’s Ultimate Gift『Gourmet Lord Beelzebub』was an Army Scale ability.

It was better suited for buffing his allies rather than strengthening himself.

As a result, Gerudo’s defense was more or less equal to Garasha’s all-purpose defense.

Unlike Pico, Garasha was more balanced between offence and defense.

Garasha possessed more offensive power than Gerudo, which should have given her the upper hand.

But that was not the case…

「You, how can you repel all of my attacks? Don’t look down on――」

「Even though I look like this, Rimuru-sama has granted me the title of “Barrier Lord”. You should know that you cannot break through my defense.」

Gerudo adeptly repelled Garasha’s attacks.

But that was not all.

Despite Garasha’s superior offence, for some reason, Garasha’s attacks didn’t scratch Gerudo, while Gerudo’s attacks slowly wore her down.

Gerudo’s experience didn’t lose to Garasha’s experience accumulated over a long life.

Although he didn’t stand out among the residents of Tempest, Gerudo had never neglected his training. As a result, his skill was top-notch.

His defense rivaled that of Albert.

His movements seemed to present many openings, but it was all just an attempt to bait his opponent.

Of course, Garasha didn’t fall for it and she didn’t attack carelessly.

(I had thought I could earn some more time, but…… it seems I can’t afford to hold back here.)

Garasha praised Gerudo inside her mind.

As Garasha had expected, the fight had turned into a stalemate. It was a plain battle fraught with deceptions hidden in plain sight.

　　　　　◇◇◇

The intricate interplay was mesmerizing to the trained eye.

However, it looked extremely tedious to an amateur.

「I’ve had enough of this… 」

A small, childish whisper was heard in the control room.

Gerudo and Garasha’s fight looked unremarkable; neither side used any spells or special moves.

The intricacies were lost on a child like Ramiris.

「Hey, can’t we make this a draw again and start the next fight? I wanna get to tormenting Dino!」

「Don’t be silly! We need to stall for more time, you are with me, right, Ramiris-sama?」

Benimaru tsukkomi-ed Ramiris who started to say silly things.

Possibly because Benimaru had grown weary of speaking so formally to Ramiris, his speech became more relaxed.

From the start, he never did put much effort into doing so, but now, he just didn’t care.

「Wait a moment, Vice Commander!? Please call me Supreme Commander-dono!… Well, you do have a point. Fine then―― whatever, let it continue!」

「Yeah yeah. So? How’s the progress going?」

「Uhhhh, the isolation rate has exceeded 90%. After a little bit more, we’ll be ready.

And, it seems that guy’s assimilation rate is at 70%. We made it in time because Rimuru had told us about it ahead of time!」

「All right. That seems good, doesn’t it? Then, please endure it a bit longer.」

Ramiris and Benimaru nodded at each other.

Having gotten Ramiris’s consent, he turned back to the screen.

Benimaru felt that it would be outrageous to stop the fight.

Unfortunately, judging by the previous match, Gabil would have to face more training under Hakurou and Agera, but Gerudo’s fight was magnificent.

Unlike Ramiris, Benimaru was fascinated by the elaborate fight.

He marvelled at how Gerudo made up for the difference in ability with sheer effort.

The fight was reaching its climax―― the end of the fight was nigh.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Gerudo and Garasha were engaged in an intense sword fight.

The pace accelerated, and their plain fight was now plain no longer.

In their attempt to overwhelm their opponent with powerful strikes, each stroke of their swords cut into the ground, kicking up a furious gale of sand.

Those watching were captivated by the beautiful, but deadly, dance that unfolded before their eyes.

And then everything went silent for a moment.

“The next strike shall decide the outcome”, so everyone thought.

However――

「As I expected, that retreat was just a ploy. Although I didn’t think that level of attack would break through your defense――」

「Yeah. I didn’t have that much leeway, but it’s not to the extent that I needed to retreat. Besides――We won’t retreat without an order.

Everything was as Rimuru-sama desired.」

「Hum. In other words, you guys weren’t being cornered, but you guys were luring us in. It seems we have lost before even fighting.

I guess it’s alright. I admit my defeat here, is that fine?」

「Hmm!?」

Garasha conceded his defeat, taking Gerudo off guard.

『Okay then~! The victor is Gerudo!

Well now, come on out, Dino! You didn’t forget what you did to me before, right? This time is my turn to beat you to dust!』

Before Gerudo knew it, Ramiris’s voice came from the sky, announcing the outcome.

Her ulterior motives had shone through, but the conclusion was still a conclusion.

It was a godsend for the bored Ramiris. She completely ignored the fact that ‘how unfortunate’ was written all over Benimaru’s face.

But since the Gerudo himself wanted to say something, Benimaru didn’t voice his complaint.

「Is it alright……? You still have not gotten serious yet.」

「Well, I don’t mind. You have evolved too and seems like you haven’t mastered your power yet.

I would like to have the real conclusion in a place where we can fight each other with our full power.」

The two combatants met eyes, and chuckled.

Thus, the second pair’s match also came to an end.

When she returned to Dino’s side, Garasha muttered quietly.

「Not good, Dino. That guy has become abnormally strong.

I’m certain that it would be a close fight even if I went all out.

I don’t think that I would lose if we fought seriously, but I would be extremely exhausted by that long fight…」

「I know, right? There are other strong people here, so it would be suicidal to tire ourselves out.」

「Pico’s judgment is correct. You should be as careful as possible, you know?」

「Yeah, I know……」

With that, Dino stepped forward.

However, his feet felt heavy.

(Say, Ramiris’s aim is me, isn’t it? Even though they told me not to tire myself out, it’s not like I want to do so. Even now, I still don’t wanna fight. Alright, I’ll just drag it out while fighting Gerudo…)

『Ah, Gerudo. You must be tired, right? You should withdraw!』

Dino thought about such underhanded stuff, but Ramiris beat him to the punch.

Gerudo obediently agreed to withdraw, and was replaced by the tag team made up of Beretta and Zegion.

(Damn it! Did she see through my plan!?)

Although Dino complained in his mind, he couldn’t do anything about it.

His opponents were Beretta and Zegion.

Clearly, they weren’t opponents that Dino could win against.

Then, suddenly, an idea popped up in his mind.

「Ah, that’s right! I will also withdraw――」

『Bzzt~! Rejected!!』

However, his idea was immediately rejected by Ramiris.

With eyes like a dead fish, Dino turned his gaze towards Beretta and Zegion.

And suddenly, a small question came to his mind.

(Ehh? That Zegion….. Did he have such little energy?)

Having fought Zegion before, Dino felt a sense of incongruity.

However, Dino didn’t have the leisure to be worried about that.

He had tried to delay the moment of reckoning, but instead, it came closer.

(Damn it, that Zero. Hurry up, don’t blame me if you don’t make it in time!!)

Dino was the one most worried about not making it in time.

With a sigh, Dino reluctantly prepared to fight.

* * *

[1] 堕天終撃麗槍 Daten Owarigeki Reiyari (Fallen Angel’s Beautiful Final Spear Attack).

[2] 真・渦槍水竜撃 Shin・Uzuyari Mizuryuugeki (True Vortex Spear’s Water Dragon Strike).





Chapter 229: Labyrinth’s Encroachment - Part 4


At that moment, Ramiris murmured quietly

「Ah, the isolation was completed.」

She said it casually, as if it was nothing important.

But the people around her began to hustle when they heard her.

Meanwhile, Benimaru sent out a 『Thought Transmission』.

『Did you guys hear that? From this point, the support effect inside the labyrinth has disappeared.

You guys better brace yourselves. You can’t revive once you die anymore!

Rimuru-sama has not permitted any of you to die, so you guys better act with that in mind!』

It was directed at his companions, who had gone to intercept Dino’s group.

Everything was going as planned.

Those who received the order showed no signs of unrest, taking the order in stride.

And then―

One person started to act after hearing the order.

Quietly and decisively.

The plan moved into the final phase.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

Zero dispassionately continued the erosion of the labyrinth.

The assimilation rate had exceeded 90% now.

He felt no joy in it. All he had to do was to complete the duty given to him.

If the enemy gained immortality inside the labyrinth, all that needed to do was to steal the labyrinth.

That was Velda’s plan, and his Ultimate Skill『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』was for.

The ability was originally created to counter the labyrinth, an ability that exerts an absolute dominance within a closed area.

Furthermore, it was not the incomplete version that had been given to Vega and Footman. By incorporating the battle data that had been gathered so far, Zero possessed the complete version.

In front of 『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』, which ability had become closer to the original『Planet Devourer[1]』, not even Ramiris’ labyrinth could resist being overrun.

(Hmm, there’s less resistance than I thought, heh. That’s natural I guess. Nobody would ever imagine that attacking the labyrinth itself. Taking over the enemy’s base itself, and purging those fools who sit idly thinking that they have an absolute advantage. Then luring out Demon Lord Rimuru, and finishing off the all resistance in one go. As expected of Velda-sama. What a perfect plan―)

In accordance to Velda’s plan, he steadily eroded the enemy’s base, the labyrinth.

As long as he robbed the labyrinth, Zero could take over all inside the labyrinth.

「So easy.」

The words came out on their own.

However, he wasn’t expecting a reply…

「Don’t be so conceited. Engrave it into your mind that this labyrinth won’t fall to the likes of you.」

A cold voice rang out in the empty room.

It was empty no longer.

Zero sensed something that shouldn’t be there.

It was a butterfly.

A beautiful butterfly of light, fluttering and flickering in the air.

And then, that butterfly’s shape blurred, growing into the shape of a person.

The butterfly had metamorphosed into figure of a warrior clad in an exoskeleton made of jet-black colored adamantite.

His hands, feet and forehead shone with the distinct brilliance of the ultimate metal, Hihiirokane.

「―Who are you? Everything above the 60th floor is under my control. I didn’t feel any sign of intrusion.」

「It’s simple. I’ve been here since the beginning, that’s all.」

「… I see. This was a blind spot. You might have survived if you had kept yourself hidden till the end. But it was only a matter of time. Become my food and die.」

Zero assumed the warrior was a small fry who came out of hiding after noticing he was trapped.

There was no indication the enemy had noticed Zero’s plans.

Zero created several Evil Dragon Beasts and ordered them to eliminate the nuisance.

His encroachment to the labyrinth progressed smoothly; the assimilation rate had exceeded 90%. He could create as many evil dragon beasts as he liked by robbing the inexhaustible supply of energy inside the labyrinth.

The created evil dragon beasts rushed towards the prey all together, but they were annihilated by a single flash of light.

「Oh? For you to defeat my evil dragon beasts with ease…

I guess you aren’t some small fry who hid out of fear.

I am called Zero. The one who leads the Heaven’s Army, I was sent to destroy this country.

I shall acknowledge you as an enemy worthy of crushing. You may name yourself!」

Zero didn’t look down on the enemy, since he hadn’t been attacked at all while he dominated the 60th floor.

Zero thought that if his opponent’s intention was to obstruct him, he would have done so earlier.

However, the person standing in front of Zero seemed to possess more combat power than Zero had expected.

After all, that person was―

「My name is Zegion.

The faithful servant of the Great Demon Lord, Rimuru-sama.

The one who bear the title “Mist Lord”」

The strongest guardian in Ramiris’ labyrinth.

As ordered, Zegion went to fight Zero.

Zegion wouldn’t allow anything to sully this place, the place that he and his companions protected, the labyrinth.

Inevitably, Zegion and Zero came head to head.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

To begin with, the reason why Zegion didn’t attack was clear.

That was because he obeyed Rimuru’s order.

Otherwise, it would be impossible for him to silently watching the invasion until now.

「Zegion? I have never heard that name. Are you saying you’re one of Demon Lord Rimuru’s executives?

Diablo, Benimaru, Shion, Gobuta and Ranga. And also, Beretta. There’s other well-known people too, like Souei, Gabil and Gerudo.

If it were against them, I wonder if I might enjoy the fight a little bit…」

Convinced of his overwhelming advantage, Zero boasted.

But it wouldn’t take long for Zero to realize his misunderstanding.

「Such drivel. If the enemy stands in front of you, you just need to look at the person to judge their strength.

But there is one thing you are right about— you will not enjoy this fight.」

Zero wore displeasure on his face when he realized the meaning of Zegion’s answer.

Although he didn’t particularly feel anything, it was a facade to make the enemy think that he was an emotional person.

He slowly stood up and took a stance.

「Would you mind waiting a bit?

Your confidence is based on only your absolute immortality within the labyrinth.

But are you sure that it is absolute?

You only challenge others despite the difference in ability due to that guarantee.

Let me tell you. That way of thinking is wrong! That’s because―」

His sentence only got that far.

Zero was about to provoke Zegion by telling him that he had robbed the source of his immortality, but was cut short.

Zegion’s patience had reached its limit.

‘Death to those who defile the labyrinth!’

That was the imperial command given to him by Rimuru and his raison d'etre.

Although he had agreed to the plan after Benimaru explained how they would let a part of the labyrinth get taken over, that didn’t mean he would let it happen quietly.

To Zegion, defiling the labyrinth was an act similar to touching the reverse scale of a dragon[2].

Once Ramiris finished isolating a portion of the labyrinth, Zegion no longer needed to restrain himself.

Zegion unleashed his anger, interrupting Zero.

Zero stumbled at the heavy impact.

He had raised his shield to avoid damage just in time, but he couldn’t nullify the immense momentum.

From behind the shield, he saw that Zegion’s leg was raised in the air. In an instant, Zegion had closed in and kicked him.

While keeping his eyes on Zero, Zegion slowly lowered his leg―

「You’re a tough one. Be warned: the next one will be a bit stronger.」

As Zegion spoke, his figure disappeared.

His extreme speed had slipped through Zero’s『Space Grasp』and『Magic Power Perception』skills.

Using his experiences from within the labyrinth, Zegion’s techniques evolved every day.

The end result was his own unique melee technique that incorporated many of his abilities, especially『Space-Time Manipulation』.

It would be impossible for someone who had never faced him before to see through his movements.

Zero barely escaped the danger by activating his Ultimate Skill『Master Shield』.

Even if he couldn’t see the attacks, the attacks were meaningless in the face of the ultimate defense, Zero, the Absolute Shield.

Following Zero’s will, the Absolute Shield automatically defended him from all attacks.

While being protected by his absolute defense, Zero modified his appraisal of the person called Zegion.

(To think there was still someone as strong as him… I guess Demon Lord Rimuru can’t be underestimated…)

There was not a shred of doubt that his master Velda’s prediction was correct.

It was unimaginable for a Demon Lord who has such strong subordinates to be the one defeated first.

With that thought, Zero analyzed Zegion’s strength.

Based on Zegion’s extreme mobility, Zero figured that Zegion was a being close to a spiritual lifeform.

He didn’t move the way one with a physical body would move.

But that didn’t make Zegion invulnerable.

(His fighting ability is wonderful. But, that’s all to it!)

All he could do was blindly repeat the same attacks over and over, unable to overcome Zero’s defense.

Zero lost his interest in Zegion.

「It was fun while it lasted. As my gratitude for that enjoyment, I shall show you my true power!

Take this, Zero Fill Wave!!」[3]

With absolute confidence, Zero fired an annihilation wave.

Every wavelength, and by extension every energy frequency turned into Zero.

By striking with a reversed wave, it canceled each other.

It nullified anything and everything by subjecting it to its inverse wave.

Every living being was affected; even spiritual lifeforms like Angels or Demons were no exception.

Rather, it would be better to say that those with stronger energy would be affected more.

However, the user of the technique needed to have energy that was at least equal to the target’s energy.

Zero’s energy surpassed even that of an Awakened Demon Lord.

Dagruel aside, Zero surpassed even the Four Unholy Generals[4].

Zero transformed all of his energy and fired his strongest attack that was Zero Fill Wave.

Against such deadly attack, not even Zegion would―

「How pointless. This is an attack which converts your own energy into waves, am I right?

It’s a wonderful technique that adjusts itself instantaneously to be the inverted wave of the target, but in the end it is merely an automatic adjustment.

It has the same principle as your other ability, Automatic Defense.

An attack of this level won’t work on me.」

Zero was about to see the effect of his wave of annihilation which filled the room――

But there Zegion stood, unharmed. For the first time in the fight, Zero felt agitated.

「Impossible, you understood the underlying principle in an instant!?

Moreover, for you to be able to negate the Zero Fill Wave that turns every wavelength, even the pulse of life to zero―」

「How laughable. The thing that negates a wave is another wave. So I need not do more than let it envelop me.

Instead of opposing the wave, I just have to synchronize with it. That is the truth of the universe.

For someone like me, who can turn phantasms into reality, it’s a trifling matter to see your waves.

The likes of you are even lower than garbage compared to Rimuru-sama and Veldora-sama.」

Zegion’s calm words jarred Zero.

The moment Zero activated his ability and converting his energy into annihilation wave, Zegion had activated『Illusion World』of his『Illusion Lord Mephisto』.

There, everything was bent to Zegion’s will, even the flow of time.

With this ability, it was not hard for Zegion to analyze and counter Zero’s annihilation wave.

「Urgh! However, even if you negate my attack, your attacks can’t hit me, so the result is still the same!」

Zero, deciding to prioritize the erosion the labyrinth, stopped attacking Zegion.

Once he stole the labyrinth’s power, he could utilize that power and seal Zegion using the labyrinth’s 『Infinite Corridor』.

That was the plan.

「The farce taking place below should be over soon. I suppose I should also finish this up soon.」

Ignoring Zero’s predictions, Zegion acted on his emotions.

In other words, he struck Zero with a fist that contained his wrath.

「I said, your attacks won’t wo―」

Zero’s sentence was cut off.

Zegion’s Imagination became reality, and the Absolute Shield, Zero, was broken.

「Wha!? No way, this can’t be!!」

What had happened was outside of Zero’s common sense.

The Absolute Shield had been completely destroyed by Zegion’s fierce onslaught.

He was struck from all directions, so fast, that only afterimages of the Hihiirokane’s shine could be seen.

Everytime he sensed danger, Zero deployed the『Master Shield』at full power.

「It’s useless.

Your ability might be an impenetrable shield in the physical world.

However, it’s weak inside the spiritual realm.

This outcome is only natural.」

Zegion’s right hand shone.

A Dimension Ray which cleanly cut through every shield that protected Zero’s body came from that hand.

(But, I managed to endure his attack.)

Panting heavily, he had thought he had gained a moment’s reprieve ― before Zegion disappeared like the mist and delivered a piercing roundhouse kick from behind Zero.

「Gobagh!!」

Zegion had shrouded his kick with waves.

The annihilation wave that Zero had fired to Zegion earlier was returned as is.

Zero immediately moved to mitigate the damage, letting only a part of his energy be annihilated. It was a commendable response.

However, Zero realized that he was now backed into a corner.

There was a yawning gap between their abilities.

It wasn’t a matter of how much energy they had, but a sheer difference in rank.

Zegion’s left fist glowed with a dark grey light.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

The instant he predicted he would lose, Zero took the best possible action: escape.

(I don’t have enough power to fight that monster! Once I take over this labyrinth, I will eat the prey in the lower floors, and my power―）

Zero quickly assimilated his main body into the labyrinth and went to the lower floors.

Immediately afterwards, the connection with his clone he left behind was gone.

Zegion had sliced it to pieces.

Zero speed up the labyrinth’s encroachment, not understanding the feeling he was experiencing for the time in his life.

Fearing that the monster was chasing after him, he threw all his attention into his efforts.

As a result, he completed his assimilation with the labyrinth as he desired and seized the labyrinth’s power.

He felt a surge of energy inside the labyrinth, which had effectively become his own body.

Delightedly, Zero sought out even more prey to strengthen himself.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Zegion retracted his left fist and turned his sight to the lower floors.

He confirmed that Zero had escaped as planned, and murmured「Mission completed」.

As requested by Ramiris and Benimaru, Zegion cornered Zero before letting him escape.

(Everything is as Rimuru-sama desired――）

Rimuru’s profound strategy wasn’t something Zegion could fathom.

Believing that, it was unnecessary to question the reason behind his orders.

All he had to do now was be vigilant, just in case the plan failed.

Zegion walked quietly towards the big hole in the ground that had been created by his attack.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

Everyone in the control room was speechless.

It hadn’t been three minutes since Zegion began to move.

And yet, here he was, reporting that his mission was completed.

As the labyrinth had been isolated, the large screen couldn’t show display the fight.

They could only imagine how the fight went, but they knew it had to be pretty one-sided.

「As I expected, he didn’t like the plan of letting the labyrinth encroached…」(Ramiris)

「Yeah… Looks like Zegion really did snap.

He did well, allowing that guy to escape with his life, as planned.」(Benimaru)

「That’s because Zegion was calmer, unlike you.

Well, if I hadn’t used Rimuru’s name, he probably wouldn’t have even listened to me…」(Ramiris)

「That’s so… I don’t even think he would obey if I had ordered him, so I guess you did the right thing?」(Benimaru)

「Right? Although I didn’t think that he would be that angry…」(Ramiris)

「Oh well, that’s for sure――」(Benimaru)

Nodding to themselves, Benimaru and Ramiris had that exchange.

Everyone else in the room also agreed with their words.

「But, why did Rimuru-sama give out an order like this?」

Shuna asked, curious.

The answer came from a surprising person.

「You’ll know it when you see it! Probably.」

It was Ramiris.

At that moment, the only person in the room who knew the reason behind the complicated orders was Ramiris.

Benimaru had a vague idea, but he didn’t grasp the essence.

Perhaps, maybe only Zegion had realized.

Nobody in the room could argue with Ramiris’s words.

Soon, the plan inside the labyrinth would be completed.

The situation was headed to the end game, so there was no need to rush it.

In preparation for that moment, everyone went back to their respective duties.

* * *

[1] 星を喰らう者 Hoshi wo kurau mono, The one who devours Planet.

[2] 逆鱗に触れられる Gekirin ni furerareru A saying of that anyone who touches the reverse scale (a special scale) of the dragon shall incur its wrath. Can also be translated as incurring the imperial wrath.

[3] 完全消滅覇 Kanzen Shoumetsuha. Complete Annihilation Wave. ゼロフィルウェーブ Zero Firu Weibu. I think Zero Fill part of the name came from the Zero Filling method of disk formatting.

[4] After we discussed, we decide this as the new name for 四凶天将. Hope you guys like this one better than the previous one, I'll change the previous one from past chapters to this new one.





Chapter 230: Labyrinth’s Encroachment - Part 5


Despite his unwillingness, Dino advanced to face Beretta and Zegion.

Both sides locked eyes for a brief moment.

『Well then, let the fight begin!』

Ramiris gleefully started the battle.

Dino wasn’t as much of a battle maniac as Pico or Garasha.

Rather, he thought it was a pain.

But it couldn’t be helped. Dino decided to fight properly.

If only it was that simple.

Dino had tried to leisurely dodge Beretta’s fist, but as if it was not bound by its original shape, the arm twisted after Dino like a snake after its prey.

(He looks humanoid, but only on the outside! His body should be a doll, but it looks like he’s completely fused with that body!)

In just that short exchange, Dino revised his evaluation of Beretta.

Dino had easily defeated the old Beretta, but the current Beretta couldn’t even compare to his past self.

(More importantly, he grew way too much in such a short time…)

Gabil and Gerudo’s growth was bad enough, but to think that even Beretta had grown stronger.

And Zegion hadn’t even joined in yet. Dino wanted to just throw his hands up in defeat.

Because he was lost in thought, Dino didn’t realize that the ground beneath him had turned into a swamp, until it was too late.

‘Oh, shit!’ he thought. But his feet had already sunk into the ground.

Beretta had manipulated the earth.

「Hey, I’m sure you didn’t have this ability before!?」

「Is that so? Well, I do now.」

He was knee-deep into the ground, but it was only the beginning.

The ground solidified and turned into liquid metal.

It was a trap that even Dino would find hard to escape from, even with all his strength.

Dino had been so wary of Zegion, that he never expected Beretta’s sudden growth.

His plan was to neutralize Beretta first before facing Zegion, but that plan was becoming less and less likely.

Zegion was approaching.

Zegion’s fist was still as sharp and fast as ever.

As his legs couldn’t be moved and he didn’t have any evasion technique, Dino tried to parry with his left arm.

*Paf*. The blow was surprisingly light.

Rather, it was too light.

His body felt no pain. But that was not the case for his soul

「It… hurtsーーーー!!」

Dino cried out in pain.

Dino was a spiritual life-form, so naturally he had『Pain Nullification』.

Despite that, his soul screamed in pain, as if the pain was mocking him.

「Y-you bastard! You’re not Zegion, are ya!? Pulling an underhanded move like that…」

「Fufuu, how foolish. You have only yourself to blame for being tricked.

Is there even a point in using a normal attack against an opponent who has high resistance against damage? But, if you were so worried about Zegion-sama, then my attack would be easier to land.

Surprise attacks are surprisingly effective, you know?」

Zegion ― no, not Zegion. It was Apito, who disguised as Zegion by using his ability, who answered while sprouting out a smile.

And then, Zegion’s appearance transformed into a beautiful insect type Majin.

Although the effect of『Instant Death』 didn’t activate, it seemed the effect of『Sharp Pain』that was one rank lower than it worked.

If he had seen it coming and resisted the attack, there wouldn’t have been a problem. But having taken the full brunt of the blow once, resistance was futile.

That was due to Apito’s ability, Anaphylactic Shock[1].

That single hit had robbed Dino of his resistances.

「How dirty! Two-on-one was already unfair, that’s such an underhanded attack!」

「Silence! There is neither fair nor foul in combat. If you win, you live, and if you lose, you die! That’s the ironclad rule.」

Apito rebuked Dino.

Dino couldn’t even refute such an radical survival of the fittest mindset.

Even Beretta was taken aback slightly by Apito’s extreme logic.

If Arnaud and the other Holy Knights were here, they might have commented「Can’t you be a bit gentler and let him finish what he’s going to say?」. But for anyone who didn’t know Apito, her attitude would come as a surprise.

Apito was normally docile in front of Zegion.

Now, however, she was greatly elated to be Zegion’s representative. There was no longer anyone who could rein her in.

Apito sprouted a sadistic smile and raised one of her beautiful hands towards Dino.

「Wa-wait a minute!

Can we talk this out?

I’m sure we’ll come to an understanding, we just need to talk!」

「Ah, that may be true. Well, die!」

Apito smiled compassionately, listening to Dino shriek out his plea.

And then, she stabbed him, with the same smile on her face.

「OWWWーーーーーー!! Ple-please wait! It hurts! I’m really hurting here!!」

Dino screamed, tears in his eyes.

However much he wanted to run, his feet were still trapped in the ground.

『Ohohohohohoho! Serves you right, Dino-chan!

Whatcha think? If you apologize, I just might forgive you, you know?』

Ramiris laughed as she watched Dino scream in pain.

「Are you telling me to betray Velda-sama?」

『Oh? You catch on quick, don’tcha? That’s right!』

「Idiot, you know that’s impossible, don’t you!?」

『Hmm… You can’t? Why? I’m just asking, why did you obey that guy?』

「You, the reason why is… it’s because I can’t go against Veldanava-sama!」

『Dino, think about it carefully. Veldanava and Velda are not the same, right?』

「Huh? Why are you asking something so obvi…」

(Hm? Obvious? No, wait….. Velda-sama is Veldanava-sama, right?)

The more they spoke, the more Dino felt a sense of incongruity.

Sensing a contradiction in his words, he became lost in thought.

『Whatever. Anyway, I’ll make you reflect more on your crime of betraying my pure and innocent heart!

Well then, Beretta-san, Apito-san! Please finish him off!』

Dino’s scream rang throughout the room.

In the end, Dino was given no time to think, instead faced with repeated attacks from Apito.

−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

Ramiris’s mirthful laugh echoed through the control room.

She was happy to vent her frustrations by tormenting Dino.

Ramiris looked at the large screen with a very satisfied expression.

「Well, Should I forgive him with just this?」

「Didn’t you go too far there?」

「Don’t worry, it’s fine. Dino is tougher than you think, you know?」

Benimaru asked with a sigh while Ramiris replied, a bounce in her voice.

One of her objectives was to get her revenge on Dino, she wouldn’t just stop with just this.

「But I wonder… That guy named Zero, do you think he’s really going to move as Rimuru said?」

「Judging by how Velda cast Kazaream aside, I’m pretty sure Rimuru-sama’s right…」

「I see, then as I expected, Velda is not Veldanava. Dino also missed that. I guess, he probably thought ‘I’m too sly to be tricked by anyone!’ or something like that. How silly of him, right?」

「Eh, ahh….. Yeah, I guess.」

Benimaru nodded in agreement.

He decided to change the subject.

「At any rate, Zegion truly is amazing. It was a breeze for him.」

If they truly wanted to, Zegion and the other defenders would be able to dispose of Zero before Zero could encroach the labyrinth.

Everyone in the control room knew that.

But by Rimuru’s orders, they had enacted such an elaborate plan.

Their plan came from a discussion between Benimaru, Ramiris and Rimuru after Rimuru warned them of Velda’s plans to capture the labyrinth.

「Zero encroached the labyrinth and stole its power, just as Rimuru predicted.」

「Of course. I can’t imagine Rimuru-sama’s predictions being wrong.」

Shuna proudly nodded in response to Ramiris’ murmur.

「As for the prediction of Zero’s next action,

Wouldn’t it be difficult for him to maintain his own self once he fused with the labyrinth or something?」(Benimaru)

「Yeah. I already detached more than half of the labyrinth, it would be a big problem for him once he absorbs everything!

Honestly, it won’t be bad if he slowly assimilated it as he encroaches it, but trying to absorb everything in one go would blow away his mind.」(Ramiris)

「I see. So, what did Rimuru-sama say?」(Shuna)

「To put it briefly, since Zero will encroach the labyrinth, Rimuru asked us to isolate him with the labyrinth as the bait. At that time, we don’t know whether Zero will remain sane, but his reasoning will surely be affected.」(Ramiris)

「Therefore, once the labyrinth is isolated, we let him get attacked by Zegion.

Rather than waiting for him to come out, we smoke him out.

Rimuru-sama was anxious about Zero and Zegion facing off, but Zegion was more than willing.」(Benimaru)

「That’s right. In the end, it was Zegion’s complete victory.」(Ramiris)

「―I understand that much. However, WHAT DID Rimuru-sama SAY?」(Shuna)

Benimaru and Ramiris took turns answering Shuna, but they avoided directly answering her question, instead speaking in a roundabout manner.

Shuna became irritated and raised her voice.

「Uh. Didn’t he say that we might see his true nature?」

「That’s right. Not Zero’s true nature, Velda’s.」

Ramiris and Benimaru finally answered.

In short, once Zero fuses with the labyrinth, he would gain an absolute advantage against anyone within.

At that point, would he not start attacking, regardless of friend or foe? That was what Rimuru predicted.

The plan Benimaru and the others came up with was to use Zegion to instill terror into Zero.

As a reaction, Zero would wish for the power to be able to oppose Zegion.

Blinded by that desire, Zero would begin to prey upon everything in sight whether they friends or foe. That was their plan.

「That’s why, just before Zero’s assimilation rate reaches 100%, we plan to evacuate everyone.

Zero, gripped by fear and hungry for power, will definitely attack Dino’s side first.」(Benimaru)

「Exactly! By the way, it’s almost 98%, so it won’t be long now.」(Ramiris)

「Is that so? As one would expect of Rimuru-sama. However, what if Zero still has some reasoning left?」(Shuna)

「Then I’ll throw the isolated labyrinth into the『Infinite Corridor』!」(Ramiris)

「I see」, so everyone in the control room understood the plan.

If they could win Dino over before Zero finished his encroachment that would be even better.

“But, even so―” Shuna suddenly realized that Rimuru’s reason for rejecting an all-out attack wasn’t convincing.

In the first place, if they could eliminate the intruders by counter attacking, there wouldn’t be any reason to let Dino be attacked by Zero.

(If that’s the case, what is Rimuru-sama’s true intention?)

Shuna widened her eyes as she watched Ramiris frolicking around.

(Could it be… he doesn’t want to kill Dino-sama―）

Rimuru and Dino had gotten along well; they often joked with each other.

So had Ramiris.

They parted as enemies, but Rimuru didn’t wish to kill Dino.

Although it she wasn’t sure whether it was a request from Ramiris or it was Rimuru’s intention from the start, Shuna had a hunch she was right.

If that were true, then she could understand Ramiris’s attitude and the aim of such a convoluted strategy.

Then, all she had to do was to see it through to the end.

They only had to wait for Dino and Zero’s next moves.

(Whatever the result will be, everything is dancing in Rimuru-sama’s palm.)

Shuna nodded in satisfaction as she looked back towards the big screen.

In truth, Rimuru hadn’t thought that far when he gave his orders.

He had warned about the encroachment of the labyrinth from the predicted ability of the completed『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』.

And the only orders he gave were to minimize casualties, based on the actions he predicted Zero would take.

Rimuru didn’t expect that Zegion would corner Zero like that at all.

But Shuna was right about one thing: Dino’s treatment.

He only discussed the matter with Ramiris and didn’t tell Benimaru.

And that was why he left it all to Ramiris.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

At the same time that Ramiris and Benimaru finished their explanation, Zero, spurred by Zegion, furiously worked to finish his assimilation with the labyrinth.

「The assimilation rate has reached 99%! All members prepare to evacuate soon!」

Ramiris shouted, and Benimaru issued the command.

As ordered, the assault force, having been forewarned, transferred back to to the control room.

Once Zero’s assimilation completed, it was highly likely that any transfers would be obstructed, so they had to do it at the last possible moment.

And so, the operation succeeded.

「I have returned now, Ramiris-sama.」

Representing the assault force, Beretta announced their return.

Everything went as planned.

「Ok, thanks for the hard work!

In accordance with the enemy’s actions, the isolated labyrinth is to be ejected into the『Infinite Corridor』as planned.

However, on the off chance that it fails, we will enter an all-out battle.

It goes without saying that it’s dangerous to let the enemy come to this place.

Everyone stand by, ready to attack again, just in case that ends up happening!」

Everyone showed acknowledged Benimaru’s words.

How would Zero move and how Dino would respond to it?

They had to wait and see.

There was a high possibility that an intense battle would occur, depending on what happened

Of course, there was no one in this room that would be unprepared.

「Lastly, it goes without saying that Rimuru-sama’s survival is to be kept as a secret like before.」

With that said, Benimaru concluded his orders.

Naturally, they couldn’t expect help from Rimuru, nor did they plan to do so.

They were ordered to defend the labyrinth, and were prepared to devote their body and soul doing so.

Those feelings were shared by everyone who gathered in the room.

Just as Rimuru was keeping an eye on Velda’s movements, Velda was tracking Rimuru’s movement too.

That was the reason why Rimuru decided to not return to the labyrinth.

Ciel had pointed out the possibility that the entire labyrinth would get segregated the moment Rimuru choose to appear inside the labyrinth.

It would be possible if it was Velda’s ability.

Ramiris’『Labyrinth Creation』 was a very flexible ability, but it needed an anchor to this world.

If it lost that anchor, the labyrinth itself would drift away into the space between the dimensions.

Ciel had asserted that since it was possible for Rimuru to do so, there’s no reason Velda couldn’t.

If that happened, escaping from that inter-dimensional space was possible, but it would take too much time.

By the time they returned, the world would have meet its end, which would spell their defeat.

Rimuru had said so and explained about it to Benimaru and the others

Benimaru recalled such words and nodded greatly.

(Don’t worry, Rimuru-sama. I will protect the labyrinth even if it costs my life!)

Benimaru resolved in his heart as he turned to look at the big screen.

Ramiris also similarly pondered.

(Dino, you idiot. Really, what are you doing at such a crucial moment…)

Their plan was entering the final phase.

Dino’s group was bait to lure out Zero.

If Zero retained his sanity, he might cooperate with Dino.

There was also a possibility that Dino would accept his fate as Zero’s food.

But―― She hoped that it wouldn’t be a boring outcome like that.

(Hey, Dino… Can’t we just fool around and experiment with things like before?)

That was her wish.

She believed in Rimuru’s strategy.

And so, She wished like a prayer, that Dino would return as her friend once again.

* * *

[1] 無慈悲な抵抗破壊因子(アナフィラキシーショック) Mujihina Teikou Hakai Inshi (Anafirakshī Shokku) Ruthless Resistance Destruction Factor.

Anaphylaxis is a severe, potentially life-threatening allergic reaction. Anaphylaxis causes your immune system to release a flood of chemicals that can cause you to go into shock — your blood pressure drops suddenly and your airways narrow, blocking breathing.





Chapter 231: Labyrinth’s Encroachment - Part 6


Beretta and Apito, who were fighting Dino, vanished suddenly in front of his eyes.

Since his feet were trapped in the ground, he could only continue to endure their torture, but it ended suddenly.

He wrote off the pleasures he had started to feel as just his imagination[1], and pondered the reason why Beretta and Apito left.

‘Why did they both leave?’

It didn’t take long for him to find out why.

He sensed a powerful energy approaching at an immense speed.

As each of the floors seemed to be on different subspaces, using『Magic Power Perception』became harder the more floors there were between him and the thing he was trying to sense.

Despite the several floors between them, Dino was immediately able to notice it.

「Hey, Ramiris! What’s going on?」

Dino asked shouting.

『Ummmm, you see, the match is temporarily postponed. If you want to continue, we’ll do it later!』

And the answer was an unclear one.

(I see, because Zero has completed the labyrinth’s encroachment, they panicked and ran away.

Alright, with this I’m saved.)

Dino smiled, happy to have escaped danger.

However, that was too naïve a thought.

As Rimuru predicted, Zero had completely lost his sanity after fusing with the labyrinth.

After all, Zero was a being whose ego grew by assimilating other things.

In the face of a torrent of great power, he was reduced to a beast dominated by his instincts.

However, this was as Velda expected.

Zero would absorb the energy in the surroundings, growing larger and more gigantic.

And then, he would cause everything in his vicinity to breakdown.

This was how the completed『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』worked.

Even for someone of Zero’s caliber, he could be nothing more than a medium for the skill’s activation.

The stronger the activation medium was, the stronger the rampage state of『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』would be.

Moreover, the labyrinth would serve as an enormous reservoir of energy.

That energy would allow the incarnated evil dragon to evolve into a being that could be considered the sixth “True Dragon[2]”.

Then, true to its malevolent nature, it would seek to annihilate each and every being within the labyrinth.

Its name, the “Berserk Evil Dragon[3]” Zero would bare its malicious fangs.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Tremors rippled through the labyrinth.

It was because the source of the shaking was approaching the floor that Dino and co were on.

「Hey, I feel something bad is coming……?」

「What a coincidence. I feel the same too, Pico――」

Pico and Garasha conversed uneasily.

Towards those two was,

「Hey you two, forget about that and help me pull my leg out!

That Beretta bastard, he metallized the ground as he ran away……」

Dino shouted as he struggled to pull out his legs from the metallized ground.

It was like the two forgot about him, which wasn’t funny for him.

「Ahaha, sorry sorry. But, there’s such an unpleasant ability like that heh.

Can’t you turn yourself into energy with Apotheosis[4]?」

「I can’t. That damn ability caused a jamming wave, so I can't escape…」

「That demonic doll guy seemed to be stronger than the people we fought.

Hey Dino, it’s a disgrace for a spiritual life form to be trapped in physical matter.」

「Shut up. Never mind that and help me out quickly, Pico.」

「You reap what you sow, Dino. You suffer like this because you always lived slothfully.

Had you been a bit more serious, you wouldn’t be in this unsightly mess, you know?」

「I wonder about that. I think he was pretty serious there. The least he could do is resisting the pain earnestly!」

Pico and Garasha looked at Dino with eyes seeing a fool.

‘If you had time to receive the pain earnestly, you should have tried to escape seriously’ such an intention could be seen clearly from their gaze.

「Wh-what is it, you two. Even I, I have various――」

When Dino attempted to talk, that thing reached this floor.

It was the "Berserk Evil Dragon" Zero. Due to extreme hunger, he had lost the distinction between friend and foe.

「Uahh…… How can I say it, that’s Zero, he looks similar but he’s like a different person……」

「Rather than that, is that thing even Zero?」

「Not good, it seems he has lost his reasoning completely. We are in danger too.」

The three were dumbfounded, but Garasha perceived the danger promptly.

And then, she knew the meaning behind the bad premonition from a little while ago.

The “Berserk Evil Dragon” Zero attacked the three when they were caught in its sight.

Pico and Garasha had been conserving their strength in order to escape.

Garasha stepped to the front in order to repel the tentacle attacks sent out by the “Berserk Evil Dragon” Zero.

The Circle Shield equipped on her left hand transformed into a Huge Shield which didn’t suit Garasha’s slender body, the shield continuously repelled the tentacle attacks that were like a sharp lance.

Her shield’s shape resembled Gerudo’s and even the performance was almost the same.

Originally, Garasha was a defensive focused heavy warrior.

However, as Zero had fused with the labyrinth―― becoming the “Berserk Evil Dragon” Zero―― it was now possible for Zero to create tentacles from all directions.

The situation didn’t look good for Garasha as it wasn’t something that could be repelled with just one shield;

While being protected by Garasha, Pico attacked by creating numerous spears to counter the tentacles.

However, her attacks were also ineffective against the tentacles that sprung out ceaselessly.

In a match of numbers, there was no opponent that could win against the “Berserk Evil Dragon” Zero which had the energy of ”True Dragon” class.

Pico and Garasha felt their energy drop very fast, which resulted in the “Berserk Evil Dragon” Zero’s power rising even more.

「This’s not good! At this rate, we will lose all of our energy and be eaten!」

「What should we do? My defense will not last long against these attacks.

There’s a limit for me to create shields too!?」

The two dedicated themselves to self-defense now, but as long as they couldn’t defeat the problem, Zero, they were just postponing their death.

And, there was only a little time to think.

The “Berserk Evil Dragon” Zero could absorb the energy inside the labyrinth,

(What should I do? At this rate, we will be annihilated. But, then Velda-sama――)

Dino was troubled.

―― Dino, think about it carefully. Veldanava and Velda are not the same, right? ――

He recalled Ramiris’ words and steeled himself.

(Yeah, that’s right. Why did I get confused by such a matter?

What was the reason I tried to deprave and unleash Dagruel?

Wasn’t that because I want to forget the fact that Veldanava-sama is gone?

When did I start to think that Velda is Veldanava-sama?

Certainly, he has the same memories, but his personality and his way of thinking are like someone else……

Come to think of it now, it’s strange. Perhaps, he manipulated my thoughts too?

Oh well. Right now, dealing with Zero is more important!)

Dino clasped his fist and struck his cheek with full power.

There was no pain. However, it caused some considerable damage to numb the brain.

But, that blow blew away the troubles inside Dino’s mind.

「Hey, you two! I decided to revolt against that Velda bastard.

But, how about you guys? If you guys are with me as things are――」

「Ahhhhhhh, stop! I don’t care about the minor details so be quick and help us, you good for nothing!」

「That’s right, Dino. If you don’t hurry up, he will breakthrough my defenses, you know?

Since a while ago, I have summoned stacks of defensive shields consecutively, but they were all destroyed one after another.

My power is already at its limit to buy us some more time――」

「Besides, Dino. I didn’t think that this world is bad.

That thing called Octo-yaki[5] we ate when we infiltrated this country was delicious too.」

「I heard it’s made from monster ingredients, but it was unexpectedly good.」

「That’s why, I didn’t really want to participate in this war.

I only accompanied you because you were obeying Velda.」

「That’s right, Dino. The two of us will follow you.」

「You guys…...」

Dino couldn’t hide his honest wonderment to Pico and Garasha’s replies.

He was bewildered that these girls didn’t have any shred of loyalty towards Velda who’s equal to a god.

But, at the same time he thought.

‘As expected, it seems my thoughts had been manipulated’.

「Okay, I got it. It seems I have kept you two waiting for a while.」

With that been said, Dino smiled without hesitation.

While still smiling, he smoothly said「By the way, Pico. Please do something to the metallized ground around my legs!」and was rewarded with a punch from Pico, but that was a story between those two.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Dino advanced while smiling fearlessly.

With Pico’s help, his feet were freed from the ground.

「Well, then. It’s been a long time since I got serious.」

As he murmured, his eyes that had always seemed tired were opened wide.

「Divine Weapons Manifestation![6]」

Dino had taken his combat form using Apotheosis after a long time.

His appearance became splendorous with 6 pairs of white and black shining wings.

He outfitted himself with spirit clothing similar to a jet-black colored priest robe, and summoned two swords to his hands.

The Sword of Gold, Excalibur[7] and the Sword of Dark Silver, Caliburn[8].

As the sacred treasures of God Class, both were the strongest swords tempered by the Star Heart[9].

White and black swords, Holy Sword and Demonic Sword.

Excalibur shone like gold, Caliburn’s pitch black blade was like studded with stars.

A twin swordsman who skillfully wields two opposing swords, this was how Dino fight.

Using the God class Great Sword “Crumbling Fang” was Dino’s temporary style; this was the reason why Ramiris realized that Dino hadn’t been serious before.

As Dino didn’t train the skills needed to handle a great sword with both his hands, in the previous invasion Dino’s combat only relied on his physical ability and the Hyper Mode of his Ultimate Skill『Slothful Lord Belphegor』.

If Dino had pulled out his twin swords, his ability would have surpassed Albert and Grasword.

Because Dino was the strongest swordsman in this world.

Dino walked casually and stood next to Garasha who was defending against the tentacles with her shield.

「Leave the rest to me.」

Saying so, he instantly cut all of the tentacles.

Garasha took a breather.

Although Garasha saw Dino’s figure like this for the first time in several thousand years, she felt a sense of security same as before.

(Good grief…… He’s really lazy……)

In contrast to the amazed like feelings, a smile appeared on Garasha’s face.

「Go, Dino! Send that monster flying!」

Pico cheered Dino.

Dino responded to Pico’s cheer by shrugging his shoulders slightly.

And then.

*Thunk*, *Thunk*, someone’s footsteps could be heard.

Someone came walking calmly.

And then, that person asked Dino.

「Is this how you’re when you get serious?

Even the mark of the『Deathly Butterfly[10]』 that I had carved on you was broken, heh.

Unsurprisingly. As expected, it seems my eyes weren’t wrong.

So, did you feel like apologizing to Ramiris-sama?」

That person was Zegion. Naturally he didn’t get surprised by Dino’s transformation.

He had expected that Velda couldn’t control Dino completely.

When Dino got serious, he rivaled Zegion's strength. It was possible that Dino even be stronger.

「Ahh. It was my bad, Ramiris.」

Dino obediently apologized.

Ramiris’ reaction was――

『Ohohohohohohoho! As I expected, righteousness is obviously on my side!

Okay, I’ll forgive you! So Dino――

Let’s quickly defeat that evil “True Dragon”!!』

Like that.

Dino tightened his expression and smiled wryly.

He noticed the word “True Dragon” in Ramiris’ speech just now.

(Good grief, that Zero bastard…… He ate the labyrinth and evolved into a “True Dragon”.

No―― that was Velda’s aim when he granted『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』 to Zero.

If that’s the case, the only thing I can think of is to crush his subordinate completely.

I’m certain―― that guy wasn’t Veldanava-sama’s reincarnation.)

Dino stood forgetting about his doubt.

「D-do you want to cooperate, Zegion?」

「Of course.」

Hearing Zegion answered without any hesitation, Dino laughed.

Dino casually passed a sword to Zegion.

It was the God Class, Great Sword ”Crumbling Fang” that Dino usually used while he was pretending.

「Let’s do it. We will defeat that guy quickly; I have something to settle with Velda.」

Dino slightly nodded and said 「Take it.」, Zegion received the sword with one hand.

Then, Zegion put “Crumbling Fang” on his back.

On that moment, “Crumbling Fang” shone with a dazzling light.

As the light settled down, a pair of shining wings appeared on Zegion’s back.

This was the reborn form of “Crumbling Fang” which had fused with Zegion.

It was the moment Zegion’s new power, “Crumbling Wings”, was born.

「……So quick, it seems it acknowledged you as its master.

In the end, I wasn’t acknowledged as the master of “Crumbling Fang”…..」

Dino complained.

Zegion didn’t mind him, and then he handed over something he was holding in his hand to Pico.

「Kyuiーー!!」

It was the Minidora, Gaia.

Before Zegion came to defeat Zero, he was looking after and protecting Gaia inside the labyrinth.

「That dragon is Demon Lord Milim-sama’s pet. You better treat him carefully.」

「Eh, ah? Wait!?」

Pico panicked.

‘Why me?' so she lamented, but it could be said the role suited her.

As Garasha concentrated on her defense, only Pico was available.

Even while they were conversing, the attack of the tentacles didn’t cease.

Dino repelled everything.

And so, the people left behind inside the labyrinth were ready.

As for Dino and Zegion.

Next was their turn time for a counterattack.

* * *

[1] A Masochist’s awakening??? XD

[2] 竜種 Ryuu Shu, Literally Dragon Kind/Species/Race, True Dragon is how Clown had translated it since the start, if you guys want to change it, I’ll change it in the future and past chapters.

[3] 狂邪竜 Kyou Jaryuu. 狂 is kanji for lunatic, insane, crary, it’s also the first kanji for Berserker too.

[4] 生体神格化 Seitai Shinkakuka - Living Deitification.

[5] It’s half katakana half kanji, オクト焼 Okutoyaki. It’s Takoyaki xD

[6] 神格武装発現 Shinkaku Busou Hatsugen.

[7] 黄金の剣(エクスカリバー) Ougon no Ken, Ekusukaribaa~.

[8] 闇銀の剣(カリバーン) Yamigin no Ken, Kalibaan.

[9] 星の核(スターハート) Hoshi no Kaku (Sutaa Haato).

[10] 死刻蝶 Shikakuchou.





Chapter 232: Labyrinth’s Encroachment - Part 7


Dino and Zegion. The unlikely pair were squaring off against the “Berserk Evil Dragon” Zero and repelled his attacks.

Their aim was to get outside the labyrinth, in other words to escape from Zero’s body.

「Oh man, this is going on forever……」

Dino grumbled while annihilating the attacking Zero’s clones with Deep Bullet[1].

Zero seemed to be able to endlessly spawn his clones with the power he had acquired as he fused completely with the isolated labyrinth.

As each of the clones had the same strength as Zero before he evolved, and they could regenerate numerous times.

Killing the clones was a futile effort, as the corpses would just revive.

After all, since Zero’s main body was the labyrinth itself, he could absorb all the energy used inside the labyrinth.

「Using emission type techniques are meaningless. You should know that such actions benefit the enemy more.」

Zegion warned Dino while he minced Zero’s clones with his shining wings.

Zegion pulverized his enemy with his new ability “Crumbling Wings, Kuzuha[2]” by vibrating his wings. By generating directional high frequency waves which cut everything that they came in contact with.

Moreover, by combining it with Zegion’s magic power, it was possible to change its property depending on the enemy’s waveform.

In addition to All Heaven Sight, Zegion had acquired the means to attack in all directions, it could be said that his blind spot had disappeared.

Even with all of that, Zegion had never used any emission type abilities ever since he joined forces with Dino.

He handled the incoming enemies with direct blows and slashes of his wings.

The reason was the aforementioned labyrinth’s power.

Zegion was familiar with its nature as he was its strongest guardian.

Dino’s energy was enormous, his total energy surpassed Zegion’s.

However, that didn’t mean it was inexhaustible.

It wasn’t a problem for Dino to shoot tens of thousands of magic bullets, but it would be a different story as all of the energy was absorbed by the enemy.

「Seriously? Then, does that mean Zero is applying Ramiris’ labyrinth power on himself?」

Zegion answered Dino’s question by silently nodding.

Looking at Zegion, Dino immediately depressed.

Zero’s clones could regenerate until the labyrinth’s energy ran out. The clones’ ability was equally the same as if Multiple Existence was used.

All of the Zeros were moving under the same drive.

The only saving grace was that they couldn’t use techniques since Zero’s ego had collapsed.

However, a “True Dragon” was still a true dragon class.

Looking at only his energy, it was a terrifying thing to be felt as he easily surpassed Dino’s.

「Hey, Ramiris! Does the labyrinth have any weakness? They keep reviving no matter how many times we kill them, you know!?」

『Don’t be stupid! My labyrinth has no such thing as a weakness!

Inside the Infinite Floors, communication to the outside is sealed. Such a thing as escaping would be impossible!』

「Idiot! Don’t brag!! Then, how can you communicate with us right now? 」

『Ahh, that’s because――』

According to Ramiris’ explanation, the inside of the “Berserk Evil Dragon” Zero, the labyrinth itself, was a completely isolated space.

It became a subspace where communication was impossible, whether it was with『Telepathy』or『Thought Transmission』.

However, by following Rimuru’s instructions as he had predicted this predicament, the countermeasures were perfect.

This time, it was possible to communicate through Zegion.

Exchanging information became possible through the “Soul Corridor” between Zegion and Rimuru.

And so, the connection of this “Soul Corridor” became the key to escape from the ”Berserk Evil Dragon” Zero’s body.

「In other words, we weren’t walking around aimlessly……」

Dino was relieved hearing Ramiris’ explanation as he was tired of continuing to walk through seemingly endless passages without any sign of an exit.

Dino’s swords cut the approaching Zero’s clones and tentacles that grew from the ground and wall.

His twin swords, the Holy Sword and the Demonic Sword, were shining and clad in white and black aura respectively.

In order to suppress the release of energy, Dino changed his fighting style to cladding his swords with fighting spirit.

Dino appeared to repel the enemy easily, but that was because his sword skills were excellent.

Although Zero lost his ego, there was no doubt that Zero was dangerous as he was attacking out of instinct.

Because Dino was abnormally strong, as if he went through an uninhabited plain, the enemies couldn’t get close to Dino.

There was needless to say about his companion, Zegion.

Dino and Zegion walked side by side and disposed of any hindrances.

Pico was walking in the center while carrying Gaia, Garasha was responsible for being vigilant and protecting their rear.

Saving their energy as much as possible and dealing with everything with just swords was much harder than they had thought.

It didn’t mean they got tired physically, but it was more of a mental fatigue.

Although Dino thought that it would be better to stay put in one place which was easy to defend without moving around, as it was useless even if they defeated the enemies……

According to Ramiris, such an action wasn’t futile, but it would be best for them to head towards the nearest outer wall.

In the first place, it wasn’t a good idea to stay in one place because they were inside the enemy’s playing field where the area itself could be rearranged freely by the enemy.

『Well, that’s the reason, so can you guys go towards the designated point?』

「Got it. So, what do we do when we get there?」

『Let loose. Use your strongest attacks, and escape through the wall with full power!』

「……we can do that?」

『Whether you can or can’t doesn’t matter, just do it. Besides, there’s no other way to escape, you know?』

「Ah, okay.」

Dino judged that it was useless to ask any further.

Since Ramiris said there was no other way, he guessed he had no other choice but to do it.

What left was whether it was possible or not.

Because it was their strongest attack, they probably didn’t need to consider the energy consumption.

Because there was no need to worry about a little consumption as long as they passed through the wall.

Now, it was about how much power was needed for it.

Dino considered his abilities.

First of all was the Ultimate Skill『Slothful Lord Belphegor』, which he had acquired without his permission even though he had no intention to gain it.

It was a skill specialized in mental attacks.

By incorporating the Perception Obstruction of the Ultimate Skill『Slothful Lord Belphegor』, Dino strengthened the unfamiliar great sword he used into a phantasmagoric sword which he could transform freely.

Its affinity with Dino’s current dual swords needed no mention.

However, its effect was weak against someone in a rampage state like Zero. It was very unfortunate that『Slothful Lord Belphegor』wasn’t useful.

He also thought of unleashing the full power of his abilities, but if that failed he won’t have another chance. Dino deemed it would be better to reserve it as his trump card.

Then what should he do?

(Guess I have no other choice but to use it…...)

Dino sighed as he gave up and decided to use his last resort which he wanted to keep hidden.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Inside the control room, Ramiris and the others were also very busy dealing with the situation.

As it was unclear whether Dino deemed Velda as an enemy or not, they were preparing the countermeasures for both situations.

If Dino teamed up with Zero and let himself be eaten, they had planned to release the isolated part into the『Infinite Corridor』.

But, if Dino became an ally, they had to help him escape from inside of Zero safely.

If it was just Zegion, the plan was to forcibly do space transfer based on his location information via “Soul Corridor” and escape.

Using an attack to punch a hole through the wall momentarily, it would be possible to transfer to the outside through that gap.

However, in order to escape together with Dino’s group, they had to make a big hole in the wall.

To transfer in an unstable state was dangerous.

It would be fine if it was just Dino, but as Pico and Garasha were weaker when compared to Zegion and Dino, it was doubtful whether they would be able to endure the transfer through the subspace outside the labyrinth.

Therefore, it was necessary for the preparation to be in a perfect situation.

Besides, there was another problem.

Zero had evolved into a “True Dragon”.

Although Rimuru had informed them about the possibility, because Rimuru’s words were vague like『Hmm, it would be alright, probably.』, they thought it wasn’t an important matter.

In the unlikely event that such a situation became reality, they were to contact him immediately.

So, while Ramiris became Zegion and co’s navigation[3], Benimaru was contacting Rimuru.

And so, the operators inside the control room accomplished their works following the manual provided beforehand.

「Kufufufufu. Unbelievable, for a “True Dragon” to be really born!

As expected of Rimuru-sama, it looks like he had predicted everything.」

An excited laughter echoed inside the control room.

It came from Diablo.

Rimuru had ordered him to go to the control room.

Diablo instructed the operators, who were panicking to stand up, to continue their work as they were with his hand.

As usual, Diablo terrified the demon operators.

「Oh, Diablo. You’re so fast.」

「Of course. There would be no problem in ignoring Zero, if his evolution ended after he fused with the labyrinth……

However, since he has become a new “True Dragon”, we can’t leave him alone.」

「That’s for sure. However, I have heard about the possibility, yet I’m still surprised…..

As expected of Rimuru-sama, he had predicted things this far.」

「What are you saying. That goes without saying.

Leaving that aside, Benimaru-dono, it looks like your recovery is still insufficient.

Let me give you some of my energy.」

「Oh, that’ll be helpful. I thought that my recovery rate was insufficient if I want to destroy that.」

The amount Benimaru had recovered was less than half.

Therefore, Diablo transferred his energy to him.

It was an impossible method for everyone else, but it was possible for Diablo who could manipulate the energy of Rimuru’s『Nihility Collapse[4]』.

While watching those two, Ramiris said,

「The only members here who can move in that space are Diablo, Zegion and Benimaru.

Benimaru, you can use 『Space-Time Control』properly right?」

「Certainly, Ramiris-sama. Although I only just got the hang of it.」

「Okay then! With this, all of the cards have been assembled, I guess?[5]

We might need to call Master or Rimuru if Dino didn’t join our side.」

「Veldora-sama might be busy right now. He probably can’t spare any of his time for that.」

「I see~. Well then, I will have to make you guys work hard.

It would be bad if we didn’t make Dino come to his senses!」

「Kufufufufufu. That is exactly as planned.

Rimuru-sama believed that Dino-sama would join our side.」

「As expected of Rimuru. Well, I also believed that Dino will change his mind!」

Even while Ramiris was gleefully talking with Diablo, everyone was working without stopping.

And so, the preparations were finally complete.

「Well, are you guys ready? Okay then, let the final plan begin~!!」

Along with Ramiris’ command, the final plan was set into motion.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Dino and the others reached the point designated by Ramiris.

All that's left for them was to act together with the signal.

Ramiris began explaining to Dino and co.

『Okay? First, you guys need to escape from there.

I want you guys to pierce the wall using medium-level power.

Then, the two people over there and Gaia will jump out with Zegion and Dino’s barrier protecting them.

After that, you guys have to return back after destroying that abominable evil dragon!』

Dino was staring in puzzlement.

He couldn’t understand the content of the words Ramiris said.

――”Medium?” Dino didn’t understand the meaning of it.

――”Destroying that abominable Evil Dragon？” He had no idea how.

「Hey. HEY HEY HEY HEY! WAIT PLEASE!

What are you saying? You’re counting me as a member of the evil dragon subjugation, aren’t you!?」

He wanted to ask about the Medium-thingy, but the evil dragon subjugation was a bigger problem than it.

Dino objected in panic, he didn’t want to be made as a member without his consent.

However, such a thing won’t work on Ramiris.

『Hey you.

You could prostrate before me in order to get my forgiveness, right?

If you don’t score some good points here, I wonder what will happen……

You won’t be able to imagine it, right?」

Dino had no other choice but to submit to Ramiris’ threats.

In addition to being an opponent he couldn’t triumph against in a quarrel since the olden days, Dino was in a weak spot this time.

Dino tearfully steeled himself.

「Got it. Then, what do you mean "medium"?」

『You don’t even know about that?

It means to use enough of your power to make a hole in the wall but don’t use up all of your power!』

「Wait! Like hell I could understand such vague explanations……

Besides, you said to go full power before!」

『Aaah, geez! You’re so noisy about such trivial things……

Don’t mind the minor details, go open a hole in the wall and escape.

After you escape, save a portion of your power for your strongest attack to destroy that evil dragon!』

Ramiris one-sidedly showered Dino with words.

In short, he could understand that what she was trying to say was to break the wall while saving enough power to attack the evil dragon.

(Good grief, she’s really irresponsible. But it's not like I'm the one to talk, though.)

It seemed that two people who behave alike could get along surprisingly well with each other.

「Alright, let’s escape quickly!」

Dino leisurely took a stance.

He no longer thought of being stingy with using his ability.

Now, what he needed to do was to match his timing with Zegion to Pico and Garasha, and break the wall.

『Good, protect them with your barrier properly, okay?

Otherwise, they would get swallowed up by the subspace and get blown away to no one knows where!」

Dino nodded to Ramiris’ warning.

Aside from Zegion who was connected via “Soul Corridor”, Dino and co who didn’t have firm bonds, had no foothold inside the subspace.

Still, Dino could manage it somehow, but he predicted that Pico and Garasha would get swept away easily by the subspace.

If they were swallowed up by the phase fluctuation inside the subspace, it would be impossible to predict what kind of different dimension and space they would get blown into.

Because it was a different space where the flow of time could get distorted, it would be hopeless to return to the same spot once you got swept away.

Even for Pico and Garasha who were of the awakened demon lord class, it would be difficult for them to maintain their existences inside the subspace.

The minimum requirement for that was to own the『Space-Time Control』skill.

It was an ultimate ability that nobody else had apart from Diablo, Zegion and Benimaru, who finally could use it.

「Listen, you two wouldn’t be able to move inside the subspace.

Therefore, grab onto me tightly, okay? I don't think you can come back once you get swept away.」

「Understood. I probably won’t die, but I don’t know where I will end up going to.」

「Dino, can I trust you?」

「Leave it to me. Now that we’ve come this far, we just have to do it.」

The three of them were having such a conversation.

At that time, Zegion took out something from his『Space Warehouse[6]』and offered it to Dino.

「Take it.」

Dino took it as he was coerced by Zegion’s attitude that won’t let him say yes or no.

It was a small, round orb.

「Huh, this thing is the pseudo core[7] that Rimuru uses to play, right?」

Dino’s question was met with silence.

It seemed Zegion had no intention to answer it.

While Dino was grumbling quietly「Okay, whatever……」with sad eyes, he tucked the orb into his pocket.

The preparation was complete.

Things won’t end just with escaping; there would be work to do afterwards.

Dino understood this well and paid close attention so that his power distribution won’t be wrong.

And then――

At the same time with Ramiris’ signal, the four people inside Zero released their power.

* * *

[1] 濃縮魔力弾(ディープブレット) Noushuku Maryokudan (Diipu Buretto) Condensed Magic Bullet.

[2] 崩羽(クズハ) Houhane/Kuzuha. Fuse-sensei gives us the furigana for it. 羽 could mean feathers, but using (Insect) wings would be the correct one imo.

[3] 道案内(ナビゲート) Michiannai (Nabigeito). Written as Guidepost/Guide, read as Navigation.

[4] I’ll use this from now on and will change it from the past chapters later.

[5] 面子 Mentsu (Meld/Melded tiles), Ramiris used a mahjong term for combination of tiles that form a set. Think this as you get all of Ex◯◯ia cards in your hand XD.

[6] 空間倉庫 Kuukan Souko. Space/Spatial Warehouse/Storehouse.

[7] 宝珠(ギジコン) Houju (Giji Kon). Houju mean Sacred/Precious Gem/Orb, Giji mean Pseudo/Artificial, Kon is from 疑似魂 (Gijikon) which mean Artificial/Pseudo Soul/Spirit. A pseudo core for a pseudo soul. This orb is what Rimuru and co used to play with their avatars inside the labyrinth.





Chapter 233: Labyrinth’s Encroachment - Part 8 -Conclusion-


Dino had a hidden ability.

Ultimate Skill『Fallen Lord Luciel[1]』, one of the oldest ultimate abilities.

It had the abilities of both Guy’s『Prideful Lord Lucifer』and Milim’s『Wrathful Lord Satanael』.

However, its performance was inferior to Guy and Milim’s ability.

Therefore, Dino deeply understood that 『Fallen Lord Luciel』would be meaningless against Guy and Milim.

Dino was “Stellar Lord Dragon” Veldanava’s trusted retainer.

He was always by his side, crossing battlefields as Veldanava’s sword.

He had become the Strongest Swordsman at that time.

And then, the world had been pacified and conflict had vanished from the world.

Afterwards, Veldanava gave him the task of being the surface’s guardian, travelling around the world.

However――

As if his Master were waiting for Dino’s absence, Veldanava, died.

Veldanava's beloved wife, Lucia, had also gone with him.

In his fury, Dino destroyed that foolish country.

At that time, what he acquired was Ultimate Skill『Fallen Lord Lucifel』.

His Ultimate Skill『Sky Lord Luciel[2]』which was originally given to him by Veldanava had transformed.

Fueled by his raging wrath and hatred. Dino did everything he could for destruction.

Without being sensed by Demon Lord Guy Crimson, Dino swiftly exacted his vengeance.

However, that never made Dino feel better.

He thought about destroying the world itself, but remembering Milim, the orphaned child of Veldanava and Lucia, calmed his raging heart.

Then several thousand years passed.

While losing his reason to live, Dino continued his duty as the guardian of the surface world.

Although he himself lived lazily and only heard reports from his two subordinates.

The reason why he became a Demon Lord was to gain information.

Protecting the being called Milim from the shadow became Dino’s reason to live.

Although he never came into contact with her directly, and neither had he planned to acknowledge Milim as his master……

When Dino saw the scum Clayman hit Millim, something changed inside him.

Unique Skill『Sloth』that he had acquired unknowingly had evolved into Ultimate Skill『Slothful Lord Belphegor』.

Unique Skill『Sloth』, which Dino acquired while continuing his slothful lifestyle, had the ability to deprave the targets.

Because he ended up obtaining the skill, Dino thought about using it.

To kill time and partially to tease Dagruel, Dino played around and tried to deprave him with his Unique Skill『Sloth』.

Like Dino, Dagruel, who had dedicated his loyalty to the same deceased master, was pitiful. That was also the reason why Dino tried to untie Dagruel’s heart.

It was a completely unintended event for Dino that the ability he used for such purpose evolved into an ultimate ability.

However, even so. Dino’s fate was changed because the acquisition of this ability.

――Was it a coincidence, or perhaps, was it fate?――

Those with angel series’ ability couldn’t resist the Master Program (Ruler of the Angel), the hidden ability of Ultimate Skill『Justice Lord Michael』.

The only possible way to resist it was to offset an angel series’ ability with a demon series’ ability.

Although it had transformed.『Fallen Lord Luciel』was still a part of angel series’ ability, it couldn’t escape from Absolute Control of『Justice Lord Michael』.

However, at this moment. Here, inside the labyrinth created by Ramiris.

When Ultimate Skill『Fallen Lord Luciel』, which he had sealed for a long time, was activated, Dino realized.

(Ahh, I see. Angel series’ ability facilitated the Thought Guidance as a marker――）

Whereas the demon series were free abilities, angel series were hierarchical abilities. They were programmed to obey the order of the Supreme Being.

Dino, who had his resistance increased due to becoming a fallen angel from the start, and because he was isolated in this subspace, was now released from the Curse of Control. Once he escaped, he wouldn’t get caught for a second time.

Dino's『Slothful Lord Belphegor』offset『Fallen Lord Luciel』and he regained full control of himself.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Dino passed through the hole on the labyrinth’s outer wall and jumped into the subspace.

When he did so, he suddenly sensed the traces of the thought interference wave from『Justice Lord Michael』against『Fallen Lord Luciel』and completed the countermeasures with『Slothful Lord Belphegor』.

Although Dino was may have been a bum, he worked fast. It wasn’t that he couldn’t work, he just didn’t want to.

That was how the man named Dino was; he would do things swiftly as possible if he was forced to do so.

It was needless to say, the best thing for him was『Not working』.

Unfortunately for Dino, however, a future of hard work awaited him.

『Good job! Now, you have one job left!』

Ramiris’ thoughts reached him even though he was separated from Zegion.

In short, he had completely succeeded in escaping from the inside of Zero’s body.

It seemed that two other people had stood waiting, Zegion promptly headed to his designated position.

Dino felt from their presence that those two’s energy level’s easily surpassed those of awakened demon lord class.

With Zegion included, the three people arranged themselves like an equilateral triangle.

(Diablo and Benimaru, is it.

――Did their energy increase again?)

Dino thought so, although he wasn’t eager to throw out a tsukkomi.

Dino quickly understood the aim of the plan and his role in it.

They were trying to annihilate Zero with the ones who had the strongest fighting power.

Dino had thought that it would be impossible to annihilate Zero seriously since destroying a “True Dragon” wasn’t easy at all…... but he realized that they were actually serious about it.

Dino also moved inside the subspace so that the lengths of the sides became equal and reached his designated position.

It was a ritual requiring no less than 4 people.

With two people, it formed a one-dimensional line of two dots connected.

With three people, it formed a two-dimensional triangle.

If it was with four people, it formed a three-dimensional tetrahedron.

In other words, they were forming a Spatial Magic Circle which far surpassed the level of the multi-layered magic circle……

And so, a tetrahedron was formed as to enclose the ”Berserk Evil Dragon” Zero.

With each person as a vertex, Zero was caught inside『Absolute Barrier[3]』.

「Kufufufufu, as expected of Demon Lord Dino-sama. It helps that you’re exceptionally observant.」

「Ahh, that’s creepy. Don’t need to use honorifics with me, Diablo.」

「Is that so? There isn’t shred of respect inside my heart, you don’t have to worry about it.」

「You’re fucking kidding right! That’s so uncalled for!? So you aren’t just being sarcastic……」

「That thing aside. Shouldn’t we end this quickly?」

「That’s right. Leave the nonsense for later.」

“Eh, why is it my fault?” Dino held back from saying those words.

It was pointless even if he said it; it could be worse as it might unnecessarily provoke Zegion’s anger.

The notion that Zegion would be someone hard to deal with had already taken root inside Dino’s mind.

「Well then, Dino-dono. The main act is yours. We will match our timing with yours.」

So Diablo said.

Benimaru and Zegion didn’t have objection either.

If it was just the three of them, it was possible for them to match their timing perfectly, but to request something like that from Dino would be harsh.

So, at the same time that Dino unleashed his technique, the three of them would follow it.

Dino had no complaints either.

Rather, he felt relieved that he wasn’t asked to do something unreasonable, such as matching his timing with theirs.

「Gotcha. Let’s go with full power!」

Dino yelled, sharpened his spirit and focused his mind in order to unleash his strongest attack.

His six pairs of white and black wings shone, as he gathered the surroundings’ magic essence and spirits into his twin swords ――

「Fallen Crusade[4]!!」

And so, he fired a white light slash and black shadow slash.

Both of the slashes intersected spectacularly at the center of the tetrahedron.

Colorless aurora filled the inside of『Absolute Barrier』.

However, the attacks on the “Berserk Evil Dragon” Zero weren’t over yet.

The moment both slashes intersected――

「End of World!!」

「Dimension Storm!!」

「Prominence Acceleration!!」

Several super special moves were unleashed.

With exquisite timing, it all reached the center of the tetrahedron as to cover Dino’s technique.

It caused a catastrophic, destructive power which was the greatest ever seen since the beginning of the universe.

The catastrophic destruction filled『Absolute Barrier』, which was created to not let such power escape.

――――Quartet Skill[5]：Breakdown Nostalgia[6]――――

The power of the four people combined as one and brought forth the ultimate destruction.

It could be said that it was fortunate that this place was a subspace.

For example, even if it was sealed by『Absolute Barrier』, just the leaked aftershock of the destructive power would be enough to wreck the surface ground.

Since it was a Quartet Skill by four of the most powerful beings in the world, the synergy produced an unimaginable result.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

You are reading this in Guro’s place.

Everyone who witnessed the spectacle was completely silenced.

Except for one person.

「Kufufu, kuha, kuhahahahaha! Amazing, what a truly amazing power!!

However, what is more amazing than all else is the existence called “True Dragon”.

Even after being bathed by such destructive power, it hasn’t been annihilated――」

While Diablo laughed loudly, he analyzed it calmly.

Exactly as he stated, only the intact “Dragon Core” remained in the center of the tetrahedron.

Although colorless, it was a mysterious orb emitting a dim shine.

Everyone was captivated as if their minds were stolen by the orb.

However, that would lead to carelessness.

The “Berserk Dragon” Zero, without thinking about his own destruction, tried to take, at the very least, one of them along with him as his last breath’s struggle.

He predicted that if one corner of the tetrahedron was destroyed, the power trapped inside『Absolute Barrier』would swallow everyone in this place.

Zero’s instinct couldn’t understand it, but if he succeeded, it would deal a massive amount of damage to the main body of Ramiris’ labyrinth.

As his malevolent instinct demanded, Zero mustered the last bit of his power to stretch out his tentacle.

That tentacle went towards Dino’s group.

「Ah――」

The first one to react was Garasha, she pulled Pico and threw her towards Dino.

She protected Pico from the tentacle with her own body, but that was her limit.

When the tentacle grasped Garasha, it dragged her into『Absolute Barrier』.

From inside Pico’s arm who had lost her balance, Gaia jumped to Garasha while it cried「Kyui~~!!」.

Everything happened instantaneously.

「Garasha!」

Although Dino shouted, he couldn’t move.

Because he understood that if he moved now,『Absolute Barrier』 would collapse.

「I’ll――」

「Stop! You’ll disappear if you enter it――」

Dino stopped Pico, who was about to jump in.

Needless to say, the power inside wasn’t something she could endure.

Even if he did that, Dino knew that he would end up losing Pico as well.

(Damn it! If only I didn’t let my guard down……)

Dino lamented, but he couldn’t do anything.

He had no other choice but to give up.

「But, then, Garasha……and also Gaia will……」

Pico appealed to Dino while thinking about her companion.

But, Pico understood it too.

There was nothing she could do.

「I don’t, I don’t like things like this…… Dino――!!」

Just one.

If there was just one possibility――

「Listen, I will give you my strength. I’ll give you all of my power, so please maintain『Absolute Barrier』with it. Garasha won’t last long if she gets dragged into the center.

So, rest assured. I’ll go and save her quickly!」

「But, that――」

「Believe me. I’ll do it right away as there’s no time.」

Dino started to take preemptive action.

Although the tentacle itself had already disappeared, it would be impossible for Garasha to get back to Dino’s with her own strength.

In any case, the destructive power produced by the Quartet Skill would be blocked by『Absolute Barrier』 and would converge in the center.

It would create a powerful gravitational force towards the center, and consigned everything into oblivion beyond the “Event Horizon[7]”.

In order to escape from there you would need to exceed the speed of light, which was practically impossible.

The space was too distorted and unstable, so activating『Transfer』was out of the question.

There was no more time to spare.

The burden on Garasha would increase exponentially the closer she got to the center.

Because Garasha was an awakened demon lord class who specialized in defense, she could only manage to maintain her barrier somehow.

「Then, brace yourself. The energy transfers will begin――」

「There’s no need for that.」

At the moment when Dino tried to transfer his power to Pico, a voice could be heard from Dino’s pocket.

And then the small, round orb shone brightly.

It was the pseudo core Rimuru used to play with, which Dino got from Zegion before the plan started.

As the orb floated and drifted in the subspace, it shone intensely just for a moment.

And then, a feminine figure manifested from it.

That person suddenly appeared in front of Dino with his bluish-silver hair fluttering.

And then that person tapped Dino’s shoulder lightly, while jovially said「Well then, I’m going out for a bit.」, and flew into『Absolute Barrier』where a storm of power raging inside.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Garasha saw her life flash before her eyes like a revolving lantern[8].

She had gotten caught by the tentacle while trying to save Pico.

At that point, she had given up on her life.

Because she couldn’t believe that a fallen angel like her, nonetheless an awakened demon lord class, would be able to withstand the vortex of ultra-high density destructive energy that could even destroy a “True Dragon”.

As she approached the center, the burden on Garasha’s body increased.

Even so, she still could hold on herself, thanks to Gaia, the small dragon inside her embrace.

Gaia had a hard time assisting Garasha’s defense barrier, they barely succeeded in neutralizing the destructive power.

But, it was only a matter of time.

A Quartet Skill of four of the most powerful beings in this world.

It produced an unimaginable destructive power which this world had never experienced before.

Garasha’s senses couldn’t understand the extent of its greatness.

「You’re a fool, aren’t you? There was no need for you to follow me……

It's a pity, but I can’t help you anymore――」

「Kyui?」

Garasha muttered so and gently patted Gaia who was in her embrace.

And then, she resigned herself to fate and calmly waited for her impending doom…...

But, that time never came.

The reason why was――

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

That was a close call.

If Ciel was just a little bit late in creating a new ability, we would have lost Gaia.

If that happened, I can't even imagine how angry Milim would be...

I get the shivers just by thinking about it.

Not to mention, Dino tried to jump in to help them; there’s a better place for such recklessness.

Even if there were 2 people of awakened demon lord class, I wasn't sure they can reach the speed of light.

It was a black hole. Not even light could escape, so even if they reached 99% the speed of light, it would still be meaningless.

They might be able to escape if they haven’t reached the core yet, but it will be a very risky gamble. It isn’t something you can do it somehow just with willpower.

So, how could I do it?

Naturally, I wouldn't do something like moving beyond the speed of light.

And yet, there was a simple reason why I could say that I ended up fine.

If you can stop time, you don’t have to think about speed.

That’s the freedom to move beyond the speed of light.

But, I didn't need to do that this time.

Because I can neutralize it to a certain degree with『Nihility Barrier[9]』of my『Nihility Collapse』.

Things that come into contact with the barrier are assimilated and converted into nihility energy.

That’s the characteristic of『Nihility Barrier』.

Instead of escaping, endure it till the end. This may be the only way.

Well, even if it fails by any chance, I will be absolutely safe.

After all, it’s because the new ability Ciel had created, 『Multiple Existence』was incorporated into Ultimate Skill『Void God Azathoth』.

It was an ability Ciel made after she finished analyzing Ultimate Skill『Evil Dragon Azi Dahaka』, I could create clones which all connected with this ability.

Thanks to this ability, I didn’t need to be cautious of Velda anymore.

Thus I revealed myself, but I think that it was still impossible, even for Velda, to sense me in this subspace.

Still, I shouldn't carelessly rule out the worst case scenario.

However, there’s no problem for now.

Even if he sensed me and isolated Ramiris’ labyrinth, my clone which can also called as my main body still exists in the Imaginary Space.

If Velda did isolate the labyrinth, there’s a possibility that the connection with the main body will be cut off, but it will be easy to ascertain that if both sides detect each other.

After all, both are me.

It’s a weird sensation, but Parallel Thought works without much difficulty, so there’s no problem even when doing different actions.

It wasn’t a half-baked version like the one Vega used. It could be said that since Ciel had completed this『Multiple Existence』ability, destroying me would be a nigh impossible task.

Each of my『Multiple Existence』were connected through the “Soul Corridor”.

That being said, I was still in the practice stage; it’s the stage where I can’t manifest unless I use the orb that I used to play with before.

Oh well, if I keep on practicing soon I’ll able to do it easily.

So, even in the unlikely event that I die, it would end with just the orb being broken.

Even in this situation, wondering how to soothe Milim’s temper is a bigger problem for me, but that was just another story.

「Yo-you are……!?」

Garasha, Dino’s companion, who I saved together with Gaia, asked me while looking at me with surprised eyes.

I thought I knew her face, but I guess this was our first meeting.

「Hm, ahh. Nice to meet you? I’m Demon Lord Rimuru.」

I greeted her within the barrier.

Garasha looks speechless and couldn’t speak properly.

Is she nervous? Oh well, I don’t mind.

Thus, I was able to retrieve both Gaia and Garasha safely, now all we needed to do was to wait till the storm calm down.

As I thought that, I saw the ”Dragon Core” in the center of the tetrahedron.

「If you had that, you might become a real “True Dragon” too.」

I nonchalantly said so to Gaia who was being hugged by Garasha. That was a blunder.

I didn’t particularly plan to say so, and yet――

「Kyui~~!!」

Gaia jumped out from my『Nihility Barrier』 with an enthusiastic cry,

「Wai-, you!」

I called out, but it was already too late.

By the time my voice came out, Gaia was already outside the barrier.

And then, Gaia got disintegrated instantly after being exposed to the ultra-high dense energy outside my barrier. The orb which represented Gaia broke apart and disappeared.

That means Gaia has been annihilated.

《As expected of Master. I thought the same thing too.》

“What do I need to do for Milim to forgive me”――While I was thinking about such thing, I heard Ciel’s calm voice.

“Huh? What are you saying, Ciel?” I questioned, but it can’t be helped

It’s like I had led Gaia to suicide, it would be something that Milim will never forgive me for even if it was unintentional.

I didn’t really mean it when I said that Gaia can become a real “True Dragon”……

Ehh, it can’t be!?

At the same time that I thought of the possibility, the “Dragon Core” conspicuously glowed and flickered at the center of the tetrahedron.

《You’re aware that a True Dragon won’t really disappear, right?

The same also applies to Zero who had become the insane, destructive “Berserk Evil Dragon”.

He will revive again somewhere in the world and will just try to accomplish his mission as the “Berserk Evil Dragon” that was given to him by Velda.

That’s the reason why Velda created the pseudo “Dragon Core” called『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』.

However, this matter will be different if a new heart arises inside that “Dragon Core”.

If it’s Gaia who has fragments of Dragon Factor, it can be said that he possesses enough qualifications for it.》

As Ciel’s explanation ended, a miracle was happening outside the barrier as if to prove her right.

In short, Gaia became a “True Dragon”.

I was just joking, but for my joke becoming reality is just scary.

As there’s a saying: “Truth comes out of falsehood[10]”, the words I said have really come true.

Gaia got disintegrated instantly, but the heart that held the Will reached the “Dragon Core”.

Then, it seems Gaia has succeeded in taking it over.

In the end, Ciel removed the insanity from it.

All of the raging energy was suppressed and a beautiful blue dragon has manifested.

Excluding me, Gaia can be called as the fifth ‘True Dragon”. After all, I’m not really strictly a “True Dragon”.

Gaia’s body gave off an azure gleam more radiant than a jewel

Unlike Veldora and his siblings, Gaia was shaped more like an oriental dragon.

Is Gaia, Veldora’s younger brother or younger sister?

Whichever Gaia chooses to be, getting a new sibling is a good thing for that guy.

「Kyui~~!!」

Gaia gleefully, raised a happy cry.

It doesn’t seem he can speak yet.

Although he gained wisdom and knowledge fast enough, I guess that is because he was just now born.

「Haha, to think you would really succeed. Well done, Gaia!

Oh right, in this opportunity, I’ll think of a “Nickname” for you as well.」

Veldora was called “Storm Dragon” while Velgrind was “Scorch Dragon”.

If he becomes their younger brother/sister, Gaia should also have an official name.

Okay――

「Alright, I’ve decided it. You’re “Earth Sovereign Dragon[11]” from now on!

As you’re Veldora’s brother, how about calling you as “Earth Sovereign Dragon” Velgaia?」

As he’s glittering, I just named him without hesitation.

That was the moment of the birth of the Fifth Dragon, “Earth Sovereign Dragon” Velgaia.

As the surrounding power storm vanishes,『Absolute Barrier』has disappeared too.

A beautiful dragon was born while the threat was gone.

Diablo, Benimaru Zegion and even Dino and co.

I see everyone flying towards me.

However, since I was deprived of a lot of magic essence because of the naming, it became difficult to maintain my clone’s existence――

(Hey, even this count as naming too……)

《――Obviously…...》

The last thing I heard was Ciel's amazed voice before I confirmed that the connection with the orb had been cut.

You are reading this in Guro’s place.

* * *

[1] 堕天之王(ルシフェル) Daten no Ou (Rushiferu). I’m using Luciel in order to differentiate it with Guy’s. Btw Guy’s Lucifer is using ルシファー Rushifaa. Some stories told that Luciel probably was Lucifer’s true name before his fall. Btw, this like how there’s Lucifer and Lucilius in GBF even though their katakana means the same in English.

[2] 天空之王(ルシフェル) Tenkuu no Ou (Rushiferu).

[3] 絶界Zekkai, Absolute Boundary/Barrier

[4] 天魔双撃覇(フォールンクルセイド) Tenma Sougekiha (Fōrun Kuruseido) = Heaven Demon Supreme Twinstrike.

[5] 四重複合絶技(カルテットスキル) Yonjuu Fukugou Zetsugi (Quartet Skill) = Quadruple Combined Special Move.

[6] 絶撃追憶滅光崩(ブレイクダウンノスタルジア) Zeggeki Tsuioku Metsu Hikari Hou (Bureikudaun Nosutarujia) = Absolute Reminiscence Strike of the Disintegration Light. Uhh whatever with the Kanji xD.

[7] Event horizon is boundary marking the limits of a black hole. At the event horizon, the escape velocity is equal to the speed of light. Since general relativity states that nothing can travel faster than the speed of light, nothing inside the event horizon can ever cross the boundary and escape beyond it, including light. Thus, nothing that enters a black hole can get out or can be observed from outside the event horizon.

[8] Revolving lantern (Soumatou) refer to the flashback phenomenon before death according to Asian superstitions. The flashback is often compiled of key, happy memories that one had experienced within his or her life time.

[9] 虚無結界 Kyomu Kekkai.

[10] Variation is “Many a true word is spoken in jest”

[11] 地帝竜 Chitei Ryuu, Earth Monarch/Emperor Dragon.





Chapter 234: Archangel’s Domination


I could recover relatively easy from the sleep mode this time.

Or rather, it would be more accurate to say that the connection to my clone was cut.

My main body was still hiding in『Imaginary Space』. Even if one of my parallel existences spent too much power, it turned out that there was no effect on the main body.

I guess I could say that we had carried out an unplanned experiment this time.

In truth, the main body wasn't affected only because Ciel had cut off the connection.

She really is a reliable partner.

So, it was normal that I woke up so quickly.

I just have to reconnect with the orb once more.

I was being carried to the control room when I woke up.

It seemed everyone had promptly escaped from the subspace.

I guess that’s expected since there’s no more business there.

Thanks to my energy being deprived by Gaia, my presence was faint.

I figured that it would be fine since I didn't need to worry about Velda noticing me like this.

My main body was recovering energy in『Imaginary Space』.

It felt really weird having two consciousnesses at the same time.

Well, I had to start getting used to it.

After all, it was very convenient.

For argument’s sake, even if Velda had tried to seal the labyrinth when he noticed my presence, I could now grasp Velda’s present position with my real body and『Multiple Parallel Existence』.

Being able to be in two places at once is more convenient than I imagined.

I didn't think I really had to worry about being discovered, but I preferred to avoid trouble as much as possible.

I didn't want to alert Velda of my presence yet, since I wanted to catch him off guard when I took action.

For better or worse, the clone I was possessing through the orb had an energy level close to that of a human, since the majority of its strength hadn’t recovered yet.

I decided to make use of this state and let the connection of the energy with my main body remain blocked.

The clone could also recover its energy naturally, but I also suppressed that.

With this, I can appear in front of everyone without worries.

Gaia was laying on top of my stomach.

He should have grown with an elongated large body about 20m long, but it seems he had reverted to his 50cm long minidora form now. Apparently, he still can’t humanize so he reverted to his previous form.

It was really interesting to see whether he would become a male or a female. However, I figured it would take a while for that to be shown.

It seemed I woke up right when I was about to be laid down on a chair.

I got up from the chair and caressed Gaia.

「Rimuru-sama, you have woken up?」

Noticing my movement, Diablo asks me reverently, I nod and answer him with「Yeah」.

And then, I received the explanation about what happened while I was unconscious.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Several things had occurred after I went to sleep mode.

First off, something happened to Gaia.

When I named him Velgaia, his power stabilized into a “True Dragon” class and he awakened a fearsome ability.

――Inherent Skill『All Creation Embodiment[1]』――

It was a special skill that combined『Arms Creation[2]』and『Material Transformation[3]』 that the demons use.

However, its scale and quality are on a different level.

It is an outrageous ability comparable with Ramiris’『Labyrinth creation』.

After all, it can be said that it has an incredible power that makes Gaia capable of reproducing things from memory.

For example, it seemed that he could recreate 75 floors of the labyrinth that should have been eaten by Zero.

Such a thing was impossible even for Veldora-san, his older brother. Gaia may have surpassed his older brother.

Well, his maximum energy was still no match for the other True Dragons. He was still a child after all. I looked forward to what heights he would reach in the future.

By the way, Gaia’s buddies, our avatars were also amazing.

From the story I heard from Zegion, the avatars, which had switched to auto mode, were wandering around the labyrinth and they even attacked Zegion following their instinct.

Gaia joined, forming a party of five. I guess they were able to defeat Gozurl and Mezurl because their character became very aggressive.

Nevertheless, what were they thinking that make them attacking Zegion?

It didn’t make sense. They weren't foolish enough to ignore the opponent's strength.

Or maybe… Did they attack him because they knew he was a strong opponent?

I don’t think they are that aggressive, but even getting defeated can give you experience.

Maybe they had intentionally sought out the challenge.

The avatars were modeled after our personalities, so it wasn't that surprising.

No matter how you slice it, Milim, Veldora, and Ramiris were a very aggressive bunch.

But I had thought at least I was a pacifist.

「The first attack came from Rimuru-sama’s avatar, the Ghost. Immediately after the smokescreen from the flames there was a strike from the ceiling by the Slime. As I flinched, Gaia increased the gravity and the Skeleton and the Living Armor launched their Rush Attack.

Their coordination was splendid.」

Zegion praised them by saying these words.

I am shocked to hear how hyper my avatar’s personality was.

Or rather, I’m surprised that they became strong enough to earn Zegion’s praise.

Well, it seems it was a difficult fight because Zegion was careful to not destroy our avatars.

Ramiris and the others gleefully said 「Naturally!」. Oh well, it was only Ramiris who was so excited when we were using the avatars, so it might not be surprising if her memory had taken them over.

Because guessing from how Ramiris’ personality is, they probably lost their self-control.

She’s too pitiful for me to throw out a tsukkomi.

Anyway, the fact that they impressed Zegion was praiseworthy enough.

With Gaia restoring the labyrinth, the labyrinth inside returned back to its normal mode.

Everyone who was evacuated prepared to return to their respective floors.

Although the battle zone was desolated, Ramiris could easily restore them.

So much for a so-called invasion. The damage was negligible.

It ended in a total victory for the Labyrinth Defense Team.

But, this wasn’t the end. There were still 600,000 soldiers from the angel army waiting in the sky.

Before I woke up, they had been asking each other ”Who will go to intercept the angels in the sky?”.

Since everyone was so motivated, they couldn't decide who should do the honours.

I was again reminded that Tempest was full of Battle Maniacs.

When I asked Benimaru, he seems to have taken countermeasures for the time being.

As he didn’t know how the interception inside the labyrinth would end up, he had prepared ambush troops.

It seems the plan was to wait for Kumara’s return and then have her and her subordinates who are hiding in the forest to attack together.

But, because things have progressed better than he expected, the remaining hot-blooded people made a fuss.

Their leader was Apito.

She looks unsatisfied because she had been interrupted in the middle of tormenting Dino.

In the end, it was decided that Apito will be the one who would head out.

This was all what they had decided before I woke up.

The meeting continued and the decision was left up to me.

There were a lot of other people who wished to participate too.

Trainee, the dryad, and her sisters who were entrusted with the labyrinth's management, and the hundreds of treants, whom I gave temporary bodies with cultured magic dolls, are eager to fight.

They desired to crush those who had dared invade the labyrinth, their sanctuary.

They had stopped work dealing with adventurers who explored the labyrinth and stayed cooped up in the city, so they were raring to go.

In short, they had too much spare time.

As they were an “A” rank Majin class full of motivation, there was no need to pour cold water onto their burning spirit.

I listened to their complaints and accepted their participation in the counterattack strategy.

By the way, although Ramiris had accepted the matter easily, their most important concern was about repairing their body

There was some hesitation, since they were reluctant to damage the bodies that I had taken such care into making them or the like.

I just told them that I would make them new bodies if they broke it.

Then, I turned to the four dragon kings standing to protect Ramiris.

“We also wanted to rampage, but we had to prioritize protecting Ramiris.” It was written all over their faces.

While I’m smile wryly, I called out them.

「You guys want to go too, right?」

「But, we are……」

「I’ll appoint Zegion to guard Ramiris, there’s Benimaru here too.

Go rampage as you guys want. You guys don’t have many chances to fight seriously after all. You’re fine with that right, Ramiris?」

「It’s fine! You guys should go! But, as my subordinates, I won’t forgive you if you guys lose!」

Ramiris glanced and happily gave her permission to the dragon kings who are looking at her imploringly.

With just that, the the four dragons would join the fray.

In the end, the angel interception force was made up of three groups:―

The Dragon Strike Corps[4] is led by the four dragon kings, the Demonic Beast Corps[5] is led by Empress Kumara and her subordinates, her eight pets[6], and Demon Insect Corps[7] led by Apito and her three generals.

Moreover, the “A” rank dryads and treants would act separately.

Since the Demon Insect Corps was newly formed, their numbers were few.

However, the three demon insect generals, Spider, Mantis, and Butterfly, seem to be strong corps commanders who not only have the ability to regulate command but also possess considerable fighting prowess.

Moreover, these three generals, whom Apito brought forth, produced their own soldiers.

Although, for the time being, their ability only spawned only low-class soldiers ― it was a ruthless unfeeling army, just like the insects they are.

Apito looked pretty emotionless herself, but it would be rude to say it.

Because they are soldiers created from her ability, it compensated their low numbers to some extent.

It was decided that all of the powerful forces from the 70th floor and below will participate in the battle this time.

Come to think of it, this time would be the first sortie for the top corps of the labyrinth army.

They exuded a slightly different ambiance from Adalman’s Immortal Legion.

What they lacked in numbers, they made up for in quality, so I don’t have to worry about them.

The Dragon Strike Corps led by the four dragon kings who possessed dreadnought warship-class range attack capability are also participating.

With that war potential, there was no need to be afraid of the angel army whose commander can’t move flexibly on her own.

I instructed Benimaru to cooperate with them so that the casualties are to be kept minimum as much as possible and decided to leave the rest to them.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

The interception matter had been settled.

Next order of business was about Dino’s group relaxing in the labyrinth.

Dino lay on the couch, drinking tea elegantly.

It was as if he hadn't ever been our enemy moments ago. He just acted as if he were at his own home.

And meanwhile this part of the control room is still in a battle state...

Dino was acting like the battle going on outside wasn't his problem but someone else's.

「Hey. What are you relaxing for?」

Seems like Benimaru finally snapped about Dino who is asking Shuna for his tea refill like it’s normal.

Benimaru endured this pretty well.

He put the matter off since he was busy, but as the personnel selection for the interception was over, he now had the time to tackle the problem (Dino).

「Eh? Well, the fighting is already over, so I’m written as a formidable enemy, read as a friend, right?[8]

Besides, didn’t I already work hard? I also cooperated to defeat Zero.」

Dino declared ostentatiously.

The way he was winking annoyed me a lot.

It wasn't a surprise that that frivolous attitude got to Benimaru, if it even annoyed me.

But, it seems even Benimaru gave up complaining as he considered that Dino was still more or less one of the demon lords.

Meanwhile, the two women besides Dino were devouring the cakes.

「Th-this! It’s so super tasty!? There are three pieces left so I can eat one more, right?」

「Pico, don’t eat in such rush. I shall declare that I will be the one who eat the last piece.」

「Huh? What are you saying? I have the right for it too!」

「……Hey. That remaining piece is mine. You guys don’t have rights to it!」

Dino, who was speaking with Benimaru, went to secure his own share of the cake in panic.

Benimaru sighed.

In the end, a decent conversation couldn’t ensue until Dino and co finished eating their cake.

After a short break, we listened to what Dino and his companions had to say.

According to him, he apparently had received Thought Guidance from Velda.

So, although the way he keeps denying any blame made me angry, he didn't seem to be lying..

I could only doubt my ears when I heard Dino saying “Unlike Yuuki’s, don’t you think it’s possible for him to use『Justice Lord Michael』’s Forced Control with the angel series’ skill as the medium?”.

「Huh? So you are saying that there’s a possibility to be controlled by『Justice Lord Michael』if you possess Ultimate Skill of angel series?」

「I can’t say it for sure, but that’s the only thing I could think of. There’s no way a smart person like me is being deceived, right?」

Dino (The idiot) kept saying whatever he wanted.

I decided to ignore him.

But, could that be possible?『Wisdom Lord Raphael』 and『Covenant Lord Uriel』that I possess are of the angel series after all.

If what Dino’s thinking is correct, wouldn’t I have been in a pinch when Yuuki stole『Justice Lord Michael』in the empire capital?

「That’s, just probably though, if you possess demon series’ skill, you can resist it, I guess?

Although I think you can’t do it unless you completely mastered the skill and are aware of it.」

Hmm, I see.

I guess it does sound coherent if you think about it in that way.

《That’s right. Please bear in mind that since I had deployed Multiple Barrier of『Gluttonous Lord Beelzebuth』 and『Covenant Lord Uriel』, it became possible to defend against any kind of physical or mental attack before it even happens.》(Ciel-sensei)

I see, if that’s the case then I can agree why I never got controlled.

However, although I have prevented it without knowing, I guess it was outside of Yuuki’s calculation.

The reason why a villain like him quickly gave up and retreated was that his trump cards were all crushed……

「If that’s so, then there’s a risk of being controlled for those who possess angel series’ Ultimate Skill.

If I say about those with angel series’ skill…… anyone comes into mind?」

「Dunno. I have lived for a long time, but I never had any interest in what skill other people have……

I only know that Dagruel was simply strong.」

At least, if it’s Guy he might know, but I was foolish expecting Dino to know about it.

I guess Leon would be one of them.

Then, that guy named Kondou who was in the Empire. But, that person has already died.

I guess I don’t have to worry about it, as there are just a few people who possess angel series’ skill in the first place.

After all, I possess 2 of them.

Next…… among the people I know, I think Velgrind has one.

《That reminds me, when we revived Leon, I also had analyzed『Purity Lord Metatron』.

Although I had restrained myself from tampering with it without permission, as expected, it seems to be a mistake……

As there was a route of unknown usage in Velgrind’s『Charity Lord Raguel』, I have removed it when optimizing it. Since I added a mechanism in the blank part, there might be something different according to her free will.

At the very least, I think she won’t fall under『Justice Lord Michael』’s control.》

That’s it.

Ciel reported like it was nothing important, but it might be that part that became the marker for the domination.

As usual, Ciel had splendidly gone and done things as she pleased without my knowledge.

She complains about how selfish I am, but Ciel might not lose in selfishness either.

I wondered who she took after……

《……》

Oops, it would be bad if I say any further.

There’s no doubt that she is the most reliable and capable partner.

If there’s someone else who own angel series’ ability, it would be Veldora-san’s other older sister, the “Ice Dragon” Velzard, I guess?

Don’t tell me Chloe has one too……?

《I assumed the possibility that “Ice Dragon” Velzard has an Ultimate Skill of the angel series.

Moreover, I can’t deny the possibility that Chloe Aubert has one concealed too.》

Hmm……

There’s no use to be worried about things that I don’t understand.

First, I decided to contact Leon and tell him to not go out of the barrier.

Perhaps, Guy had anticipated this development which is why he appointed Mizari to Leon’s side.

If that was the case, it might have been fortunate that Guy was in that place together with Chloe, Velzard and also Velgrind.

It was Guy. He would manage it somehow.

Guy was far more capable and reliable than this unreliable lazy bum in front of me.

No, no, it would be rude to compare him with Dino.

…...Although he was unwilling at first, Veldora-san was now headed to that place too.

I felt he was quite unreliable when it came to dealing with his sisters, but he would manage it somehow or another.

At least, I hoped so.

As for me, I just wanted to beat Velda immediately.

I have acquired『Multiple Parallel Existence[9]』through a lot of efforts, but I wanted to avoid dividing my power.

Or rather, since there’s just one energy generator[10], the recovery rate will not get faster even if I divided myself.

The clones all have the same power level, so they would turn out useful if I used them correctly.

Things will work out somehow once I defeated Velda, so I decided to believe in Guy and Veldora-san who are in the northern land.

* * *

[1] 万物具現 Banbutsu Gugen, All things/All Creation Embodiment/Incarnation/Avatar/Personification.

[2] 武具創造 Bugu Souzou, Arms/Armor Creation.

[3] 物質変換 Busshitsu Henkan, Material/Substance Transformation/Conversion.

[4] 竜撃軍団 Ryuugeki Gundan, Dragon Attack/Strike/Assault Corps.

[5] 妖獣軍団 Yōjuu Gundan, Supernatural/Demonic Beast Corps.

[6] The eight beast named by Rimuru (Byakuen the White Ape, Coccus the Black Rat, Raiko the Thunder Tiger, Getto the Moon Rabbit, Youda the Winged Snake, Mink the Drowsy Sheep, Enchou the Flame Bird, and Igami the Mirror Dog). Btw, the kanji is八部衆 Hachii Bushuu which means the eight legions in Buddhism, in chapter 157, the furigana was ペット (petto).

[7] 魔蟲軍団 Mamushi Gundan, Demon Insect Corps.

[8] Does Dino just break the 4th wall? Kek.

[9] 多重並列存在 Tajuu Heiretsu Sonzai.

[10] エネルギー炉 Enerugii Ro. Energy Hearthe/Kiln/Reactor/Generator. A single source which produces/recovers energy.





Chapter 235: In the Northern Land –First Part-


As Velgrind confronted Velzard, she observed the latter’s beautiful appearance.

Radiant scales whiter than pearls covered her whole body, giving off a sheen that enthralled all who saw her body.

“Ice Dragon” Velzard, was undoubtedly the figure of the strongest dragon.

However, right now, her usual blue diamond eyes that were filled with gentleness were dyed by anger like the raging seas and let off a deep-crimson glow.

Looking at those eyes, Velgrind suddenly wondered.

――Why her older sister, Velzard, is recognizing Velda as the same person as their older brother, “Stellar Lord Dragon” Veldanava?――

At the very least, it was difficult to imagine that Velzard who had strong willpower equal to or higher than Velgrind has received some kind of mind control.

And above all else, Velzard’s specialty was specializing in all kind of defenses.

Additionally, Velzard owned Ultimate Skill『Patience Lord Gabriel』.

The ultimate defense specialization ability created from Velzard’s iron will.

Combining her original nature and her defense aspect, there was no doubt that Velzard had the strongest ability.

And, what proved this was Velzard’s unshakeable iron will.

『Patience Lord Gabriel』 was born out of her strong heart that is unfazed by anything.

That meant she had calm observing eyes that won’t be deceived by anything and an immovable mind.

It was unthinkable for Velzard to have mistaken her own older brother.

Certainly, there was no doubt that Velda had Veldanava’s memories,

But Velgrind thought that this didn’t prove that her older brother and Velda was the same person.

Did Velzard think otherwise? However――

In her long life, Velgrind had rarely seen Velzard revealing her emotions.

But right now ――

She was beside herself with rage and went mad with jealousy……

Her appearance now was far too different from the normal Velzard.

Velgrind felt a sense of incongruity from that appearance.

Moreover, there was something strange about her words to Rudra.

The words Velzard had spat out 「He’s just a human, after all」, seemed to lack of sentiments towards an old acquaintance.

Right, as if all of her emotions had been squeezed out by negative emotions such as jealousy and anger――

(As expected, I can't think of anything but that Nee-san is being controlled.)

Velgrind concluded so.

If that was the case, she declared that it was necessary to make Velzard come to her senses.

But, Velgrind, more than anyone else, knew that it wouldn’t be easy.

Certainly, if it was Velgrind, she could fight Velzard evenly.

However, that was if it was only a kind of quarrel between siblings.

If both of them fought seriously with the intention to kill, Velgrind would 100% lose to Velzard.

Possessing the highest energy after Veldanava and the ultimate defense. That was Velzard.

Although one might say that Velgrind specialized in offensive, she couldn’t breakthrough Velzard’s defense.

Similarly, Velzard’s offensive power couldn’t inflict a fatal blow on Velgrind.

It was the reason why it could be perceived as equal by the surroundings, but the circumstances were actually different.

Burning Breath[1] that Velgrind breathed out, which was a simultaneous multi-attack, was dispersed by Diamond Dust[2] blowing from Velzard, only to bloom as large fire flowers in the air.

However, Freezing Breath[3] that Velzard breathed out was evaporated by Cardinal Rain[4] that blooming around Velgrind.

Both of them didn’t receive damage, but the aftermath of the attacks would deal a big effect on the ice-bound world.

And so, even a fight between the two that appeared equal, gradually showed whose superior and inferior……

“This is odd” So, Velgrind was the one who realized it.

Normally, in case of an all-out battle like this, Velgrind should have lost due to the difference in maximum energy.

It was something that won’t get noticed unless both of them used all of their power, but there’s a clear difference in energy consumption between them.

――No, there was.

If it was Velgrind from before, her power should have gradually weakened due to the difference in their energy recovery rate.

However, right now, it was quite strange that her body was in great shape.

Her prided ability, Ultimate Skill『Charity Lord Raguel』 was also handling energy more efficiently unlike before.

It had reacted to Velgrind’s will and responded to her feelings without causing any momentary error.

「Fufu, you’ve improved, Velgrind.」

「I still have a long ways to go, Nee-san.」

Velgrind responded lightly to a fairly surprised Velzard’s words.

In fact, Velgrind was still had more energy to spare.

There could only be one reason that caused this...

Yes.

This must be the deed of that bad friend[5] of her brother, Veldora, that questionable slime named Rimuru.

Even Velgrind’s strongest technique, “Cardinal Acceleration” didn’t work on him; he even had evolved into a “True Dragon” that is equal to them, becoming an abnormal existence.

He surpassed Velgrind easily, an unthinkable Absolute Being[6].

Velgrind thought that even if he had Dragon Factor, she couldn’t acknowledge such a suspicious person as her own younger brother.

But, he was her benefactor who listened to her request and freed Rudra.

And above all, that slime was the one who manifested Velgrind and she certainly had pledged her cooperation to him.

If that was so, there was no need to hesitate at all.

The only thing that bound her down right now was her troubled heart.

‘Who is Rudra’s enemy?’

‘Who is Velda?’

She didn’t care about such things.

The important thing was she didn’t like Velda, only that.

He had swindled the name of her beloved older brother and manipulated her only older sister.

She would never forgive a person like that.

If there was someone who tried to tie them down, who were originally free beings, it would be their right to declare that person as their enemy.

At the very least, Demon Lord Rimuru didn’t bind Velgrind down.

Then, as long as he was worthy of her trust, Velgrind wouldn’t break her promise with Demon Lord Rimuru.

Velgrind thought it was impossible for her to win due to the difference of the absolute value of energy.

However, that thought was wrong.

Because she had been eaten by Demon Lord Rimuru, Velgrind had been reborn stronger than how she was before.

「Well, I’ll make you at ease soon, Nee-san.」

「Don’t get conceited, Velgrind. I’m also busy, let’s us finish this farce quickly.」

Their gazes interlocked.

And then, both of them let their violent energy escalate and their clash grew even more intense.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Guy and Chloe continued their fight with just their swords.

They weren’t serious against each other.

However, it was a high-level fight at a level that couldn’t be recognized by others.

As if he was having fun, Guy had his attention focused on the clash between the dragon sisters in the air instead of his own fight.

Therefore, he was the first person who noticed it.

An angel of light had come to visit them from the sky.

「That is……」

Guy muttered softly.

However, everything was already too late.

Guy had certainly seen that angel smile.

「Hey! You two, here――」

Before Guy’s warning reached them, a spherical space barrier[7] had appeared on the northern land.

And then, a beautiful woman’s voice echoed.

「Ultimate Dominion[8]!!」

Guy predicted everything instantly.

Everyone in this area except Guy had been affected by the ability just now.

However, it was a rare event for Guy, as his comprehension would be wrong.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Lucia let out a loud laughter.

Everything was as Velda expected.

No, it was beyond his expectations; the best possible situation was in place.

As much as to say that for this moment, she had revised the plan numerous times while preparing for this situation.

It was convenient now that Chloe wasn’t being controlled smoothly.

In any case, the body of the strongest Hero would become one with Lucia, who was Velda’s right hand.

And then, she would obtain the two “True Dragon”.

She would put them under her complete control with the angel series’ Ultimate Skill as the medium.

It was one of the hidden ability of Ultimate Skill『Justice Lord Michael』.

In this northern land, the strongest beings would have their final showdown.

Velgrind who was worried about her sister, Velzard would surely make an appearance there too.

That was Velda’s prediction.

For some reason『Thought Transmission』 didn’t reach Velgrind, but it was impossible for her to resist it if the ability was used directly.

This was Velda’s plan, he who had extensive knowledge about the principles behind the abilities.

While forcing Guy to stay put, she was going to put Velzard and Velgrind under her rule completely.

Next was the awakened Hero, Chloe Aubert.

Even if she was called the strongest Hero, she was just a human in the end.

As she had served her purpose in this stage, she was such an insignificant being that it wouldn’t become a problem even if she was to be disposed of.

―― However, it was a different story if she owned Ultimate Skill『Hope Lord Sariel』.

Now, such a thing as Chloe’s life and death was nothing but a trivial matter.

But, if she was looking for a prime body to incarnate into, there was no other body as wonderful as Chloe’s.

Strong and beautiful.

She had reached the realm of god with a mortal body.

Indeed, it could be said as a new body suitable to be obtained by Lucia in this world.

Unlike Lucia’s corpse that was given to her by Velda, her god, Chloe’s body was specialized in combat.

What made that possible was thanks to the new ability granted to her by Velda――『Multiple Existence』.

Lucia’s ability was ill-suited for splitting her energy using『Multiple Existence』. After all, she existed because Lucia’s body was used as the vessel of her real main body.[9]

More than anything, the body which was the vessel of her spirit didn’t possess the capability to create multiple clones.

This didn’t mean that Lucia was inferior; it just means that Rimuru who could create them freely was abnormal.

Anyway, even Veldora and Velgrind had their physical bodies created by Rimuru’s ability.

As Lucia couldn’t duplicate the body freely, 『Multiple Existence』was like casting pearls before swine.

However, if she had prepared a new vessel, she only had to project her consciousness into it.

Lucia’s body was exclusively for commanding, she only had to let the body wait upon Velda’s side in the sky castle in order to not get the body injured.

And, as a spiritual life-form, she would only transfer her consciousness and energy into Chloe’s body by using『Multiple Existence』.

The fact that Chloe was in this situation was proof of Velda’s commandment.

As Chloe had not been controlled completely even by Yuuki’s control skill, she had given them quite of trouble, and Lucia didn’t even notice that Chloe had acquired Ultimate Skill『Hope Lord Sariel』.

Chloe wasn’t the type that would let her guard down; she would hide that ability until she was being cornered into a wall which was annoying, so Lucia thought.

After all, she possessed Unique Skill『Absolute Severance』and『Infinite Prison』 which was too strong for a human like her.

But, this time, she was forced to use that hidden ability under Velzard’s serious assaults.

Consequently, it was fortunate that this proved that Chloe possessed an angel series’ ability as well.

Originally, the plan was to kill Guy for sure.

And also include Chloe’s disposal.

Against Guy who wouldn’t let his guard down, Velzard and Chloe would be at a disadvantage even if they were together.

Not to mention, in the worst case that Guy won, he would get stronger.

To prevent an outcome like that, Lucia sought a certain victory.

Prolonging the fight by making it a 3-way fight. So, she ordered Velzard.

In order to strengthen Ultimate Dominion, her plan was to deploy Space type magic circles that prevent escape at the same time as Velgrind appeared.

And so, the strategy succeeded splendidly, the domination was completed just a while ago.

For the Hero Chloe to be dominated too was just an extra.

No matter how strong Guy was, he wouldn’t be able to win with the two dragon sisters as his opponents.

Meanwhile, Lucia would steal Chloe’s body and deal the finishing blow on Guy.

It was the best timing for Lucia who hadn’t got incarnated yet.

The plan was altered and became more perfect than before.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

In the place that was a hall, there were the “True Dragon” sisters who returned to their human forms.

As Velzard changed back to her human form, Velgrind also did the same.

Beyond Velzard’s gaze were Guy and Chloe fighting――

No―― beyond them was a beautiful angel flying down from the sky.

She must be the owner of the lovely voice that echoed just after the place was enveloped by the barrier.

A user of that curse, no it should be called as True Word, the absolute order language.

And so that angel opened her mouth as she landed on the ground.

「Control yourselves, I’m Velda-sama’s right hand, the “Archangel of the End[10]” Lucia.」

She introduced herself solemnly, emanating intimidation.

Velzard heard those words and bowed to Lucia as to show her respect.

Velgrind felt it was unpleasant.

However, she couldn’t understand, Velgrind followed after her too even though she felt it was unpleasant.

「I knew it, it’s you! Those words force an absolute control over those with angel series’ ability, don’t they?」

「Hah, as expected of you, Guy Crimson. The only person Velda-sama was cautious of. However, it’s already too late even if you know about it. What you can do now is only await your death obediently.」

「Shut up! An insect like you shouldn’t speak so arrogantly!」

Guy shouted as he swung his sword at Lucia.

But, his sword was easily repelled by the barrier that appeared around Lucia.

Lucia smiled as if sneering at Guy and continued her steps towards Chloe.

Hearing Guy’s words, Velgrind could also understand the situation.

What was happening to her body right now.

And, what had happened to her sister body too.

(Unforgivable. I will never forgive you, Velda!)

Due to fury and humiliation, Velgrind was burning with violent emotions to the extent of being dizzy.

At the same time, she thought.

“At this rate, everything will be as Velda’s expected.”

Velgrind couldn’t defy the order,

Even if Guy was cunning and was the strongest being, there was no chance for him to win fighting against both Velzard and Velgrind at the same time.

Lucia seemed to be convinced of her victory as she ignored Guy’s attacks as if to say to Guy to do as he likes as she approached Chloe.

「Chloe Aubert, accept me.」

Leaving those words, the spirit of『Multiple Existence』separated from Lucia and was sucked into Chloe.

「Tch!」

As if he was flustered, Guy attacked both Chloe/Lucia, but everything was already too late.

A barrier created by Lucia’s ability appeared before Chloe.

It meant that Lucia had succeeded her incarnation and fused completely with Chloe.

Whether he understood that or not, for the first time Guy caught a glimpse of his impatience.

Lucia was assured of her victory and smiled.

And then, her main body which finished transferring fragments of her energy and consciousness into Chloe, transferred back to the heaven.

Along with the confidence of her victory.

The Hero’s power and Lucia’s energy.

Right now, a flawless entity was about to be born.

Velgrind could feel despair spreading across the place.

However, at that moment, a voice echoed in the place.

「Kuaaaahahahaha! I… HAVE ARRIVED![11]」

A carefree laughter ruined the atmosphere.

That voice was filled with hope and blown away even despair.

-------

Author Note:

What is the true identity of that mysterious laughter!?

(ED: Oh yeah…… I wonder who it is…)

* * *

[1] 灼熱吐息(バーニングブレス) Shakunetsu Toiki (Baaningu Buresu), Scorching Breath.

[2] 美しき細氷(ダイヤモンドダスト) Utsukushiki Saihyou (Daiyamondo Dasuto). Beautiful Ice Crystals/Diamond Dust.

[3] 氷結吐息(フリージングブレス) Hyouketsu Toiki (Furiijingu Buresu), Freeing Breath.

[4] 華麗なる紅雨(カーディナルレイン) Kareinaru Akame (Kaadinaru Rein), Brilliant Red Rain.

[5] ED: Rimuru got Veldora to clean up his act a lot, how is that a bad friend?

Guro: She thinks Rimuru is a friend that give bad influence to Veldora xD

[6] 絶対者 Zettaisha.

[7] 真球の空間型結界 Shinkyuu no Kuukan Gata Kekkai, True Sphere-shaped Space type Barrier.

[8] 天使長の支配(アルティメットドミニオン) Tenshichou no Shihai (Arutimetto Dominion) Archangel’s Control/Domination/Rule. The Kanji is the same as the title of chapter 234. Btw Regalia Dominion is when Michael was in Rudra's hand

[9] This is what happen when two characters have the same name XD

[10] 終末の天使長 Shuumatsu no Tenshichou.

[11] Kamen Rider Den-O’s reference. Momotaros’ catchphrase every time he possesses the MC. Ore, Sanjou! (It’s Ware here cause Veldora call himself with ware)

ED: Anyone else imagine this in ALL Might's voice (Hero Academia)





Chapter 236: In the Northern Land -Middle Part-


A cheerful laughter echoed inside the hall.

When she heard it, Velgrind regained her composure.

She didn’t feel anxious anymore about her body being controlled and not moving as she wanted it.

A bigger problem than that was that her foolish younger brother, Veldora, could see her current pathetic figure that was being controlled by someone―― So Velgrind thought.

That was unpleasant...

Very unpleasant.

For her disgraceful figure to been seen by him not just once, but twice, Velgrind thought this would greatly hurt her dignity as an older sister.

(That fool, it seems he thinks I was being controlled and get carried away……)

She felt anger boiling up inside her when she heard his loud laughter.

When Velgrind calmed down, she inspected her body carefully once more.

As before, her body didn’t respond to her own will. However, when she investigated the cause, she noticed that some kind of meddling was done through the Ultimate Skill engraved deep inside her heart[1].

Is this the reason――?

A fragile corridor connected to Ultimate Skill『Justice Lord Michael』was constructed with Ultimate Skill『Charity Lord Raguel』as the axis.

Velgrind realized that the “Ultimate Dominion” Lucia had declared was done via this corridor.

And, that meant the control circuits were inside the Ultimate Skill itself from the very beginning……

(In other words, this was the mechanism that older brother created for emergency control, something like that――）

Velgrind found out the true nature of the mechanism that manipulated Velzard and herself in this event.

If her older brother was the one who built the mechanism that meant it would be near impossible to cancel it.

Although her despair had disappeared with Veldora’s appearance, the situation was still bad.

She wanted to click her tongue bitterly, but her body wouldn’t do as it was told.

(Well, what should I do now?)

At the moment Velgrind thought so, a mysterious voice echoed deep inside her.

――《If you desire it, I shall grant you even more power》――

So, the mysterious voice whispered to her.

It wasn’t something simple like an auditory hallucination; a clear and strong will could be sensed from the voice.

It sounded similar to “Voice of the World”, but a bit soft and refined gentleness could be felt from it.

The problem was the meaning behind its words.

(Even more power, you said? If I obtained it, can I overcome this situation?)

――《It’s possible, so I assure you》――

(I see, it’s possible. Then, there’s no need to hesitate!)

Velgrind consented without any hesitation.

Yes.

For Velgrind, if she could break through this situation――a situation that exposed her unsightly appearance to her foolish younger brother, Veldora―― She wouldn’t hesitate even if she had to shake hands with the devil.

――《I have confirmed Velgrind’s will. “Alteration[2]” will be activated》――

That “Voice” announced.

At that moment, Velgrind felt surges of incredible power.

It was emanating from deep inside her and gently enveloped her whole body.

《Notification. Individual: “Scorch Dragon” Velgrind’s Ultimate Skill『Charity Lord Raguel』has evolved into Ultimate Skill『Flame God Sovereign Cthugha[3]』.》

Along with fantastic and majestic sounds, “Voice of the World” loudly announced.

However, that voice could only be heard by Velgrind. Since a complete concealment was done.

And now, Velgrind had been liberated from any constraints.

Velgrind’s thought halted at the unbelievable occurrence that had occurred to her own body.

As the amount of information was too much and too abnormal, Velgrind, who wasn’t the thinking type, couldn’t suppress her confusion.

But, she didn’t care about that sort of thing.

Right now, the most important thing than anything else was……

There was only one person that came into her mind that could make this phenomenon possible to occur in her body.

That aloof slime.

Veldora’s close friend named Demon Lord Rimuru.

(It can’t be……! Could it be that slime…… he had fiddled with the control circuit inside the Ultimate Skill and made it possible to evolve it by incorporating my will and ability to the unnecessary space!? That’s not on a level of optimization anymore!! Such an absurd thing is a technique that only Velda can do―― If there’s another being who can do it then……)

Velgrind shuddered as she imagined such an impossibility.

She nearly fell into a thought loop of amazement, but she recalled that it wasn’t the time for it right now, her consciousness returned to the reality.

Lucia looked at Velgrind suspiciously, but there was nothing serious to be worried about.

As for Velgrind right now, she could only see the likes of Lucia as an unimportant weakling.

Velgrind’s ability had been improved to a terrifying level for her to be able to think so.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Fufufu, Fuhahahaha!

I was made to go to the place where my two older sisters were, for a moment I thought about what will happen, but it seems the God has not forsaken me!

Veldora thought so and felt relief from the bottom of his heart.

Her two older sisters were being controlled.

They couldn’t move with their own will as they were under the control of that angel named Lucia.

Taking the advantage of this chance, Veldora would come to their rescue in style. By doing so, her two older sisters would feel grateful to Veldora.

And then, they would repent for their oppressions against him until now and apologize to him.

That was the scenario that Veldora imagined.

(I came to this place reluctantly, but I didn’t expect that I will stumble across a chance like this…… I must give Rimuru my thanks――)

While thanking his good fortune and his friend’s order, Veldora opened his mouth again.

「Hey Guy, you seem to be struggling. But, rest assured. With me here, there is no need to worry anymore!」

「It’s you, Veldora. Honestly, I’m grateful. Even for me, it’s impossible to release them from the control while fighting them. I understood the principles behind the ability, but its deactivation would be troublesome.」

「Oh? I expected no less from you. Then, as long as their movement is stopped without killing them, it’s possible to release them from the control, right?」

「Yes. We could do something if we put all our power into thinking. But, in addition to your sisters, there’s that strongest Hero. Anyway, we need to disable these three people in front, you know? I think I might have been killed if you didn’t come.」

「Kuaaaahahahahaha! If that’s the case, you should be grateful to me!」

Veldora got even cockier than before.

Guy had an astounded face, but he said nothing.

As he just said, he thought that fighting those three people would be hard even if Veldora was here.

Killing them aside, the degree of difficulty jumped severely for disabling them.

Rather, Guy thought he wanted to hear the reason why Veldora could be so optimistic.

「Kukuku, well then, Guy. You could have the Hero as your opponent. I shall quickly show my older sister some of my improvements!」

When Veldora stopped laughing, he stepped forward with a fearless expression.

He walked towards Velgrind without hesitation.

「Velgrind. Kill that fool.」

Lucia ordered Velgrind as she coldly gazed at Veldora.

And then――

Baaーーーーーng!!

A huge sound echoed inside the hall.

Veldora was staring blankly. His cheek was swollen red for some reason.

Veldora had his eyes blinking incessantly, thinking about what just happened.

(Eh? It looks like Aneue moved by her own will just now…… there was no murderous intent at all, but I felt a strong will to torment me though!?)

Agitation ran through Veldora’s heart.

(It, it can’t be!? That’s impossible!!)

In front of the reality that he didn’t want to acknowledge, a bead of sweat trickled down Veldora’s forehead.[4]

「Hey, Veldora. Just now, did I hear you say you were going to show me something?? Or did I misheard it?」

Velgrind walked quietly to Veldora with a gentle smile on her beautiful face.

However, Veldora knew that she was never a gentle person and that she was the embodiment of this world’s terror.

「Ah, hauah……!?」

「It wasn’t “hauah”, you damn fool!!」

Velgrind’s fists approached him.

Veldora’s train of thought stopped operating as if they were paralyzed, it was impossible for him to take an evasive action.

Alas, the memories of fear etched in his instinct from his childhood interfered with Veldora’s action.

An awfully heavy and painful, but damage-less attack hit Veldora.

It didn’t take much time for Veldora’s eyes became teary.

「Kuh…… Isn’t this strange! How could Aneue move? Weren’t you being controlled!?」

「Shut up! Did you think that I’ll fall for the same trick over and over again? Did you underestimate me? Hey, Veldora?」

「N-no……I didn’t mean it that way……」

While trembling, Veldora realized that there was nothing he could do except to wait for his older sister’s anger to subside.

What is really absurd was that the damage jumped over『Parallel Existence』and reached Veldora’s main body.

The reason for that was……

「Hmm, this is sure convenient. I see it’s something called『Space-Time Continuous Strike[5]』. Whether it’s『Parallel Existence』or『Multiple Existence』, it seems I can deal an attack beyond the space-time with this.」[6]

Velgrind nodded pleasingly.

Veldora who heard it started to look pale.

Velgrind’s words meant that his method of escaping by sacrificing one of his clones as the scapegoat was no longer usable.

『Parallel Existence』 had given him an absolute advantage, but now it had fallen to a meaningless ability.

Indeed, it was the birth of the natural enemy of Veldora.

(Woahhhhhhh, what have you done, Rimuru!!)

Veldora screamed in his mind.

He couldn’t think of anyone else other than his close friend, Rimuru, who would give such unnecessary help like that for his older sister, Velgrind.

Velgrind seemed to be satisfied after hitting Veldora for some time and turned her face towards Velzard.

And, towards Veldora who was grumbling「It was supposed to be the best scene though…… isn’t this different from the promise……」, Velgrind said.

「Silence, how unsightly. If you are my younger brother, don’t expose more of your foolishness. Veldora, I will leave the Hero to you. She’s your friend’s important person, right? Make sure you don’t fail foolishly. I’ll be Aneue’s opponent.」

「But……」

「How tedious! Are you going to make me say it twice?」

「Understood, Aneue!」

Veldora understood Velgrind’s words and bowed respectfully.

It would be a foolish thing for him to go against his older sister.

While rubbing his beaten cheeks, Veldora went towards Lucia who had possessed the Hero Chloe.

Looking at Veldora, Velgrind turned around to say something to Guy.

「Guy, if it’s you, you can annul the control over Aneue right?」

「Yeah, it’s possible. However, I can’t do it while fighting.」

「No problem. I have my stupid younger brother to deal with the Hero Chloe. I want you do your best in releasing Aneue from their control.」

Receiving Velgrind’s request, Guy pondered for a bit.

Canceling it might be possible. After all, he had seen the control activation happen before his eyes, so he could understand the principles behind it.

The problem was the time required for it.

「Listen, the cancellation would take quite some time with how I’m right now. Because I need to do a specialized calculation to cancel it, don’t expect me for help during that time, okay? By the way, my fighting strength would decrease greatly. If you guys lost, it would be our defeat. Even so, you don’t mind right?」

「No. Hurry up and start it.」

Guy decided to believe in both of them after he received Velgrind’s approval.

He wouldn’t disappear even if he got defeated, and in the worst case, he would get revived after several hundred years.

A defeat wouldn’t be interesting for Guy who was the strongest, but it wasn’t something that he should avoid either.

He thought that if it could distract him from his boredom, he had no regret even if it became so.

「All right. It’s pretty annoying for my Velzard[7] to be controlled forever, I guess I shall release her from it quickly.」

Saying so, Guy started the Ritual of Status Alteration[8], which he hadn’t done in a long time.

Velgrind and Velzard faced each other.

And Veldora walked towards the Hero Chloe―― in other words, Lucia.

It appeared that everyone was confirming their respective opponent.

Lucia didn’t panic even when she saw it.

No, she thought that there was no need to panic.

She acknowledged Veldora’s strength.

Since he had defeated Dagruel too, his strength was the real deal.

But, for Lucia――

「O Velzard, go kill Velgrind.」

She gave a brief order.

However, she wasn’t calm on the inside due to one problem.

It was certain that the control circuits to Velgrind had been severed.

She couldn’t think of the cause. Since the control circuits prepared by Velda were impossible to sever unless it was by the controller.

The only possible cause she could think of was the loss of the Angel series’ ability either due to an evolution of the ability or degeneration.

“Could such a phenomenon conveniently occur in a situation like this?” Was a question that popped up in her head.

But, Lucia stopped thinking too deeply about it.

She had an interest in the sample, but she decided that she would think about it later.

Although she had raised a question, it didn’t affect her fighting forces.

She had the strongest “True Dragon” Velzard under her control.

And Lucia herself had become the strongest being too.

At the same time Lucia gave an order to Velzard, she drew the katana that Chloe held.

The body moved naturally, an untold swordsmanship could be seen.

Lucia had assumed that Chloe’s ability had completely become her own and was convinced of her victory.

Right now, Lucia’s main body was protected by『Castle Guard』, but she could go on the offensive because she had possessed the『Hero Chloe[9]』.

In other words, her main body wouldn’t be defeated no matter what happened so her defeat was impossible.

There were no attacks that could work on her.

Velgrind’s azure hair spread out and was waving like flames.

At the same time, Velzard’s pure white hair also curled up like a blizzard.

Both of them moved simultaneously, a large-scale shockwave like a nuclear strike was created as both of them shifted into an all-out fight.

Velgrind’s crimson fist howled as it clashed with Velzard’s『Snow Crystal[10]』and broke it.

Its fragments became diamond dust and rained down over Velgrind.

However, before Velgrind who had become the incarnation of the flame god, ice type attacks had no meaning.

The rank between their ability was different.

With her strength increased remarkably, Velgrind approached Velzard.

Since she had left the cancellation of the control to Guy, she only had to earn more time for him.

Velgrind challenged Velzard as to test her enhanced ability.

Veldora took a stance towards Chloe.

And then he thought.

“Why am I barehanded?

Chloe had a katana, but why I’m barehanded like this?” So he thought something like that, but if he said it right now, it would surely incur her older sister’s wrath.

Clearly, Veldora knew that Chloe’s swordsmanship was the best of the best, there was no one who could rival her.

He had experienced it once; he thought that he was at a disadvantage for being unarmed.

At that time, he could nullify Chloe’s『Absolute Severance』because he had the advantage of being a spiritual life-form and both of them didn’t possess Ultimate Skill, but he couldn’t nullify the current Chloe’s sword techniques.

After all, Chloe was fighting evenly against Guy until a while ago.

This is very bad―― So Veldora thought.

Well, his troubles were only on the level of “It seems to be painful if I get cut” though……

At that moment, a sword pierced the ground in front of Veldora.

It was one of the best swords in this world, the demonic sword “World”.

「Hey, use that.」

When Veldora turned around, there was a fiercely beautiful woman beyond his eyes.

Her scarlet hair flowed down divinely, the presence of her abundant breasts and round buttocks were emphasized by her slender waist that looked like it could break easily.

It was Guy who had transformed into his female form.

「Guy, is that you?」

「Ah? Who else do you think is here? It’s me of course.[11]」

Guy annoyedly replied to Veldora’s question.

Guy had no fixation over the difference between genders, he didn’t care about appearance.

Ability was more important than appearance.

Different from his male form which was specialized for combat, his female form was specialized in processing information.

Guy thought that it was necessary to raise his information processing power to the maximum in order to cancel the control circuits that had been created by Veldanava.

Therefore, he had transformed into his female form after a long time.

That was all.

「Then, I shall use it」

「Oh. Don’t lose, okay?」

「Kuaaahahahaha! What a foolish question! I had thought that I wanted to fight with the Hero who got serious once again. This is a good chance for it, I shall fight her seriously too!」

While saying those words, Veldora regained his confidence with Guy reply of「Well, good luck.」.

He thought that talking to him would be a waste of time.

Guy switched his consciousness and put Velzard into his sight.

And――

(Just you wait. I’ll release you from it right away.)

Guy concentrated deeply and calmly which sharpened his ability.

Guy’s『Godspeed Calculation[12]』 raised his normally high processing power to an excited state[13].

Guy diverted all of his energy to the calculation without any hesitation and began the『Spiritual Dive[14]』towards Velzard.

* * *

[1] 心核(ココロ) Kokoro/Shin Kaku (Kokoro), Spirit/Heart Core.

[2] 能力改変(オルタレーション) Nouryoku Kaihen (Orutareishon), Ability Modification.

[3] 炎神之王(クトゥグア) Honookami/Enjin no Ou. Blaze/Flame God/Deity Sovereign/Ruler, Cthugha. Cthugha, The Living Flame or The Burning One, is a Great Old One, an elemental spirit of fire opposed to the Elder Gods featured in the H.P. Lovecraft-inspired Cthulhu Mythos.

[4] ED Note: I feel this is the funniest Veldora moment so far. I almost feel sorry for him...almost

[5] 時空連続攻撃 Jikuu Renzoku Kougeki.

[6] ED: So she can bitch-slap across space and time I see. Poor Veldora...

[7] 信頼する相棒(ヴェルザード) Shinraisuru Aibou (Vueruzaado), written Trusted Partner, read as Velzard.

[8] 状態変化の儀式 Joutaihenka no Gishiki, Ritual of State Change/Phase Transformation/Condition Alteration.

[9] 同一体(勇者クロエ) Douittai (Yuusha Kuroe), Written as one body, read as Hero Chloe.

[10] 雪結晶盾(スノークリスタル) Yuki Kesshou Tate (Sunou Kurisutaru), Snow Crystal Shield.

[11] Guy still using Ore here.

[12] 神速演算 Shinsoku Enzan. Enzan is a term for mathematical operations/calculation. Maybe Algorithm?

[13] 励起状態 Reikijoutai. Excited State in quantum mechanics refers to the state of a system that has a higher energy than its ground state (it has higher energy level than normally it has). As in this case, his processing power is over the roof.

[14] 攻性心核浸食(スピリチュアルダイブ) Kousei Shin Kaku Shinshoku, (Supirichuaru Daibu). Aggressive Heart Core Erosion.





Chapter 237: In the Northern Land -Last Part-


Velzard couldn’t hide her surprise and confusion as she saw Velgrind who had grown stronger unexpectedly.

She felt happy for her younger sister’s growth and also rage as she was someone who was obstructing her path.

Now Velzard could only acknowledge that Velgrind was an unavoidable hindrance for her to kill Guy.

(Fine, Velgrind, I shall acknowledge you as my enemy.)

Once Velzard acknowledged Velgrind, she decided to activate her hidden Ultimate Skill『Envious Lord Leviathan』.

However, that was an improbable decision for Velzard’s normal train of thought..

If she ended up showing her hidden ability as her trump card against Demon Lord Guy Crimson to Velgrind, it would lose its meaning as a trump card.

Velzard who should be calm didn’t even realize such a simple thing.

No, she couldn’t realize it. The order to kill was the only thing left in her mind because of Ultimate Dominion.

For Velzard to still be able to retain her ego was proof that she had a strong spirit.

However, even with such a strong spirit―― Velzard couldn’t defy the order of Ultimate Dominion.

After a momentary hesitation, Velzard unleashed blades of envy towards Velgrind.

　　◆◆◆

Velgrind had realized quickly that she could fight her older sister Velzard on more than equal terms thanks to『Flame God Sovereign Cthugha』‘s peerless ability which had evolved to overcome the control over herself.

After all, since she lost in terms of energy, if she just had an equal ability like before, it was clear her defeat was a matter of time.

Even now she was still inferior in energy levels, but she could fight her sister equally in terms of energy efficiency. It was a very surprising evolution.

And even about the energy――

(What is this connection―― “Soul Corridor”? As long as I wish for it, an unknown energy will flow into me……)

Yes, through the “Soul Corridor” that had been constructed between her and Rimuru, it was possible for her to replenish her energy.

Actually, Velgrind had lost the majority of her magic essence in “Alteration” into 『Flame God Sovereign Cthugha』and its Ignition[1], but right after that, energy flowed into her from the “Soul Corridor”, so her energy was almost completely recovered.

She didn’t think that she could lose,

“I feel I won’t lose”, that was Velgrind’s honest thoughts.

However, at that moment, Velgrind noticed that her older sister’s expression changed.

(Is it coming!?)

Velgrind put herself on guard.

It seems her intuition was right. Velzard’s trump card was activated and sent towards Velgrind.

「Whiteout Absorb[2]!!」

A strike filled with everything Velzard has got.

It was Velzard’s strongest attack which combined her own ability『Cessation Lost[3]』and『Patience Lord Gabriel』’s ability『Solidification[4]』with also『Envious Lord Leviathan』’s ability『Absorb[5]』.

With the attack coming towards her, Velgrind accelerated her own energy to the maximum in order to oppose it.

「Cardinal Acceleration!!」

Two polar lights, white and red collided.

The northern land experienced a severe earthquake, as the falling ice and snow repeatedly sublimated and froze with a death blizzard raging on.

The victor was Velzard.

Due to her new ability『Envious Lord Leviathan』, she had downgraded Velgrind’s abilities.

Moreover, Velzard’s energy which should have been exhausted had recovered for some reason.

The essence of『Envious Lord Leviathan』 was to degrade her opponent to below her level.

Besides that, it also had the effect of absorbing the opponent’s energy……

In addition to her absolute defense power and overwhelming Velgrind in terms of maximum energy, Velzard possessed energy absorption too.

Now that her abilities had been downgraded, it seemed impossible for Velgrind to win.

「It’s the end, Velgrind. I shall praise you for growing stronger to be able to oppose me. However, the result won’t change. You aren’t a threat for me when I got serious. Now, I have downgraded your abilities by one level. It’s impossible for you to have an advantage against me anymore.」

That’s right. For Velzard, Velgrind wasn’t a threat even if she was an obstacle.

Because of the opposition of their abilities, it would be impossible for Velgrind to break through Velzard’s defense.

However――

「But, Nee-san. I don’t need to defeat you. Besides, even if my abilities are downgraded, the original acceleration ability has not been affected in any way. Since the abilities only support me, it will not affect me even if I lost them!」

Velgrind fearlessly declared.

In fact, Velgrind’s abilities were focused on only one thing, that was『Acceleration』.

Now that she had already circulated her energy with full power, it wouldn’t affect her even if『Flame God Sovereign Cthugha』was sealed off.

And the most important thing was――

(Hurry up, Guy. Be quick and release Nee-san from their control!)

Velgrind didn’t have to defeat Velzard at all.

Velgrind’s victory condition was to earn time until Guy releases Velzard from Ultimate Dominion.

At that time, in Velzard's inner world[6], Guy was about to finish the final touches.

　　　　　　◆◆◆

Passing through multiple mental walls, Guy dove into the abyss of the heart.

If he lost his focus, his ego would be swallowed up by Velzard’s soul and the Spiritual Dive would be broken.

Then, Guy’s consciousness would disappear.

On the other hand, if he pushed forward forcibly with all of his strength, he would destroy Velzard’s heart. If that happened, the result would be Velzard releasing all her energy after a rampage and a new “True Dragon” would be born somewhere in this world.

Guy had to prevent that from happening.

Despite being under pressure, Guy passed through the walls without being impatient.

Finally, he found it.

It was a young spirit of Velzard sitting hugging her knees.

「Yo, I’ve been looking for you, you know?」

Guy talked naturally and calmly.

This was a critical moment. A single mistake would change Velzard’s action for the worse.

「What is it? What did you come here for? Are you here to laugh at me?」

Velzard asked while acting the way she appeared..

「No, I came to pick you up. Let’s go back quickly, Velzard.」

Guy shrugged his shoulders and answered.

His reply irritated Velzard.

It was always the same.

Guy always spoke one-sidedly and arrogantly only to Velzard.

He didn’t even care about Velzard and said things bluntly as if it was natural for him to do so.

「What is with you! Guy, you never listen to my opinion. It’s always, always me who had to be patient! As the Tuner, I had the role to guide this world that my older brother left behind. That’s why I always observed you so that you wouldn’t go on a rampage. Even though I really hated it…… Even Velgrind went freely to the place of the man she loved and Veldora was so carefree and rampaged as he pleased. As for me, I endured it all the time, you know!? Everything was because you were acknowledged by my older brother! It was because you were the only being except for my older brother who could destroy this world. I couldn’t afford to leave your side, you know…… I’m the only one who needed to have patience…… And yet, you’re going to leave me behind. I will never forgive you for that. Why do you have to support that suspicious slime now!? It would have been fine if you lived quietly in this northern land! You oppose my older brother even though there’s no way for you to win. Rather than letting you be killed by my older brother, I would rather be the one who will kill you with my own hands!」

Guy’s words sparked a fire inside Velzard’s frozen heart.

As she raged, Velzard threw out all of the displeasure she had felt until now.

With all of her feelings, she lashed out at Guy with her fierce will.

They became imaginary blades which cut at Guy’s body, but Guy didn’t try to avoid the attack.

He just stood there being exposed to the attacks without resistance as if he tried to accept all of Velzard’s anger and complaints.

「Besides…... You even acknowledged a human but you never acknowledged me…… What am I to you!? Even though I always tried my best, because I wanted to be acknowledged by you…… There’s no place for me at all!」

Her attacks gradually became weak, and eventually, Velzard started to hit Guy’s chest feebly.

「Are you an idiot? I acknowledged you, you know? My partner is only you alone.」

「I’m an idiot, you said!? I don’t want to be called that by you who will always do whatever as you please!」

「I guess nothing can be done about it. If you don’t like it, can’t you just say it? You are too concerned about boring things, you know. Also, I lost to Veldanava a long time ago, okay? I’ll win next time!」

Before she realized it, Velzard had stopped hitting Guy.

Then, she buried her face in Guy’s chest.

「……You are the idiotic one. There’s no way you can win――」

「It might be impossible for me alone. So please cooperate with me. You will fight together with me, right? Right, Velzard?」

Velzard was speechless.

Guy’s arrogance was too much.

――And, towards those very Guy-like words,

「I hate you. I really, really, really, really, really hate you. I hate you, I hate you, I hate you, I hate you―― I hate you so much that I love you.」

Velzard confessed with her whole heart.

Guy’s response to that was very simple――

「Yeah, I knew.」

So, a simple word as if he said something unimportant.

「So arrogant, you are really an unpleasant――」

「Right? That is proof that I’m me after all.」

「Then, this makes me look like an idiot for worrying all by myself……」

「That’s right. I also think so, you know?」

「……Shouldn’t this be the part where you deny it and console me?」

「Why? That’s bothersome. Never mind that, quickly cut off the control. If you don’t hurry up, I don’t think even Velgrind will last long.」

In fact, if the fight was prolonged, Velgrind would have been at a disadvantage.

If the energy supply from the “Soul Corridor” between her and Rimuru ceased, Velgrind’s defeat would become a certainty.

「You’re unkind as usual towards me――」

「Oh, really? You’re my partner after all. I don’t have to be considerate with you cause we’re like a family, right?」

「Partner…… Family…… Family!?」

Velzard’s face, which was buried in Guy’s chest, turned red instantly.

In panic, Velzard jumped away from Guy.

Guy remained calm and didn’t notice Velzard’s unrest.

「Let’s get the hell out of here.」

He said so without minding Velzard’s feelings.

Although Velzard thought that Guy’s attitude was a bit disappointing, she was relieved that Guy responded to her as usual.

There was already no hesitation in her heart and the light of a strong Will returned to her eyes.

She then focused her mind in order to resist Ultimate Dominion that had been cast on her.

「Understood, I’ve also steeled myself. But, it won’t be easy to cut off my brother’s control……」

「There’s a way. It seems that the『Control』had been established using angel series’ skill as the key and lock[7]. Then, if you neutralize it with a demon series’ skill, you can erase that lock. If you do so, no matter how powerful his control is, you can resist it.」

Guy answered without hesitation.

In his words, there was a powerful confidence that Velzard could do it.

「You make it sound so easy. Fine, I shall meet your expectations.」

And so, Velzard overcame her own hesitation and confronted her brother’s curse deep inside her consciousness.

In response to the change of Velzard’s mind, the Ultimate Skills etched in her soul began to fight each other for domination of her soul.

As Velzard’s will dictated,『Envious Lord Leviathan』bit off『Patience Lord Gabriel』. However『Patience Lord Gabriel』stubbornly resisted and tried to protect the lock of the control with its strong defensive power.

The fight in Velzard’s inner world seemed to fall into a stalemate, but Guy wouldn’t allow that.

「Velzard, I’ll help you just a bit.」

Guy said so and activated his imitation of the unbelievable ability he saw just a while ago.

It was “Alteration”, which helped Velgrind overcome the control and evolve her skill.

《Question. Will you synthesize Ultimate Skill『Patience Lord Gabriel』with『Envious Lord Leviathan』and activate “Alteration”? YES/NO》

The “Voice of the World” echoed inside Velzard’s mind.

(Is this what Guy means as help!? But, let’s believe in him for this.)

Velzard answered YES without hesitation.

《Confirmed. Individual: “Ice Dragon Velzard’s Ultimate Skill『Patience Lord Gabriel』and『Envious Lord Leviathan』are synthesized and evolved into Ultimate Skill『Ice God Sovereign Cthulhu[8]』.》

At the same moment that the voice echoed inside her inner world, the lock binding Velzard’s heart crumbled and disappeared.

The lock of the heart that she could never break no matter how desperately she tried to resist it until now had been smashed to pieces easily, as if it was glass.

Velzard and her skills had united splendidly and beautifully.

(This is the mental state that Velgrind reached!? And――the strength Guy had given to me. If I have this ability, there will be no one who could bind me down.)

And so, Velzard received it as a matter of course.

If she and Guy banded together, they would have no opponents in this world.

「See, it was simple, right?」

Guy’s voice, that was so arrogant to the extent of loathsome, echoed in her mind.

「Yeah, it was…… I really look like an idiot……」

「You think so? But I don’t hate it, you know? It’s a part of you too.」

Velzard laughed a bit due to Guy’s words.

The young Velzard was nowhere to be seen now.

She returned to her original ladylike appearance, beautiful and graceful.

With a bashful smile that could charmed everyone, she quietly muttered「I’m home.[9]」to Guy.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Guy’s consciousness instantly returned to his body.

A bit of impatience could be seen in his expression.

He was the one who did it, but he was astonished by Velzard’s rapid changes due to “Alteration”.

(Rather, what exactly is that? That wasn’t on the level of ability modification. Moreover, the only thing I did was activate it, I actually got the impression that something else had done it as a proxy…… As if it had anticipated that I would do so……)

To Guy who seemed that he was about to drift into his sea of deep thoughts,

「You’re back? What happened to my older sister?」

He heard Velgrind’s voice asking him.

「Ahh, the control was released safely. She will wake up soon.」

At the same time, Guy answered, Velzard woke up.

「I have caused some trouble for you, Guy. And, Velgrind, I have shown you my unsightly side and I apologize for insulting Rudra.」

She said so and lowered her head towards Guy and Velgrind.

「For Ane-sama to apologize to me, I must have gone crazy. But, I’m so glad. It would be impossible for me to tolerate that Nee-san was being controlled by someone after all.」

「It seems I have made you worry. But putting aside whether Velda is Nii-san or not, it’s true that his strength is comparable to Nii-san, you know?」

「Humph. Even if it is so, if he’s not Nii-san―― No, even if he was Nii-san, I won’t change my mind that I have to defeat Velda. Velda is Rudra’s enemy after all.」

「You’re so straightforward, heh, Velgrind…… I’m a bit jealous.」

The sisters threw a straight gaze at each other and confirmed each other intention.

Guy called out the two people with「Never mind that, let’s end this quickly.」.

Guy had already returned to his combat form while the two were talking.

And the three of them turned their sight on the girl, who was Veldora’s opponent.

The Hero Chloe―― No, towards Manas: Lucia who had taken over her body.

However――simultaneously with her blade flashed, Chloe’s body split into two.

No, that was just an illusion.

The blade of will released from inside Chloe had interfered with the real world which is why such an image was shown to those in this place.

Veldora had been cut here and there, but he had not received a fatal injury.

The two sisters were relieved to see that.

Guy had his eyes glued towards Chloe――

(I see, as I expected, it had been concealed――)

A thin smile appeared on Guy’s lips.

Guy had realized.

Lucia’s extinction and Chloe’s victory.

And so―― Just now, the fight in the northern land had ended.

* * *

[1] 能力発動(イグニッション) Nouryoku Hatsudou, (Igunisshon), Ability Activation.

[2] 冷極消失凝収覇(ホワイトアウトアブソーブ) Reigoku Shoushitsu Gyoushuu Ha (Howaitoauto Abusōbu).

[3] 停止消失(セセイション・ロスト) Teishi Shoushitsu (Seseishon Rosuto), Suspended Dissipation.

[4] 万物固体化(ソリディフィケーション) Banbutsu Kotaika (Soridifuikeishon), All Creation Solidification.

[5] 降格吸収(アブソーブ) Koukaku Kyuushuu (Abusōbu), Downgrade Absorption.

[6] Mind world, Mental world etc.

[7] 鍵 Kagi, the kanji would normally mean key, but depending on the context, it can also means lock.

[8] 氷神之王(クトゥルフ) Hyōjin/Kōri Kami no Ou (Kuturufu).

[9] ただいま Tadaima (I’m home/I’m back) used when you return to you home/a place where you belong to or to someone who you loved. It’s a Crowning Moment of Heartwarming.





Chapter 238: Justice and Contradiction


Chloe held her sword reflexively to the sight of a man approaching in front of her.

She felt a bit regretful for the man who looked pretty thrilled.

Chloe thought that, if the man had been looking forward to having a fight with her that much, she wanted to fight him seriously.

Even if Veldora challenged Chloe in his true form, the result wouldn’t change.

Chloe’s combat style was with a sword, it didn’t change no matter what kind her opponent was.

Chloe’s weapon, which shaped like an Uchigatana[1], was a Spiritual Weapon equivalent to God Class.

The sword had fought together with Chloe for a long time and became comparable to the Demonic Sword “World” which was one of the best swords in this world.

The sword was familiar in Chloe’s hand as if it was a part of her, it kept protecting Chloe.

It was a supreme sword with an edge that could cut even a spiritual life-form.

But―― Chloe couldn’t be Veldora’s opponent.

This is because Chloe was deprived of her free will by Lucia with “Ultimate Dominion”……

　　　　◆◆◆

Lucia, who had obtained Chloe’s body, was at the height of her triumph.

She had put Velzard under her complete domination and made her fight Velgrind.

Guy was a nuisance, but with Lucia’s strength right now, she wouldn’t lose even if she fought Guy and Veldora together at the same time.

Indeed, Veldora couldn’t do a thing before Lucia.

It seemed he had borrowed a sword from Guy, but his sword skill was not worth considering

No, it was because Lucia was too strong.

Lucia had made Chloe’s swordsmanship completely as hers and could completely predict the trajectory of all attacks.

Lucia thought that such overwhelming strength―― was Chloe’s true worth as the strongest Hero, but that was not all.

Chloe was strangely very compatible with Seraphim’s energy and Ultimate Skill『Hope Lord Sariel』.

Lucia’s main body was being perfectly guarded by Ultimate Skill『Justice Lord Michael』’s『Castle Guard』.

And now, she obtained the Ultimate Skill『Hope Lord Sariel』’s『Absolute End[2]』.

Ultimate Defense and Ultimate Offense.

Lucia as a Manas was endowed with the wisdom to unravel the secrets of the skills.

That was why she could come up with a way to synthesis the two ultimate skills into one.

――It would be fine if she inserted 『Infinity Prison[3]』into『Absolute End』. In the first place, she didn’t need to worry about defense since she had『Castle Guard』after all――

Lucia thought so.

And she would make Chloe as her sword and incorporated her into『Justice Lord Michael』.

By doing so, Lucia would become a totally flawless being with offense and defense capabilities.

Moreover,『Infinity Prison』 wasn’t actually an ability for defense.

It is an ability to seal opponent that was too difficult to be destroyed like spiritual life-forms.

(Hero Chloe seems to have used it as an irregular defensive means because she was inexperienced as a human and couldn’t master the ability…… but now it’s an unnecessary ability. If it’s me I could master it perfectly, but rather than doing something half-hearted such as sealing the enemy, I’ll destroy the enemy completely. Yes――Under the name of Justice, all of God’s enemies shall be destroyed!)

So, from that flow of thoughts, Lucia made the decision to erase『Infinity Prison』.

――Thus, the forbidden door is opened――

Although Lucia knew about it due to her wisdom which could even unravel the secrets of skills……

That ability,『Infinity Prison』is an ability for sealing something.

Like “Pandora Box” which contained all of the world’s evils and calamities inside, an “Evil” was sealed deep inside Chloe’s heart.

Once released, that “Evil” would spread chaos and disaster into this world.

Ramiris tried to interfere at the time Chloe who transcended time fused with the young Chloe was because she sensed this “Evil”.

That “Evil” would have felt various negative feelings as they traveled through a long time repetitively. Chloe continued to seal it with her strong will.

However, such feelings matured inside Chloe’s heart and created a hideous personality.

「If only you don't wake up a sleeping tiger[4], you will only have me as your opponent, but now.......」

That was Chloe’s words.

At the end of those words, Chloe’s consciousness changed completely.

If the Atonement Hero who carried all of humanity’s negative feelings onto herself is Chloe, the Godslayer Hero who condemned everything and loathed humanity’s sins is also Chloe.

It is Chloe yet also not Chloe.

It is the one who condemns everything without any mercy.

Its name is “Manas” Chronoa[5].

Now that the seal was gone, it was freed from the prison of the heart.

Although they were the same being, its strength was in a different dimension.

Even Yuuki’s curse that bound Chloe until then, was severed instantly.

There was nothing that could stop Chloe now.

For a totally flawless being that Lucia said of itself, that was exactly the word for Chloe.

――However, the current Chloe wouldn’t lose to this “Evil”.

Her strong will―― and the fragments of Shizue and Hinata’s heart are living inside Chloe’s heart after all.

Above all, there’s Rimuru now.

That’s why Chloe understood that Chronoa was no more than a part of her heart too.

She just accepted Chronoa straightforwardly and it completely fused with her.

As Chloe had accepted the unleashed Chronoa,『Hope Lord Sariel』which had completed its role, disappeared into Chloe’s heart.

However, all of its abilities are still usable by Chloe’s will in the same manner as before.

「Justice? What is Justice? Something uncertain and changing subjectively like that is your justification, you said? If that’s so, you are not my enemy――」

Lucia felt she heard Chloe’s voice.

(Don’t mock me! Justice is the only eternal truth of all things!)

She tried to refute, but she never could.

Because Lucia’s consciousness had been locked in complete darkness instantly…...

That was what happened in Chloe’s inner world.

Chloe’s deadly blade, 『Absolute End』――which was released in order to interfere with Lucia’s consciousness―― did not even allow any resistance and annihilated her in one blow.

Thus, the fight in this northern land ended.

　　　　◆◆◆

Velzard shook off the binding and Chloe cut down the curse.

Although there were some who were quite exhausted, ultimately everyone was all right.

「Kuaaaahhahaha! How about we call it a draw for today?」

With cuts all over his body, Veldora had barely dodged Chloe’s last strike, but he was relieved to know that it was over.

And casually, he insisted on calling their fight as a draw.

Chloe’s last attack was impossible to be analyzed even for Veldora. In the worst case, he couldn’t help but thought that the attack possessed the same properties as『Space-Time Continuous Attack』obtained by his sister, Velgrind.

He even felt a bit scared, but it would be his loss if he worried about that.

He wanted to fight the Hero who got serious, but he wanted to win so he wouldn’t allow himself to be defeated.

Therefore, Veldora judged that he would be satisfied with a draw.

「Really? It seemed to me that you wanted to fight me, so I wouldn’t mind being your opponent once this Great War was over……」

「Hmmm!? N-no, no, you don’t need to be that considerate. Kuahahaha, I have seen most of your attacks from our exchanges too, there’s no need for us to fight for the time being.」

While slightly panicking, Veldora turned down Chloe’s offer.

Veldora was somewhat scared of his two sisters’ gazes towards him, but he pretended he didn’t notice and ignored them.

At least, he found out that he couldn’t compete with Chloe in swordsmanship at all.

As for things he said, there was no lie in Veldora’s words.

Inside his mind, Veldora swore that he would train his swordsmanship thoroughly from the base up.

Next was Guy who spoke to Chloe..

Returning to his usual male form, Guy began talking to Chloe while Veldora returned his sword back.

「Yo, is that your true power?」

Chloe nodded to Guy’s question.

Or rather……

「Huh? It seems that the seraphim’s energy is left behind. And…...」

Chloe had treated the power as her own too naturally, but in actuality she had stolen a majority of Lucia’s energy.

That was not all, there was also fragments of『Justice Lord Michael』left behind from “Manas“ Lucia’s remains.

As a result――

《Notification. Individual: Chloe Aubert, confirmed to have gathered the three elements of『Courage』『Hope』『Justice』[6]. Moreover, the presence of Ultimate Skill『Space-Time Lord Yog-Sothoth』in her possession had been confirmed. "Alteration” is automatically activated…… Successful. Ultimate Skill『Space-Time Lord Yog-Sothoth』has evolved into『Space-Time God Yog-Sothoth[7]』.》

Within Chloe, an ultimate evolution was being carried without her realization.

Even if it was an enormous energy of a seraph, it wasn’t sufficient at all to activate that ability (Alteration)……

Because of that, Chloe’s evolution ended without being noticed by anyone.

Not even Guy could notice that evolution; it was due to Complete Concealment of Ultimate Skill『Space-Time God Yog-Sothoth』.

「Looks like it. So, what happened to that Lucia fellow?」

Due to what was stated before, Guy asked about Lucia’s end without paying attention to the seraph’s remains.

「I have eliminated a part of her that possessed me. But, her main body is safe.」

「Did you let her go?」

「No――」so Chloe muttered to Guy who asked with sharp eyes.

A small smile appeared on her lips.

It seemed like there was a glimpse of cruelty unsuited of a Hero in her expression――

Probably, it might not just be a hallucination.

It was proof that the remnants of Chronoa which had fused with Chloe were still alive.

It was something unthinkable for the naturally gentle Chloe, but if it was Chronoa, it could do it without hesitation.

However, that was still something unbecoming for Chloe……

Therefore, Chloe decided to leave the judgment to Lucia’s own actions.

「It will be great if Lucia admits her defeat obediently, but if she doesn’t do so―― I shall teach her the true meaning of despair.」

Chloe declared so and stared at Guy with her strong-willed eyes.

After all, her victory was certain.

Moreover, for some reason――Chloe felt that she wouldn’t be the one who decided Lucia’s fate.

「Very well. Then, shall we quickly go to defeat Velda?」

「Yeah, let’s quickly defeat the mastermind, I want to return to Sensei’s place.」

Guy and Chloe were in consensus.

Veldora was about to say “Because the cuts all over my body aches, I’ll return once they recover”―― but he remained silent before his two sisters’ gazes.

It was a very wise decision.

Thus, the five people who could be said as the tops of this world began to move towards the Heaven.

　　　　◆◆◆

「IMPOSSIBLE, IMPOSSIBLE, IMPOSSIBLE!!」

Lucia was screaming in her main body while going partly mad.

Something impossible had happened just now.

A “Manas” with the strongest Will, was destroyed just by a mere human.

She absolutely couldn’t accept such a thing.

Lucia thought so and derived the most optimum solution with her thoughts still in chaos.

――That’s right, I just have to erase everything in the northern land――

Only after she thought so, calm returned to her heart.

And then she turned around and smiled at the being over there.

With compassionate expressions that matched her gentle appearance,

「Milim, I want you to listen to your mother’s request ――」

She said so.

A terrifying plan made by Lucia.

Her plan was to annihilate Guy and Chloe along with the northern continent using Milim’s Drago Nova[8] from a very high altitude.

She would order Velzard, who was under her control, with『Thought Transmission』to stop the movement of the other three people.

She had planned to strike them all in one go.

If she matched the timing and made Velzard self-destruct, it would cause massive destruction with the super high dense energy from the body of “True Dragon” as the source of the explosion.

With the synergy of Drago Nova, it would annihilate the northern continent.

It might even affect the planet itself, but such a thing was a trivial matter to Lucia.

Guy, Chloe, Velgrind, and Veldora.

She only had to get rid of those four people and everything would be fine.

If faced with this great destruction, it would be impossible even for those four people to survive.

Lucia estimated the result would be so.

「Milim, you see――」

At the moment when Lucia tried to continue with her words...

「Good grief, are you a fool who can’t even accept your own defeat?」

Such cold words came out from Milim’s mouth.

Lucia stared at Milim with eyes full of shock.

「I shall have you stop doing foolish things with my mother’s appearance for good.」

Milim declared and smiled fearlessly towards Lucia.

It was like a lie that she was obedient like a doll until now.

「Wha, you!? Could it be you aren’t under control――!?」

「Humph, you finally realized? I decided to stay obedient until now because I can’t come up with a way to break through your defense, but I don’t need to do so anymore, you see? I want to reclaim my mother’s body quickly, so let’s get started!」

Milim declared so and smiled complacently.

「What a foolish thing to say!? I have『Castle Guard』. There are many angels in this heaven, and besides even humanity’s faiths are directed to this ability now, my defensive powers are incomparable to Rudra’s which was reliant on something as vulnerable as loyalty ――」

「SHUT UP!」

Milim interrupted Lucia with a roar.

And then, she thrust her fist towards Lucia.

Lucia instantly put her guard up.

『Castle Guard』 automatically deployed in front of Lucia and protected her.

(You’re foolish, Milim. It’s troublesome that you broke out the control unexpectedly, but if Velda-sama awakened with perfect form, someone like you won’t matter. I only have to endure until then――）

The real surprise hit Lucia at the moment she thought up that far.

『Castle Guard』 was smashed into pieces and scattered before her eyes.

「Im-impossible!?」

An unbelievable and unacceptable reality was expanding in front of Lucia.

「Fool? You’re the fool here, you know? You don’t understand the ability at all. You are like a child who knows secrets and wants to tamper on things with them. Do you know why my father, Veldanava, didn’t give offensive capability to『Justice Lord Michael』……? It seems you thought that it was incomplete, but that’s wrong. That skill was complete because it was incomplete. What do you think will happen if the “Spear that could pierce everything” and “Shield that could block everything” come together[9]? Also, justice itself is something filled with contradictions. When you support one side, Justice will lose its impartialness. An absolute justice is nothing but fantasy. Because of this ambiguity, my father kept『Justice Lord Michael』 incomplete. It just became a power to protect without offensive power. Justice without force is powerless, but if you have the power to protect it, you could fulfill everything. That alone is what made it complete.」

Milim indifferently informed Lucia. Like a teacher enlightening a foolish student.

And now, her hand was slowly extended towards Lucia.

「Impossible, I won’t accept it. I will never accept such a thing!! Justice is the only――」

Milim’s hand touched Lucia.

「Your absolute defense is gone. Soon, your abilities will disappear too. Before that happens, I shall perform your last rites with my own hand.」

「Stop it! I’m Lucia, Velda-sama’s absolute believer, the one and only――」

「Begone from my mother. Mind Death Break[10]!!」

Without mercy, Milim’s destructive capability was fully displayed.

At this moment, the “Manas” created form『Justice Lord Michael』 named Lucia had been completely annihilated.

Milim embraced her mother’s corpse with a lonely expression.

There was no warmth in the body, as it was freed from the effect of the ability, its time which had stopped begun to flow instantly.

Lucia’s body withered, turned into dust and disappeared.

「Good night, Okaa-sama. Please, rest in peace――」

Milim didn’t have memories of her mother’s warmth.

For Milim, playing with her mother’s sacred remains was a sin worthy of a certain death.

She had achieved her goal of freeing her mother from Lucia who was being protected by the ultimate defense.

Milim shall teach the next sinful person the depths of her wrath.

The time has come.

The name of the person she should judge was Velda――the person who impersonated her father and played with her mother’s corpse.

From now on, Milim unleashed her suppressed wrath.

The heaven was about to be filled with waves of Milim’s wrath.

* * *

Author’s Note

I avoided Chloe’s Last Boss Route.

I’m sorry for those who had been expecting that.

I also have such versions, but I let it pass for now.

* * *

[1] Uchigatana is a shorter version of Tachi. The length of an Uchigatana blade was around 60 cm to no more than 70 cm while the length of a tachi blade was around 75 cm.



[2] 絶対切断(アブソリュートエンド) Zettai Setsudan (Abusoryuuto Endo). Absolute Severance, her previous Unique Skill. Remainder, Sariel was the combined and evolved form of Chloe and Hinata’s Unique Skills. Btw the Author gave the furigana for both now.

[3] 無限牢獄(インフィニティプリズン) Mugen Rougoku (Infiniti Purizun).

[4] 寝た子を起こさなければ, from 寝た子を起こす, an idiom (waking the sleeping dog/lion/tiger/beast/child) which mean avoid interfering in/with a situation/something/someone that is currently causing no problems but might do so as a result of such interference.

[5] クロノア Kuronoa.

[6] 勇気,希望,正義. Yuuki, Kibou, Seigi.

[7] 時空之神(ヨグ=ソトホート) Jikuu no Kami (Yogu=Sotohōto), the skill had become a God and also notice the change in its katakana, previously wasヨグ・ソトース Yogu・Sotōsu.

[8] 竜星爆炎覇(ドラゴ・ノヴァ) Ryuu sei/boshi/hoshi Bakuenha (Dorago Nova). Dragon Star/Stellar Dragon Supreme Exploding Flame

[9] Unstoppable Force Meets Immovable Object/Irresistible Force Paradox. The origin of the paradox is from China, wherein the metaphor originated in the Chinese story of a perfect spear that can pierce all shields and a perfect shield that stops all spears. The story is found in the 3rd century BC philosophical book by Han Feizi. In the story, a man/merchant tried to sell a spear and a shield. When he was asked how good his spear was, he said that his spear could pierce any shield. Then, when asked how good his shield was, he said that it could defend from all spear attacks. Then someone asked him what would happen if he were to take his spear to strike his shield; the seller could not answer. This led to the Chinese idiom of "zìxīang máodùn" (自相矛盾), which means "self-contradictory", wherein the Chinese word 矛盾; pinyin: máodùn; means "Spear-Shield". So, the two things can’t be true at the same time as they are contradicting each other. Either the shield or the spear breaks when they really meet.

[10] 攻性精神破壊(マインドデスブレイク) Kousei Seishin Hakai (Maindo Desu Bureiku). Aggressive Spirit/Mind Destruction.





Chapter 239: Soaring Wall


Author note: Milim was furious. She decided that she must, definitely, eliminate Velda, the root of all evils.

* * *

Milim burst the door open and proceeded to the throne room where Velda was sitting.

Transparent capsules filled with clear liquid were arranged systematically in the walls.

Floating inside each capsule were unborn angels.

The soul energy was being poured into these empty vessels.

Because they didn’t possess a physical body, they were beings that could only exist in the Heaven.

If they established a certain degree of ego, they could act on the surface world for a short time, but…… It required a bit more time for that to happen.

Milim paid no heed to the angels and aimed straight to the throne.

The heart of this Heaven.

It was the place where the God[1] sat at the center of everything.

Velda was now the ruler of this castle, in both name and reality.

The automatic defense system of the Sky Castle[2] reacted to Milim’s murderous intent and judged her as an enemy.

The alarm reverberated and Guardian Dolls[3] appeared.

However, they saw Milim’s necklace and stopped moving.

「YoU CaNnOt PrOcEeD bEyOnD tHiS pOiNt. PleAsE tUrN bAcK.」[4]

The dolls warned Milim.

However, Milim completely ignored them.

「Get out of the way.」

As she said so, Milim casually swung her fist and destroyed one of the dolls.

The dolls couldn’t attack Milim due to the necklace that showed that she was Velda’s family.

Nobody could stop Milim.

That was until a woman stood up before Milim.

「Milim-sama, you have grown to be such fine la……」

The woman tried to approach Milim while being moved to tears.

She was a beautiful and gentle woman wearing a solid black dress.

「Is that you, Salome…… it’s been a long time……」

Joy brightened up Milim’s expression for a moment, and then――

「No. You are not Salome……」

Her expression was clouded over by sadness instantly.

The woman who tried to embrace Milim was split into two.

What dripped out from her wound wasn’t blood but a transparent liquid of unknown ingredients――it was something that came out of a tattered body of a complex machinery rather than that of a living being.

「……Ahh…… Mi, lim…...sama…… you, have…… grown……beep――――」

She extended her hand to touch Milim’s cheek and wiped the teardrop on it.

Just like that, the doll modeled after Salome fell to the ground.

She was the woman who had raised and educated Milim when she still very young.

The woman who cared for Milim in the olden days had passed away.

There’s no way she’s alive.

Unlike Milim, who could live eternally, Salome was no more than one of the maids who served Lucia.

There was no way that Salome, who was a human, is still alive.

But…...Milim couldn’t help but think of it.

Whether her soul was called back to dwell inside the doll or not?

Such a thing was impossible.

That was the conclusion Milim came to: the correct truth.

Milim destroyed the doll without hesitation and severed her attachments.

It should be the right thing, and yet the doll’s satisfied smile and overflowing tears for some reason had made Milim confused.

So――

She was perhaps really――

「What a cruel thing to do. Even though I especially called back a deceased soul for your sake. I thought you would be pleased, so I prepared the present secretly…… I guess you didn’t like it?」

A clear voice reached Milim’s ears.

She didn’t need to turn around.

The owner of the voice was――

「It’s you, Velda. You bastard, I hope you are prepared for it.」

「Prepared…… For what I wonder?」

Against Milim’s expression filled with wrath, Velda still had a cool smile.

Two contrasting emotions were clashing as the two faced each other.

She hadn’t contacted Rimuru yet, but Milim wasn’t worried about it.

Since she felt residues of the Hero Chloe at the time she buried Lucia just a little while ago.

It was a very splendid sword slash that crossed over even『Multiple Existence』 and reached Lucia’s main body. It happened just for an instant, but Milim wouldn’t fail to notice it.

It was the time for the people who were being controlled by Lucia in the surface to be released. Although, it seemed Rimuru had schemed something as he lurked inside the shadow and perhaps already worked out some countermeasures for it.

If she thought like that, even if she didn’t bother to contact him, she believed that everything would be conveyed to Rimuru even if she stayed in this place.

The fool called Vega was the first one to be eliminated by Rimuru’s subordinates.

The small fry called Kazaream seemed to have fallen as he couldn’t defeat Leon.

She also knew about Dagruel’s defeat as Lucia was raising a fuss about it.

Although where Dino was and what he was doing was unknown, Milim thought that it was pointless even to be worried about that cunning man. She knew that he would suddenly appear sooner or later after all.

In other words, it could be said that Velda’s subordinates were all defeated.

「It seems that your prided Four Unholy Commanders have all been defeated. You’re the only one left, Velda. I shall have you receive the reward for making me angry.」

As Milim said so, she pulled out the demonic sword “Earth” and took a stance.

Velda looked at Milim with a smile while shrugging his shoulders.

「I’ll play with you, Milim.」

Those words became the signal.

Milim easily demonstrated continuous sword techniques.

However, Velda avoided everything by a paper-thin margin.

He was still unarmed and had leeway for his attitude against Milim.

That ignited Milim’s anger and the demonic sword “Earth” began pulsing as if it had reacted to it.

The rusts on the surface of the sword disappeared, showing its bluish-white blade. It seemed that the blade was strengthened as it absorbed waves of her anger.

「Die! Drago Break[5]!!」

A ferocious slash like an embodiment of Milim’s wrath was heading towards the defenseless Velda.

However――

「Too bad. You’re a bit slow.」

Velda easily stepped back with just a bit movement and dodged Milim’s sword.

But, that was as Milim’s planned.

「The time for destruction is now!」

The moment Velda evaded Milim’s sword, their position was now reversed.

Milim stood in front of the throne while Velda stood on the ground below the throne.

Plus, on the very rear of Velda’s position―― soared the Heaven Gate, the only gateway connecting the Heaven and the surface world.

From the very beginning, Milim aimed for the chance to simultaneously attack both Velda and the Heaven Gate.

With the demonic sword “Earth” in her right hand, and her left hand charged with Destruction Intent.

Right now, Milim unleashed Drago Nova at full power towards Velda.

A bluish-white light beam which resembled a sparkling star’s light overlapped repetitively and pierced through Velda.

It pressurized the surroundings as the beam bulged and expanded to pierce everything towards the entrance from which Milim entered from.

A flood of light was born, blowing away all of the lined up pillars.

And beyond them was the soaring wall of the Heaven Gate.

Everything was as Milim planned.

The bluish-white light beam penetrated through Velda as its power increased and pierced the Heaven Gate.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

As the lights subsided, half of the Sky Castle had been cleanly blown away and disappeared.

Only half of the castle remained behind where Milim stood.

However, the Heaven Gate was still intact.

It wasn’t unharmed as there were numerous cracks on it, but it had endured Milim’s strongest attack.

No, that’s not it.

(I saw the light had gotten refracted just before the impact, could it be――)

Milim didn’t let her guard down.

That was the right decision.

「Hmm, as one would expect from my daughter. I never expected that you can make cracks to this impassable gate.」

There was someone who spoke in an excited voice towards Milim.

Needless to say, it was Velda.

Velda, who was unharmed, had sat on the throne behind Milim before she noticed.

While suppressing her astonishment, Milim calmly turned around to face Velda.

「Oho……? For you to be unscathed after being hit by Drago Nova……」

「Ah, it was the ultimate magic that caused a supernova explosion with a super-high compression. It’s the ultimate perfected form of nuclear strike magic “Gravity Collapse[6]”, but it’s impossible to be use unless the user can manipulate Stardust[7] freely. It’s indeed an ultimate magic fitting for you. But, you see――」

Velda began to explain heedlessly to Milim who unintentionally expressed her disbelief. He created a thin light membrane on his hand as to show Milim and continued his explanation.

「I can also manipulate stardust. It’s easy to avert the impact since I directed the destruction so it only affected a limited area.」

So he explained.

Velda seemed to be surprised that her power could affect the impassable gate, but it wasn’t that surprising for Milim.

Velda had said it easily, but it was an impossible feat unless he could read Milim’s thoughts and understood her aim completely.

More importantly, there was no one who could manipulate stardust except Milim.

It was an ultimate magic with the only way to defend against it was to do a lot of work of casting nuclear strike magic repeatedly in order to offset it which even Guy couldn’t do …… But, right now, Velda had shown that he could easily manipulate it.

In other words, it was no more than a magic which could easily be blocked for Velda and Milim had lost one of her trump cards.

(What a monster……)

For the first time, Milim experienced Velda’s true strength in the truest sense.

「Well, are you done now? Since I will have you make a child with me, I don’t want to hurt you. You should have played around enough, right? Please be obedient now.」

With a gentle smile, Velda said so as if he was persuading a child.

Milim desperately racked her head for something.

“Is there nothing I can do?” Milim sought for a telling blow to Velda by making full use of her computation prediction.

However, her calculation indicated a merciless result that everything was useless even with her high abilities.

(Kuh, I should have waited for Rimuru and his subordinates to come here……)

At the moment when Milim regretted her action――

――Crack――

So, a small sound echoed in the place.

Milim moved her sight to see the origin of the sound.

It also attracted Velda’s attention as he did the same as Milim.

「What!?」

And for the first time, Velda’s expression was filled with disbelief.

Right now, there was a huge crack on the towering Heaven Gate that blocked everyone from passing.

And then――light came flowing from the crack and the gate crumbled immediately after a thunderous sound.

「Good grief. What a sturdy gate, right?」

「Totally. I didn’t expect that even with the three of us it would repel our attack over and over again.」

「That’s right. I thought that it would be an easy task when we received the order from Rimuru-sama.」

While conversing like that, three women passed through the gate and came to invade.

Testarossa, Ultima and Carrera.

Under Rimuru’s order, they had finally succeeded in destroying the Heaven Gate.

「But, there seemed to be an impact from the inside at the end――」

「Eh, there are some people here?」

「――I see, there was a commotion inside or something like that.」

The three shifted their focus to Milim and Velda and seemed to have guessed the circumstances.

Testarossa smiled wickedly and pierced Velda with her cold gaze.

「Hey, you two. If we kill that guy, won’t all the achievements be ours?」

「Right, right! It seems we are the first to arrive here!」

「Milim-sama seems to be struggling too, she probably won’t complain if we help her.」

The other two agreed to Testarossa’s words.

And so, the three people confronted Velda with their respective weapons in hand.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Milim analyzed the situation and thought of their winning percentages.

It seemed that Rimuru had made the necessary preparations with exquisite timing as Milim had expected.

She was unsure whether they could compete against Velda, but if they could distract Velda even momentarily, Milim could land a full power Drago Break.

If she condensed Drago Nova’s energy and made it explode inside Velda’s body, even Velda who could manipulate stardust could do nothing but to perish.

Milim concluded so instantly.

「You guys, sorry but please lend me your help!」

The three demons delightfully nodded to Milim’s shout.

Her path to victory had been shut before, but she could now see a path opening even though it was only a small one.

Velda looked at Milim uninterestedly and shifted his sight to see the three demons.

Then he said,

「It’s troublesome to play with people other than Milim. I shall prepare suitable opponents for you guys.」

He announced so and took out an orb to his hand.

Milim and the three demons were wary of Velda’s action.

However, something was created in an instant.

Two people were standing in front of Velda.

An old man dressed in luxurious black clothes.

A short-haired soldier dressed in the former Empire Army’s official uniform.

The two surveyed their surroundings as they looked strangely confused.

「I, I’m certain that I should have died after I entrusted the girl with my techniques…」

「Why am I here? I’m alive―― No, that’s impossible.」

They were Damrada who had entrusted his techniques to Ultima and Kondou Tatsuya who had entrusted his Will to Carrera.

However, they were not the real one.

That was proven from their reaction.

「Yo, you guys seem to have woken up. How’s the body’s condition?」

「Ah, Velda-sama! It is very good.」

「It’s been a long time, Velda-sama. For you to call me, do you have a mission for me?」

Damrada and Kondou took a pose to show their loyalty in front of Velda.

Their current appearance was something you couldn’t imagine from them when they were alive.

Ultima and Carrera were stunned when they looked at the two.

It was truly unbelievable, but the two appeared so similar to the real ones.

「Don’t be deceived! They are just copies harboring their memories. Moreover――Velda had rewritten the memories to his likings…… their real selves’ soul had disappeared, right? Not even a god can revive the dead!」

From Milim’s shout, Ultima and Carrera also realized the truth.

Velda’s cheerful voice reached them.

「That’s right. They and the maid I made a while ago for Milim have the same principle. Strangely, I can’t collect memories of a living person and I can only use it once. This Memory Orb[8] can reproduce a deceased person’s memories.」

Velda said so while fiddling around with the third orb he took out.

And, he continued talking.

「I collected the angels’ energy to this orb as the core and created a temporary body for them. They can’t act on the surface, but that doesn’t matter here. Besides, even if I used a lot of unskilled personalities or even if I tried to evolve them into Manas, they weren’t strong…… This time I tried to replicate those with a strong will. With energy comparable to ten awakened demon lords and a strong will. How about it, don’t you think they are strong?」

Velda explained while laughing.

As they understood the meaning of his words, the demons’ expressions were dyed with anger.

Tampering with a person’s soul was the demons’ specialty. Therefore, they didn’t intend to complain about it.

However, playing with the memories of the people whom they acknowledged was a blasphemy to them.

Demons were fundamentally selfish, even if they could tolerate their own actions, that didn’t mean they could tolerate others’ actions.

「It appears that he really wants to die.」

「I’m so mad now.」

「Making me angry isn’t something that is easy to be done.」

The three demons, who couldn’t look at themselves objectively, declared their anger in their own way.

And, that was the same for Milim.

「Don’t let your guard down. I’ll be Velda’s opponent, but I can’t hold out for long. Get rid of those impostors quickly.」

She ordered those words to the three.

Thus, the fight in the Heaven had begun.

* * *

[1] 天帝 Tentei, made from kanji of Heaven and Sovereign. Ruler of Heaven, Emperor of Heaven, Heaven Sovereign, God.

[2] 天空城. Sky/Air/Heaven Castle. I forgot to mention other alternatives when it appeared before, I think. It’s the Castle in the Sky XD

[3] 守護機神(ガーディアンドール) Shugo Kishin (Gādian Dōru) Machine God Protector.

[4] This sentence is spoken in combination of kanji and katakana to make it looks like a robot/doll/machine is talking.

[5] 天魔竜星斬(ドラゴ・ブレイク) Tenma Ryuuboshi Zan (Dorago Bureiku). Tenma Star/Stellar Dragon Slash.

[6] 重力崩壊(グラビティーコラプス) Juuryokuhoukai (Gurabitī Korapusu)

[7] 星粒子(スターダスト) Hoshi Ryuushi (Sutādasuto). Star Particle/Grain.

[8] 記憶の宝珠(メモリーオーブ) Kioku no Houju (Memorī О̄bu). Sacred/Precious Orb of Memory.

P.S. reminder that Ultima is a Bokukko XD

I just remember the katakana for Milim's Demonic Sword is Earth, I had changed it accordingly.





Chapter 240: Final Decisive Battle[1] - Part 1


Damrada and Kondou were calm without batting an eye despite being called fakes.

They faced Carrera and Ultima without any emotions could be felt.

No, they naturally had no emotions.

Even if their memories were recreated, they were still someone else. Since they had no soul, they were merely a substitute Artificial Intelligence for combat. This certainly could be said as a deed of violating the dead.

Velda looked at the demons who got angry and without his expression changing ordered「Eliminate the hindrances」.

And so, the fight had begun.

Ultima exchanged blows with Damrada.

Carrera and Kondou aimed their guns at each other in a short range.

The battles between the two pairs were intense, but the match clearly showed who’s superior in an instant.

Bloody Bite which unleashed by Ultima was parried by Damrada without being overpowered by it.

Just a few words,

「My technique, is it? It seems you have inherited it splendidly but…… if the skill is the same, naturally what decides the outcome is the difference in power between us.」

Damrada uttered his impression.

And then, he pierced through Ultima’s chest whose stance was broken with his crushing fist[2].

He refined enormous energy and assimilated it with his fighting spirit, and concentrated it on his fist. And then, the mass of unleashed fighting spirit caused explosive destructive power.

While coiled around like a snake, it devoured the inside of Ultima’s body.

Ultima was conscious but she couldn’t move her body. Because she’s a demon which is a spiritual life-form, she lost the control of the body because the flow of energy was devoured.

No, if this happened on someone with a physical body, they might not be able to endure it and have their insides collapse and explode……

Carrera likewise fell on the ground.

They had fast drawn their guns at extreme speed and simultaneously fired their bullets, but the power discrepancy was too great.

The bullets fired from Carrera’s large caliber handgun collided head-on with the bullets fired from Kondou’s automatic handgun. The bullets which are refined energy bullets, due to the difference in energy density, one side’s had their bullets burst and disappeared. The bullets that Carrera fired had disappeared.

「Wha!?」

By the time she was surprised, it was after a large amount of energy had been deprived from Carrera’s body.

Ultima and Carrera, those two who rivaled or surpassed even an awakened demon lord, were easily defeated just like taking candy from a baby.

While confronting Velda, Milim was observing the fight with side glances.

(Energy comparable to 10 awakened demon lords, hum? It seems he wasn’t just bragging about it.)

So, she quickly concluded.

She realized that the demons had no chance for winning against Kondou and Damrada from their exchanges just now.

Then, what would she do, Milim had no other choice but to throw her hands up.

Moreover…… She was concerned about the third memory orb Velda had.

Although the energy that filled up the heavens had almost disappeared entirely just by Velda creating Kondou and Damrada, if he brought forth someone whom rivaled those two, their chance of winning would be gone.

(This is very bad. I didn’t expect it, for him to really have strength surpassing “True Dragons…… it seems my thoughts are a bit naïve.)

Nonetheless, Milim thought that if Velda had so much power, regardless of whether she did it alone or carefully made a plan and challenged him with everyone, there wouldn’t be much of difference anyway.

The only thing Milim could do was to unleash all her power to crush Velda.

Milim prepared to fire a full power Drago Nova while kneading fighting spirit inside her body.

Milim had not given up yet.

She believed that the possibility of her defeating Velda wasn’t zero if she could land an attack on him.

However, she had no choice but to admit that it was very difficult to penetrate Velda’s guards……

Two of the demons were defeated and Testarossa left alone wouldn’t be able to stop Kondou and Damrada.

It was a very disadvantageous situation.

However, even so――

Milim kept analyzing the situation calmly.

「Well now, Milim. It’s about time for you to give up and be obedient. No matter how you struggle, you understand that you have no odds of winning, do you?」

「Humph. Say whatever you want. If you wanted a child, you should have made one with that insolent person who called herself my mother. Although she met a foolish end.」

「Don’t misunderstand it, Milim. What I wanted is not really a child. The only one who stands next to Velda is Lucia. I thought that I could recreate『Knowledge Lord Raphael』 if I granted it a physical body and name but……」

「What?」

「Ah, as expected, it seems the manas created from『Justice Lord Michael』couldn’t become Lucia’s soul. It’s a disappointment for you too, right? If only I could reproduce『Knowledge Lord Raphael』 that Lucia previous had, it can be said that reviving the soul that created the skill is possible. If I succeed that far, I only need to plant memories to the soul again. It can be said as a reverse process of a soul creating the skill but…… it seems to be more difficult than I thought. It was the most probable method though――」

Velda answered Milim’s question.

His thoughts were nothing but crazy as he talked about a method that could be said as taboo.

「You bastard, in order to revive my mother…… you created the memory orb?」

「That’s right, so what? Even spreading fear, panic, and chaos to the world to destroy humanity was nothing more because of my wishful thinking, "it would be great if someone awakened with it under such circumstances.” It would be rational for me to seek a more certain method, right? Reviving a soul is very difficult, but if the same skill can be created, the characteristics can be said pretty similar. That’s why it’s important for Ultimate Skill『Knowledge Lord Raphael』to be created.」

「You bastard, such a――」

Milim was made speechless.

She tried to deny it, but she had realized that there was a slight possibility in that method.

「But, well, I didn’t think that it would fail, even though I granted Michael the body I had preserved. Moreover, I ended up losing the precious body, this was a failure. So, as the last resort, I think that me making a child with you will be the most certain way. If it’s you who is Lucia’s daughter, wouldn’t you able to give birth to a body similar in terms of DNA? With just a bit of tampering, I can change it to the same body as the original Lucia.」[3]

With a clear and serene smile, Velda informed the method dyed with madness to Milim.

「You are crazy――」

「Is that so? But, you see, Milim…… no matter what you are thinking, it doesn’t matter to me.」

And, for an instant, Velda disappeared and Milim received an impact on her abdomen.

Although she took a defensive stance right away, Velda’s fist easily broke through her『Multiple Barrier』, and the fighting spirit she kneaded with a lot of efforts ended up dispersed.

Just like that, Milim was thrown to the ground.

Although she tried to stand up, her body couldn’t muster any strength in contrast to her will.

(Kuhaa, he is……certainly, strong――）

Milim glared at Velda while keeping her consciousness by adjusting her fighting spirit.

「I see you’re still resisting, Milim. I’ll be your opponent after I destroyed the world, so I want you to sleep for a bit.」

While saying those words, Velda focused energy on his fist and held up his hand to Milim.

And then, lights were overflowing from his hand――

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Testarossa accurately analyzed the current situation and judged that her chance of winning was 0.

Her result was more pessimistic than the conclusion Milim had, but that was because Testarossa didn’t possess any trump card.

Since the two demons of the same rank as her were defeated instantly, the result could be seen no matter how hard she tried.

Given the situation, there was only one way that Testarossa could do.

(Good grief. I didn’t expect that Velda is such an existence. However, well, we had accomplished the supreme command we received from Rimuru-sama to break the heaven gate, it could be said the plan is a success. If it’s Rimuru-sama, he would have started with the next plan I guess, so I should earn some more time――）

Since she would lose even if she fought, there was no other way but to earn time by conversation.

For Testarossa, death wasn’t something to be afraid of. After hundreds of years, or even after thousands of years, it would be possible for her regenerate with some of her memories and ego. But, when she thought that the comrades she knew might not exist in that era, she felt a bit lonely……

(Fufu, that’s funny. For me to feel lonely…… Is this what they called a sentiment, I wonder? Well, whatever……)

Testarossa switched her thoughts and began to stall for time by verbal attacks.

「There is no feelings and no souls either. You two are moving sophisticatedly for a hollow doll. However, it’s hilarious――」

Testarossa said those words pompously, watching for their reaction.

Talking like this would be meaningless if their memories were just reproduced, but Damrada and Kondou had their memories altered. Testarossa was aiming at the inconsistency in it and saw their reaction.

Although those two were like robots without emotions, “Won’t they get confused due to the inconsistencies as they are precise machines?” so Testarossa had such a prediction.

「Hilarious……? What do you mean, young lady?」

Damrada asked calmly.

Moreover, the one who answered was not Testarossa, but Kondou.

「It’s simple. This demon (Carrera) seems to have taken over my ability――even my soul. But, I don’t have memories of it. The person I have given my soul to is hostile against Velda-sama with some kind of goal. Guessing from the circumstances, it would be natural to think that some part of my memories was inconveniently rewritten. Don’t you think so too, Damrada?」

「――that’s, isn’t it possible that our souls were stolen?」

「No. I won’t allow such unsightly conduct.」

Kondou declared confidently.

Damrada also nodded. Although he said it himself, he understood that it was an unlikely thing to happen.

「――I, I guess so. This girl had succeeded my techniques and used it perfectly after all……」

Damrada agreed to Kondou’s explanation.

Testarossa looked at Kondou with a slightly surprised expression.

Because Testarossa was impressed by Kondou who had analyzed and explained the current situation perfectly in such a short time since he was created.

(This man is frighteningly calm. There are things that only Carrera acknowledges――)

However, at the same time, Testarossa realized from looking at Kondou’s clear eyes that even if she thrust many contradictions to him, he wouldn’t be confused or change sides.

「But, does it matter? Don’t worry about it, Damrada. We just need to carry out the mission given by Velda-sama.」

As Testarossa thought, the man reproduced from Kondou’s memories pointed the muzzle of his gun towards Testarossa without hesitation in his eyes.

(Hmph. I thought that I would able to earn slightly more time, but it was meaningless, I guess. Rimuru-sama, it doesn’t mean we’re dead. Please――give us your forgiveness……)

Testarossa stood proudly till the end.

Her mouth took the shape of a crescent moon and sprouted a charming smile.

Although she did everything she could, she concluded that it seemed that she ran out of time. However, rather than given up, she concentrated her consciousness in order to activate the Secret Technique of Reincarnation[4] with her strong will and pride as the strongest Devil Lord in her heart.

However, the Secret Technique of Reincarnation was never activated. That was because it was no longer necessary.

The last struggle Testarossa had done was not pointless.

One shot was fired.

Kondou’s bullet was strong enough to annihilate even a Devil Lord whom surpassed awakened demon lords as it housed overwhelming killing intent that wouldn’t allow evasion or defense. Exactly at the moment when the assassin’s bullet broke through Testarossa’s『Multiple Barrier』――

「Kufufufufu. Testarossa, you’re not permitted to die without permission. Rimuru-sama will be angry, you know?」

The bullet was stopped exactly in front of Testarossa.

A smiling Diablo suddenly appeared and stood next to Testarossa, while holding the bullet with his fingers.

「Diablo, you were late you know? I didn’t plan to die, but it was just one step before I got annihilated, you know.」

「Kufufufufu, excuse me then. However, didn’t you ladies proceed without permission after destroying the heaven gate?」

Testarossa lightly shrugged her shoulders to Diablo’s inquiry and changed the topic.

「So, may I leave those two to you?」

「I’m afraid to say, it might be hard for me alone. However, there’s no need to worry. Because it isn’t just me who came to this place after all.」

「Could it be, Rimuru-sama too!?」

「No. It looks like Rimuru-sama will come after the removal of the flying insects is confirmed. Therefore, I wanted everything to be over until then though……」

Diablo looked at Damrada and Kondou and smiled wryly.

He glanced to look at Velda who fired lights towards Milim.

「Kufufufufu. As expected, they’re fast. It seemed those people have arrived. However, everything is going as planned, I suppose――」

「What?」

Immediately after Testarossa responded to Diablo’s mutter, an explosion occurred centered on the place where Milim was.

Kondou withdrew to the rear while being cautious of Diablo and Damrada also moved instantly in front of Velda to protect his master with his body as a shield.

Looking at the unexpected explosion, Velda slightly clicked his tongue and grumbled 「More hindrances are coming……」.

「See? Because you ladies are slow in breaking the gate, other people have arrived. Although if its just me I would have been defeated, so I won’t complain only for this time.」

The people Velda grumbled as hindrances and the other people Diablo mentioned were needless to say……

Appeared besides and in front of Milim were figures of five people―― Guy and Chloe, also the three “True Dragons”.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Velda glanced at Guy and the others unpleasantly.

And then, he opened his mouth.

「Geez. Because you came together with everyone, does this mean you’re going against me? Hey, Velzard?」

Instead of Veldora and Velgrind who he couldn’t connect his thoughts with, Velda questioned Velzard who had been under his control in order to ascertain her intention.

「Silence. You’re an imposter who impersonates my Aniue. Now that you mention it, why did I ended up thinking that a bastard like you is my Aniue…....」

Velzard cut down Velda’s question and clearly showed her hostile intention to him.

Velda’s domination on her had already been lifted off by Guy and lost its effect, now, there were no more gaps inside her heart to be taken advantaged by control type ability.

, Velda sighed and shrugged his shoulders.

He annoyingly said「You all really are troublesome」, and his mouth curled wickedly as he thought of something good.

「That’s right, I shall call out a person you all dearly missed. I’m kind after all.」

While speaking so, he took out the last memory orb from his pocket.

「Guy!」

「As if I will let you!」

Guy reacted to Milim’s shout and unsheathed his sword with great speed to attack Velda.

While evading the attack easily, Velda said「You’re too slow.」 and laughed.

「Hey, it seems the angels below have been destroyed just at the right time. Energy started to fill up the heaven. With this, it looks like I can create the strongest one with all the power left from the angels. All of you are excited too, right? Enjoy the reunion you all yearn as much as possible!」

And then―― a human was created.

「What is this place? Or rather, what happened to yours truly?」

Velgrind turned pale when she saw that person. Guy and Velzard too.

The reason why was that person was Guy’s best friend and the subject of Velzard’s jealously. And also, he was Velgrind’s partner.

That person’s name is Rudra Nasca.

He was the Rudra Nasca who had the memories of his prime when he was still the strongest.

The energy leaked out of the destroyed angels from the surface flowing into the heaven and formed Rudra’s body. It was a tremendous dense energy which easily surpassed Kondou and Damrada who were created earlier.

Velda’s trump card who foresaw the defeat on the surface was now manifested its form.

Three people stood like protecting Velda.

Damrada and Kondou were on his left and right with Rudra in the center.

Confronting them were Guy, Milim and the three “True Dragons”. There was also Chloe and Diablo.

Testarossa retrieved Ultima and Carrera and treated them. She judged calmly that participating in the fight would be pointless because the level of the fight had reached another dimension.

From Testarossa, she could only pray for Diablo and the others’ victory.

However, it was like Testarossa didn’t have any feelings of anxiety and fear.

What could be seen from her eyes was the color of interest.

(Even so…… that Diablo, he stands side by side with those at the top.)

Even Testarossa had no other choice but to admit that those people were called the pinnacles of this world.

Testarossa nodded satisfyingly as she saw her colleague calmly stand beside those people without feeling timid.

She wasn’t afraid of defeat.

She would even overcome death.

And then, she decided that someday―― they would climb and reached the top too.

And now――

Each of them ascertained their prey and the fight began.

* * *

[1] 頂上決戦 Chōjō kessen. There are a lot of alternatives for the title, Final Decisive Battle/ Final Great Battle/Greatest Decisive Battle/ Climactic Battle/Summit Battle/Peak of the Decisive Battle/ Final Battle for the Top/Summit Showdown/Final Showdown/ Peak Decisive Battle/Ultimate Match/ Top Decisive Battle etc etc. Which one do you guys think is the best for the chapter title?

[2] 崩拳Hōken, Crushing Fist, Demolition Fist.

[3] Ed note: This is wrong on so many levels...Trying to get the daughter to bear a child to turn into her mother...yep, crazy all right.

[4] 輪廻転生の秘義 Rinnetenshou no Higi.

P.S. Lucia's Raphael uses a different Kanji from Rimuru's. Wisdom and Knowledge might be similar but not really the same thing imo.





Chapter 241: Final Decisive Battle - Part 2


Guy was the one who moved first.

He casually moved to slash Velda like a frame-by-frame from a stop-motion animation.

Damrada and Kondou moved to stop it, but Veldora and Diablo also reacted.

「Kufufufufu. Veldora-sama, I can deal with them alone if it’s these people, though?」

「Kuhahahaha, what are you saying? No need to hold back, let me help you too!」

As if he was getting impatient, Veldora insisted to Diablo who coolly smiled.

For Veldora, his true intention was that he didn’t want to be near his sister――Velgrind whose complexion changed since she saw Rudra. Therefore, he had to have an opponent by all means.

「Then, Veldora-sama――」

「Hmm. That guy in military uniform was the man who bombarded me with bullets. I shall pay him back and be his opponent here.」

「I see, in that case, I shall be the opponent of the other one.」

After the brief exchange of words, Veldora and Diablo moved simultaneously.

Damrada and Diablo exchanged blows.

With a saber[1] in his right hand and handgun in his left, Kondou attacked Veldora.

The shock waves generated by their intense clashes shook the heaven.

And then, the two pairs ascertained each other’s prey and left the place.

Looking at them with a sideways glance, Velgrind started to ponder.

Both Damrada and Kondou had served as Emperor Rudra’s trusted retainers for a long time. Therefore, Velgrind also knew the two of them very well, even their characters and abilities.

They had unprecedented power with a human body and not the type of people who would be arrogant and careless.

They were certainly a threat as the two of them had obtained power far transcending awakened demon lord.

However――

「Veldora, I won’t have any mercy on you if you let your guard down, you know!」

So, Velgrind called out to Veldora before changing her line of sight to Rudra.

Although they certainly were powerful, their power hadn’t reached the level of a “True Dragon” yet. She believed that she didn’t need to worry if Veldora fought one of them.

(However, if he fights horribly, I’ll punish him.)

So, Velgrind moved while thinking about things that would make Veldora shudder.

At the moment when Guy tried to swing his sword down towards Velda, a sword of light came interrupting from the side and stopped the sword.

It was the deed of the man who stood in front of Velda, Rudra.

As they were, both of them shifted their position to cross their swords and swung it fluently.

Both of them didn’t carry a shield as they were in a stance of complete attack.

For them, their swords were their weapon and shield.

「Hee, interesting. It seems your skills aren’t getting duller, Guy!」

「Skip your blabbering, a fake like you won’t bother me!」

The two of them shouted and struck each other with full power blow.

That blow had power enough to deliver a deadly blow. However, both of them skillfully parried it off and were unable to deal any injury on their opponent

Astonishingly, the fake Rudra had become an embodiment of perfect strength.

The proof was that the fake Rudra had complete control of the temporary body which condensed from a tremendous amount of energy.

It was an unbelievable thing for Velgrind, but the fake Rudra’s strength rivaled Guy.

「Guy, I’ll assist you!」

「Idiot, don’t come hereーー!!」

It happened in an instant.

At the moment Velgrind tried to slash the fake Rudra with her Godspeed Saberclaw[2] to assist Guy with her claws which turned into swords.――she felt a terrible pain in her arm.

(Impossible!? I felt pain even though this body has『Pain Nullification』!?)

Astonished, Velgrind leaped back.

「Heee, My skill has gotten duller. I intended to chop off your neck though. No, I guess you have become stronger―― Right, Velgrind?」

For the first time, Velgrind stared at the fake Rudra.

That young man ought to be an imitation of Rudra in his youth.

Even Velgrind’s eyes couldn’t distinguish the fake in front of her with the real one, as it had completely reproduced his strength down to his roughness……

(Impossible. I cared for you till the end, Rudra……)

「….. You are a fake!」

「Haa! Don’t make me laugh, Velgrind. I’m the one who decides that. I’m a fake because I have no soul? I’m a fake because I got revived? I’m a fake because I’m being controlled? All wrong. I become a fake when I admit I’m a fake and my Will dies. I’m alive, you know? I’m thinking, choosing and moving on. I’m me and nobody else! You know that right, Velgrind? Okay, I will admit that it’s true I have died once. Therefore, I will start over from the beginning. I will beat you guys once so you guys will acknowledge my greatness. Then, I’ll make you guys my companion. I’m the man who will eventually conquer the world. That is my promise with “Stellar Lord Dragon” Veldanava who is also my master after all.」

He laughed off to Velgrind’s shout.

And then, Rudra erased his sword of light, the materialization of his aura and smiled fearlessly.

「It will be rude for me to fight with such a toy, right. I will show you what I’m made of.」

Saying so, he held up both of his hands and muttered『Divine Sword Summon[3]』.

At that moment, the time-space between Rudra’s hands cracked and a radiant sword manifested.

Looking at that, Guy’s red eyes kindled with joy and he smiled deeper.

In shock and confusion, Velgrind took a step back.

Then, while showing a smile to Guy, Rudra held up his sword and said.

「Let’s settle our fight for sure today, Guy!」

「Humph. That's just what I wanted, Rudra!![4]」

What is Divine Sword Summon? It’s a ritual to bring out the sword he used against his opponent only when he got serious.

For him to be able to summon the sword which chose its owner――Divine Sword “Star[5]"―― regardless whether the man in front of his eyes is a fake or a real one, he probably has a similar Will to Rudra who was Guy’s friend.

(Even after dying, you are still going to stand before me and get in my path, heh? You probably won’t let me quit when I’m ahead; you truly are a guy who hated losing.[6])

Guy was happy and couldn’t hide the smile sprouting on his mouth.

Guy already didn’t care about Velda and other things and immersed himself in his fight with Rudra.

And, Velgrind too―― she decided to watch over the two of them.

The rule agreed upon between Guy and Rudra from a very long time ago didn’t permit Velgrind and Velzard to interfere in their fight.

While Velgrind was watching, their fight grew fiercer……

　　　　　　◆◆◆

Velzard also felt a similar shock like Velgrind.

However, she was Guy’s partner so it could be said the shock she felt was smaller than Velgrind.

More importantly, thanks to the bonds with Guy she felt earlier, she never got agitated when she saw Rudra.

Velzard was treating Milim’s injury indifferently without showing astonishment on her face.

She looked at Chloe who before she noticed was confronting Velda and stalling with her swordplay.

Milim’s injury was not as bad as she expected, so Velzard was relieved that Milim would recover soon at this rate.

「Sorry, I’m okay now.」

As Velzard expected, Milim recovered immediately.

Moreover, even though she was completely unable to compete with Velda just a while ago, Milim tried to rush towards Velda without learning any lessons from before.

「Milim, is there any chance of winning?」

「Huh? There’s none. But well, I might hit on some kind of idea while fighting, right?」

“Ah, it’s not good” so Velzard thought.

Just as she expected, Milim was being toyed with by Velda.

「Grrr, you agile bastard!」

While Velzard was watching, it seemed Milim was refining her fighting spirit steadily, even while she was cursing, but……Her energy didn’t increase greatly as Velzard imagined.

Although it was larger than an awakened demon lord, it was only 10% compared to a “True Dragon”.

(――That’s odd. Compared with the enormous energy she had when she fought Guy, I think Milim’s current strength is too small though…...)

Guy and Rudra were fighting equally.

If Velzard got in the way, she would obviously incur Guy’s wrath, so she couldn’t do anything but to leave them be.

It seemed her younger brother, Veldora, had become very impudent and stubborn before she noticed, but she decided that it would be alright to ignore him.

Moreover, because Guy and Rudra began immersing themselves in their fight, Velgrind could afford to pay attention to Veldora and others. Even while watching the two fight, Velgrind is preparing in case of an unforeseen situation.

Looking at that, Velzard judged that it would better to leave it to Velgrind in case anything happened.

The problem was Velda.

As one would expect of Chloe, she was cautious and devoted herself to a wait-and-see approach. Carefully and calmly, she seemed to be measuring Velda’s strength.

On the other hand, Milim was reckless as she kept repeating her suicidal attacks.

Velzard was helping Milim with defense by putting up her shield to prevent the attacks towards Milim, but she would still accumulate some damage.

Although Milim didn’t look like she was holding back, she appeared weaker compared to when she fought Guy a long time ago.

Velzard doubted it.

「Milim, you……」

「MILIM, YOU FOOL! YOU BETTER GET SERIOUS!」

When Velzard tried to say her doubt, Guy shouted as if he lost his temper.

On the other hand, Milim rebutted seemingly unamused.

「I’m going full power! I didn’t hold back, you know!?」

「Idiot. You were stronger a long time ago, you know!? You aren’t using『Wrathful Lord Satanael』, right!?」

「Ugh!?」

Having been pointed out by Guy, Milim’s sight went all over the place for an instant as if to express “I forgot!”.

However, if she were to elude the question, it would hurt her dignity,

「Bu-but! I might not be able to control myself with it. Last time, you and Ramiris ――」

「Jeez! Just do it! Even I have my hands full with this guy as my opponent, you know!? Just hurry up and send that damn bastard flying!」

Guy urged Milim with partly desperate tone.

In fact, both Guy and Rudra’s strength were nearly equal and Guy didn’t have the leeway to talk with Milim.

He could only tell Milim that much and turned towards Rudra.

「Sorry to keep you waiting」

「What, it’s fine. It will be boring unless we fight seriously after all.」

Guy stated his thanks to Rudra who was holding back while Guy was advising Milim.

Rudra magnanimously nodded.

Then, they both struck their swords at the same time and scattered intense sparks.

Velzard sighed after she watched the two in amazement and felt her doubt was cleared.

It wasn’t that Milim hadn’t gotten serious; she just didn’t use her Ultimate Skill.

However, Milim’s words were also correct.

A『Magic Essence Breeder Reactor[7]』that was so strong that Milim couldn’t master it; that was『Wrathful Lord Satanael』’s true identity.

The ultimate power which increased her magic essences steadily by using her intense anger and magic essences as fuel.

The magic essences used as fuel were used and restored[8] to become even more power. It was literally multiplied.

As long as this was activated, Milim’s energy[9] would increase immediately. Furthermore, it wouldn’t decrease even if she kept using it, it was certainly the ultimate ability.

The one who controls infinite power, that is the demon lord named Milim.

Her title as the child of Veldanava was not just for show.

However, Milim had never activated『Wrathful Lord Satanael』at all.

It was only after Guy had succeeded in reproducing the ability when they fought long ago that Milim realized it.

Although Guy had succeeded in reproducing『Wrathful Lord Satanael』with his『Prideful Lord Lucifer』, he gave up in letting such an extremely powerful ability to stay active all the time. He could keep it permanently active at about 40% and using his remaining capacities to utilize other abilities. And, even if he activated the ability in full power while maintaining his ego, the limit would be about 90% from a self-analysis he had done.

However, if it is Milim――it’s an unparalleled powerful ability but if it’s Milim she can control it―― such is Guy's confidence in her.

And, Velzard too remembered the story she previously heard from Guy when she saw the current Milim.

Milim didn’t need to use Ultimate Skill because she possessed enormous energy surpassing awakened demon lord.

If Milim could activate『Wrathful Lord Satanael』, Velzard thought that she couldn’t imagine how high her strength would rise.

(Perhaps, she might be able to embody a strength exceeding even us the “True Dragons” ――)

She came to realize the threat.

However, she thought that it was necessary to defeat Velda in front of her. Besides, if it was Milim, she believed that Milim could control『Wrathful Lord Satanael』completely with her strong will.

As for Milim―― despite having intense conflicts, she understood that her current strength didn’t reach Velda’s.

Therefore, she made the decision to pour her rage into『Wrathful Lord Satanael』.

As if he sensed the sign from Milim,

「Rudra, there’s no time to play around, hurry up and finish it!」

So, Velda shouted.

However, the answer was――

「Shut up, my opponent isn’t so weak that I can win by going half-assed! You should understand that if you are my master! For you to say such foolish words, it seems you are not my master as I expected. However, I don’t care. I’m grateful that you gave me the chance to settle my fight with Guy. So, be quiet. I will do my best to thank you for that. If you understand, then don’t order me around!」

Rudra straightforwardly rebuked Velda.

There was only the matter to settle his fight with Guy in Rudra’s mind.

He was now enjoying his fight with Guy from the bottom of his heart and felt that Velda’s words were nothing more than a hindrance.

Milim’s voice echoed when Velda frowned due to Rudra’s response.

「Sorry to keep you waiting. This time, I’ll go all out for sure!」

Milim stood with bluish-white patterns that looked like dragon scales having emerged on her whole body.

――Enormous amount of aura gushed out from her body which was neatly circulated and formed a defensive membrane to cope with every kind of attacks.

The Dragon Princess[10] Milim Nava had now unleashed her true power.

* * *

[1] 軍刀 Guntou, Military Sword. Refers to sword made to be used by Japanese army and navy after the end of samurai era.

[2] 神速剣爪 Shinsoku Kensō. Sword Claws/Nails/Talons.

[3] 神剣召喚 Shinken Shoukan. Divine/God/Deity Sword.

[4] Bring it on, can be used here too

[5] 星王(スター) Seiou/Seioh (Sutā). Star/Stellar Ruler/King/Lord/Sovereign.

[6] 負けず嫌いな野郎 Makezugiraina yarou. Can also mean Guy calling Rudra a sore loser.

[7] 魔素増殖炉 Maso/Mamoto Zoushokuro. Magic Essence Propagation/Breeder Reactor/Furnace/Generator. A breeder reactor is a nuclear reactor that generates more fissile material (Materials for sustaining fission reaction) than it consumes. In this case, Milim’s skill is a reactor that consumes her anger and magic essences but turned into even more power/energy/magic essences. I'm not a nuclear physicist or any kind... orz

[8] Kanji used here is 還元 Kangen which refer to Reduction (Chemical reaction) can also mean Restoration.

[9] A remainder, energy and magic essence quantity/amount refer to the same thing. 魔素量(エネルギー) Masoryou (Enerugī).

[10] 竜皇女 Ryuu Koujo. Dragon Imperial Princess/Imperial Dragon Princess. 皇女 is like 王女(Oujo) just the first one use the kanji for emperor. Do you guys want to add the Imperial?





Chapter 242: Final Decisive Battle - Part 3


A tremendous impact coursed through Velda’s hand that stopped Milim’s extremely fast sword.

The strength behind the attack was beyond Velda’s expectation and he failed to parry it. The proof of the power was that the Snake Sword used by Velda got destroyed.

When he saw the broken sword in his hand, agitation was shown for the first time on Velda’s expression.

It then became anger.

「Geez, you’re really going to bother me till the end……」

While annoyed, Velda threw surges of anger towards Milim. However, Milim calmly parried that anger. On the contrary, Milim began to pursue Velda who wore an expression that said: “How unpleasant”.

Milim was unconcerned about whatever her opponent was thinking and continuously attacked Velda with strong intentions to crush him.

Her speed increased intensely with every sword stroke and began catching up with Velda’s movement.

Velda was dodging Milim’s slashes, but he gradually lost his calm.

As one would expect, not even Velda could endure Milim’s attacks unarmed.

「How vexing!」

Velda put his hands together and shouted「Divine Sword Creation[1]」.

The space between Velda’s hands shone and a sword was created.

Divine Sword “Abyss[2]”―― it ranked the lowest amongst Divine Swords and Demonic Swords, but it was still a full-fledged God Class Weapon.

Velda could create a God Class armament with his own ability.

And then, the sword dance began.

A disconnected space that would cut anything that came into contact with its circumference was formed due to Velda and Milim’s sword fight.

Milim had finally set foot into the same domain as Velda.

Milim cornered Velda inside the deadly space just for the two of them without room for anyone to interfere, where they put all they got into their deadly sword that would break each other’s『Barrier』with one blow.

While on the other hand, Velda――he felt the signs of his plan collapsing while taking on Milim’s pure will.

He had lost the superiority in war potentials and had now been cornered.

Although he couldn’t kill Milim whom is his capture target, Milim’s greatly increased strength made it hard for Velda to go easy on her.

It didn’t mean Velda was out of options, but his pride hindered him from carrying them out.

However, it seemed it wasn’t the time to say that stuffs with how things turned out now.

Even now, the pressure transmitted from the fierce sword exchanges was increasing even further.

Just like piercing through the gaps of his focus, Milim’s kick hit Velda’s stomach.

(――how troublesome)

Velda changed his thoughts as if throwing them away.

Milim was absolutely necessary for Velda’s goal thus he couldn’t kill her.

Having said that, there was a risk that Milim would eventually gain enough strength to match his if he kept fighting like this.

Moreover……

Whether they were preparing for an unforeseen situation or not, the two True Dragon sisters were glaring at the battlefield. Velzard’s support of Milim earlier was also annoying.

His attacks to disempower them couldn’t completely breakthrough Velzard and Milim’s defenses.

When he glanced to see the battlefield’s current situation, Guy and Rudra were fighting on equal terms.

Damrada and Kondou seemed to be overpowered, meaning that at this rate their defeat was only a matter of time.

(――I guess it’s time. The fight with all of the war potentials has been exhausted, the Great Heaven-Monster War is over.)

As Kagurazaka Yuuki[3]’s last wish, Velda had completely carried out the Great Heaven-Monster War.

He was at a disadvantage in the game, but the result wasn’t out yet.

That’s why Velda came to a decision.

He would unleash all of his power and achieve his goal all at once.

　　　　　　◆◆◆

Diablo calmly took a stance and observed Damrada.

Just with reproduced memories, Damrada could freely use the same techniques (arts) as when he was alive.

It seemed his energy had greatly increased and his Ultimate Gift was reproduced as well.

Even with simple calculations, it could be sensed that his energy was almost twice of Diablo’s.

(Kufufufu, wonderful. He’s perfect as an opponent.)

Diablo was grateful for his good luck.

He devoted himself to train every day to be of use to Rimuru, his master.

Developing a new type of magic or training their combat techniques (arts), such things were what everyone was doing if they were Rimuru’s subordinates.

However, Diablo was different.

He just accompanied Rimuru whom developed new techniques with a flash of inspiration.

However, that wasn’t something that anyone could do. That was because the terrifying power of the new techniques could greatly affect someone even when holding back after all.

Diablo was one of the few people who could participate in such experiments calmly.

Then, while he was accompanying Rimuru in such recklessness, he realized that his magic theory[4] was more refined than before and his strength changed.

Yes―― Someone’s strength wasn’t determined just by the magnitude of their energy.

How it was used is more important.

The most important thing is to eliminate wasteful usage and bring forth the greatest effect even when using a small amount of energy.

It would be a different story if someone had『Magic Power Generator』 which could amplify magic essence endlessly like Milim, but thinking with an out of norm being like her as the base was wrong.

That’s why Damrada was a perfect opponent for Diablo.

From Diablo’s judgment, if he fought both Damrada and Kondou at the same time, his winning percentage was about a bit over 50%.

He could risk his life and put everything he had to see the path to victory by any means.

Unfortunately, he couldn’t carry out Rimuru’s order with that method. That would be pointless.

However, such worries were also unnecessary as Diablo expected.

Veldora and the others had arrived with perfect timing.

(As expected of Rimuru-sama.)

Diablo was satisfied and observed Damrada.

He would be at a disadvantage if he fought both Damrada and Kondou, but if it was just Damrada alone, the story would turn out differently.

Damrada’s energy was nearly twice of his and his combat skills surpassed Ultima.

However, there was no problem at all.

Diablo is a demon, melee combat was no more than mere child’s play for him.

Magic is the basic combat technique for a demon which is a spiritual life-form.

Now that Diablo obtained an Ultimate Skill, his magic has shown further growth.

Even the size of energy is no longer a problem, he could circulate his energy with the highest efficiency to control the consumption―― he produced a fully harmonized effect.

That could also be applied to melee combat techniques.

Diablo parried Damrada’s masterful attacks while supporting his own body by activating partial strengthening.

He compensated for the big difference in energy by offsetting the power and technique behind Damrada’s fists and kicks with his fists and kicks which were strengthened with magic.

That was the completed Magic Melee Combat Technique[5] which combined magic and techniques.

Testarossa and the others were speechless while looking at the combat techniques which were probably based on a new theory.

Even the recovering Ultima was amazed and watched the fight between Damrada and Diablo with intense concentration.

For this reason, Diablo decided to show what he could really do.

「I enjoyed this fight very much. You were perfect as a training partner, but let’s end this soon. I shall show you what I can really do as my thanks for hurting Testarossa and the others.」

Diablo declared the end of the match and refined his magic power to the maximum with ultrafast magic power excitation[6].

Diablo’s energy broke free of its maximum value immediately. He had drawn an equivalent amount of energy to his maximum energy out from Rimuru’s『Nihility Collapse』. Besides that, he absorbed the surroundings’ particles and instantaneously reinforced his body. He reconstructed a strong body that could withstand handling a high amount of energy by taking in the matter from his surroundings.

That was completed in a blink of an eye.

Without any time lag, Diablo transformed into his combat form.

And that was Diablo’s Ultimate Form.

While wearing a cool smile, Diablo dealt with Damrada’s kicks.

Unlike earlier, Diablo easily stopped Damrada’s full powered kicks with one hand.

The reason was simple and clear.

His energy had doubled and it became possible for him to bring out the same strength as Damrada.

However, considering they fought each other evenly when Diablo was at half of his energy, it could be said that the outcome was already clear as day.

「As a human, you were a wonderful expert. If you still had your soul, it might become a more interesting fight. However, that’s nothing more than a ‘what if’ situation. The result won’t change――」

Diablo completely overpowered and crushed all of Damrada’s attacks.

Damrada just indifferently repeated his attacks without emotion.

But, Diablo had read him thoroughly and lost interest in this fight.

「Let’s end this now―― Celestial End[7]!!」

An annular magic circle[8] completely covered up the surface of Damrada’s body.

Without any words.

Without any fear.

Without any grief.

Damrada just quietly became light particles and disappeared.

Then, all of the particles were absorbed into Diablo through the annular magic circle.

At the same time as Damrada disappeared, Diablo released his combat form.

Although he used it composedly, the burden of magic power excitation wasn’t low.

Above all else, Diablo poured the collected energy flowing out from Damrada into『Temptation World』he created. Although he intended to absorb the energy with different quality slowly, handling the energy of『Nihility Collapse』he borrowed from Rimuru at the same time was beyond the tolerable capacities even for Diablo.

In contrast with End of World’s main purpose of large-scale destruction, Celestial End’s main purpose is to convert the target into energy and absorb it.

If you considered the power, End of World was higher, but Celestial End was better as an anti-individual attack.

「Diablo, you――」

Testarossa called out Diablo.

「Kufu, kufufufufu. As expected, I was too greedy to steal the energy…… I’m not good enough….. It seems I’m far behind Rimuru-sama…...」

「What was that technique just now? It looked like magic, but――」

「That’s right. It’s the fusion of Ultimate Skill and magic and its evolutionary series. I learned it while cooperating with Rimuru-sama who had developed it for fun. Because it’s still an incomplete technique, a stable usage is still difficult.」

「That’s not fair, it’s just you who……」

「Kufufufufu, that’s the perks of it.」

Diablo bragged to the bitter Testarossa.

After all, this new technique style was a magic theory created in joint development with Rimuru who Diablo admired.

Although, to be precise, it was Ciel not Rimuru, but that wasn’t things Diablo was concerned with.

「Well, I shall teach you guys once this magic theory is completed.」

In the end, Testarossa and the other two’s pursuit didn’t end until Diablo promised so.

　　　　　　◆◆◆

Veldora was fighting against Kondou.

Velda had said Kondou and Damrada's energy were comparable to 10 awakened demon lords, but the energy didn’t actually reach that number.

From Veldora’s calculation, the power was no more than half of that.

Moreover, the quality of his Ultimate Skill seemed to have degraded, as such, Kondou couldn’t execute attacks as he imagined.

He was also given an Ultimate Gift like Damrada, but that was no more than a mass produced type of pseudo Ultimate Skill. Its crude performance couldn’t be compared with the Ultimate Skill created by Kondou’s soul.

This was the reason why Carrera, whose energy should be overwhelmingly smaller, succeeded in nullifying Kondou’s bullets.

「Tch, this doesn’t work either, huh?」

Kondou clicked his tongue while trying to shoot energy bullets.

As the result of calmly analyzing the combat, Kondou understood that he couldn’t win.

If that were the case, he had no other choice but to fight with the full extent of his power in order to accomplish Velda’s order.

In contrast, Veldora still had strength to spare.

「Kuahahahaa! You seemed to have quite a wonderful personality, but in the end, you’re just a temporary one. It’s reasonable that you are unable to demonstrate your original strength with an imitation Ultimate Gift rather than the Ultimate Skill born from your soul!」

Veldora told Kondou while laughing.

Kondou’s strength was genuine, but his current body was a temporary one. Not to mention, he wasn’t worth considering as he had no soul.

That’s why Veldora did various things such as observation, gathering information and so on

Kondou was a soulless doll given a temporary ego. Even so, he inherited his original self’s advanced combat techniques (arts) and used his Ultimate Skill even though it was a degraded version of it.

Although the concept was different to the pseudo core Rimuru made, it was a very interesting mechanism.

(Fuufuufu, If I were to analyze this mechanism and teach it to Rimuru, he will certainly be grateful to me! As Ramiris’ Shishou, it will be fun to research it together. I’d like to have at least one sample, well――)

As were his thoughts as he ignored the fight.

So, when Diablo easily ended Damrada, Veldora kept fighting Kondou without killing him.

(Hmmm!? That Diablo, it seems he has ended it quickly. Then, if I don’t end this too, the fact that I’m loafing around will get exposed.)[9]

Veldora lightheartedly thought so, but that judgment was a bit too late.

「…… I see. Then, as expected, there’s only one way I shall take ――」

Kondou decided without hesitation and executed it.

Veldora was powerful, and he had realized that he couldn’t win even before fighting.

For him to be able to deal a blow to Veldora’s main body before him while he was still alive was the result of multiple strokes of good luck……

That’s why Kondou faithfully carried out the order.

「――Overdrive[10]」

In other words, it was a self-destruction.

　　　　　　◆◆◆

Velda confirmed that Kondou entered self-destruct mode and muttered「That will do」.

He looked around and smirked.

「What’s so funny!?」

Milim’s sword approached Velda, but it was easily parried by Velda’s Divine Sword “Abyss”.

Velda’s skill had reached a terrifying level to the extent that he could fight several people even with the inferior Snake Sword. Now that the superiority in weapons was gone, Milim couldn’t reach Velda even though her strength had increased.

And, Chloe was also unable to demonstrate her true strength.

There was one reason.

It was because she felt an uncomfortable feeling with Velda’s abilities.

Chloe always acted carefully. She wouldn’t take action like fighting with all her strength so that she could respond in any way depending on the situation.

Her basic style was to fight while using Future Foresight[11] of Ultimate Skill『Time-Space God Yog-Sothoth』.

However, Chloe was unable to recall future memories right now. That meant that even if something were to happen, she couldn’t escape to the past.

(Is there a barrier that impedes certain abilities in the heaven? Or, is it Velda’s inherent skill?)

She verified that the other abilities could be activated without any problem and presumed that it was probably a skill that interfered with movement between space-time.

In other words, it meant that she couldn’t escape from this space with Transfer. Perhaps the only way to get in and out was by passing through the gate.

The angels who were spiritual life-form might have been able to return directly after registering the heaven as their base. However, the intruders couldn’t escape.

(I wonder―― is this some kind of trap to make us unable to escape?)

When Chloe thought so, Velda opened his mouth as if answering that.

「Hahahahaha! As expected of the pinnacle beings of this world. For you guys to oppose me this far. All right, I suppose I have to show you what I can really do soon. However――」

Kondou turned into light particles and became a small round orb.

The light particles were converging towards the center and suddenly reversed.

A small sun appeared in the heaven due to the rampage of super-high dense energy accompanied with intense lights.

「Uohhh!!」

Veldora fully released his magic power to suppress the sun and barely maintained its state just before it exploded.

However, Veldora’s complexion worsened as he suppressed the sun and felt the pressure increasing steadily.

「However―― I shall be the opponent for those who survive this explosion.」

Saying so, Velda embraced Milim forcibly.

「Mnnn, what are you trying to do!」

Milim struggled while shouting, but the jet black chains that came out from Velda’s left hand twined around and sealed her movement.

Dark Nebula[12]――the chains made with dark matter that absorbs all energy.

Even this explosion, even Milim’s raging power, was not enough to destroy these chains. It was God’s Chains that was more powerful than Gleipnir, which succeeded in sealing Dagruel in the past.

With these chains, Milim and Velda would be completely protected from the explosion. However, the other people would be exposed to a direct hit from the explosion. A raging explosion of energy equivalent to 10 awakened demon lords would spread a transcendental destruction which surpassed “True Dragons” even though just for a moment.

Since it was destruction by sheer force, energy greater than it was needed in order to defend against it.

「You fool! If only you ended it immediately――」

Velzard angrily moved.

Before the power suppressed by Velda was unleashed, she intended to cooperate to put it out.

The other people also tried to move at the same time, but――

「Don’t misunderstand my words, okay? The explosion I mentioned is the one I’ll start up over here. Rudra, I wonder why you could defy me, but that doesn’t matter anymore. I wanted to investigate the cause, but you have your work anyway.」

Saying so, Velda looked at Rudra while sprouting a wicked smile.

「It can’t be――you bastard!!」

Guy shouted.

He ignored Rudra and tried to go towards Velda, but he was too late.

「Good bye, Rudra. Star Breaker[13], activate!!」

At that moment, everyone was still as if time had stopped.

Even the explosion from Kondou’s self-destruction was expected to be strong enough to inflict a massive damage even to “True Dragons. If supposedly energy of a “True Dragon” class was to break through its limits and explode…… It was predicted to produce a tremendous destruction beyond imagination.

Moreover, the skill and magic of transfer series were sealed off in this heaven, there was no escape.

Guy, Velgrind, and Chloe, the three of them surrounded Rudra simultaneously. Velzard, who was heading towards Veldora, also turned towards Velda after seeing the demons moving to support Veldora.

And the four people desperately began to offset the energy, but the process leading to the explosion was faster――

「Rudra……」

「Damn it, things turned out like this…… I guess it can’t be helped, Guy. It seems I can’t settle my score with you……」

Rudra helplessly laughed.

And then he muttered quietly「Please survive――」.

Immediately after, Rudra was engulfed in intense lights――

「Veldora, I leave that one to you! Don’t fail, okay!?」

「Kuaaaahahahaha! Of course. If I fail here, I will be killed by my sisters!」

While Veldora’s carefree laughter echoed, a girl appeared among the four people who surrounded Rudra.

「Eh, Sensei――!?」

When Chloe opened her eyes wide in surprise, the energy that should have exploded was subsided into a small round orb on the girl’s palm.

And then the girl broadly grinned and smiled,

「Yo, sorry to keep you guys waiting!」[14]

So, she boldly declared.

* * *

[1] 神剣創造 Shinken Souzou.

[2] 深淵(アビス) Shin’en (Abisu). Both mean the same thing.

[3] 創造主(ユウキ カグラザカ) Souzoushu (Yuuki Kagurazaka). Written as Creator, read as Yuuki Kagurazaka. I prefer Japanese order name btw XD.

[4] 魔法理論 Mahou Riron. You could say his understanding of magic.

[5] 魔法格闘術 Mahou Kakutou Jutsu. Magic Hand-to-Hand Combat Technique.

[6] 超高速魔力励起 Choukousoku Maryoku Reiki.

[7] 星天円環滅覇(セレスティアルエンド) Seiten Enkan Meppa (Seresutiaru Endo). Celestial Ring of Supreme Annihilation.

[8] 円環魔法陣 Enkan Mahoujin. A ring-shaped magic circle/formation.

[9] ED Note: Veldora's new nickname: The Tsundere King of Screw-ups!

Guro: Tsundora still the best.

[10] 自己暴走爆覇(オーバードライブ) Jiko Bousou Bakuha (Ōbādoraibu). Self-Rampage Supreme Explosion.

[11] 未来予知 Mirai Yochi. Future Prediction/Premonition.

[12] 暗黒星雲縛(ダークネビュラ) Ankokuseiun Shiba (Dāku Nebyura). Dark Nebula Shackles.

[13] 星光爆覇(スターブレイカー) Seikō Bakuha (Sutā Bureikā). Starlight Supreme Explosion.

[14] ED Note: Veldora could learn a thing or two from Rimuru's timing.

P.S. Rimuru is referred with female noun (Shoujo).

Also should I just left it as Tenma?





Chapter 243: Final Decisive Battle - Part 4


I ate the mass of energy in my hand with『Soul Consumption[1]』, then stealthily poured and isolated it into my『Imaginary Space』.

It seemed that I had appeared as if I were aiming for the right timing, but obviously, I didn’t.

It was a coincidence.

Even though it might not appear so, I was actually busy with various things.

………

……

…

Since things inside the labyrinth had settled down, I thought that I would also be going to subjugate Velda, but…… For some reason, my energy wasn’t recovering. No, I felt that my energy had decreased rather than increase after the recovery.

I thought it would be risky to challenge Velda like that, so I decided to recover my energy first.

As there were a large number of angels in the sky, I decided to kill and eat them.

It could be said that Kumara had great timing as she returned with Transfer just at the right moment and so we commenced a simultaneous attack.

As the labyrinth army was superior, we were overwhelming in the fight.

Firstly, the subordinates of Kumara’s pets attacked all at once from the surroundings.

As a result, the angel army, which was aiming at the labyrinth’s entrance, fell into disorder and a big gap was made.

The labyrinth army sortied as if not to miss the timing.

After that it became a one-sided fight.

It seemed that it was difficult for the angels, who all united under one Will and turned into a powerful converging fort to deal with attacks from all directions.

The commander seemed to be quite capable, as the angels were shown to be able to denominate into corps and switch to intercepting incoming attacks, but the stumble at the beginning was fatal.

However, there is a problem before that, the differences in an individual’s fighting power was too large.

If I might say so myself, everyone from the labyrinth army was strong.

Among them, Kumara, the four dragon kings, Apito, Trainee-san and her sisters were extraordinary.

Kumara rampaged as if to relieve her stress.

She tore and cut the angels freely with slashing attacks using her tails, with the eight pets spread out to defend her. There was no such thing as letting the enemies live.

From what I saw, the dragon kings were in high spirit.

They used powerful breath and grand magic in their dragon form.

Not only with her individual’s fighting strength, but Apito also commanded her subordinates like her limbs and annihilated the enemies.

There was no other word except brilliant.

They trampled over the enemy with the momentum of one sting one kill through their perfect coordination.

Fused with various spirits, the dryad sisters were strengthened to former demon lord level.

And, the worst case was Trainee-san which had energy comparable to an awakened demon lord.

It seemed that Trainee-san had fused with a Spirit King.

She fired extreme magic with tremendous power in a rapid succession.

Just like that, in a short period of time, the outcome was clear to anyone.

I was also worried at first, but halfway through the fight, I watched while enjoying a cup of black tea.[2]

Well, after all….

No matter how you looked at it, our side’s fighting power was too excessive; any losing factors couldn’t be found.

As expected of the high-ranking war potentials stationed on the 70th floor and below inside the labyrinth. Because they usually couldn’t play an active role, their rampaging appearances when given the opportunity to do so was incredible.

While looking at their appearances, I absentmindedly ended up thinking that it might be impossible to capture the labyrinth even with an army of a large country’s size, but I will keep that was a secret.

Besides of their achievements of repelling the Empire Army, naturally, everyone had become stronger from that time, but……

Once things calmed down, it would be better for me to discuss the adjustment of the labyrinth difficulty.

No matter how you thought about it, it was very unlikely for humans to be able to capture it.

About the battle, when our victory was certain and only the enemy general was left ――

「Ah, Mai-san……」

So Shinji, who had become Ramiris’ subordinate, muttered.

It seemed the enemy’s commander was an acquaintance of his, I heard stories not just from Shinji but also from Mark and Zhen.

The name of the enemy’s commander was Furuki Mai.

She obviously had the energy of an awakened demon lord class and ruled over the angels. However, she was originally a bit stronger than the three of them.

「Was she really just a bit stronger?」

So I strongly asked them,

「Er, umm…… a bit, no, quite……?」

「Well, I have never won against her, but…..」

「……She was absurdly strong.」

「Mai’s ability was the Unique Skill『Traveller[3]』. It’s an absurdly strong cheat ability that allows her to use teleportation[4] to places she had visited once. The combination of her skill and her long-range weapon was ruthless.」

So, the three of them answered evasively.

It seemed that the trio had never won even when together.

From Shinji’s last explanation, it was very unlikely for normal people to win against that skill.

After all, even for me to do teleportation without time lag was impossible unless I combined several abilities.

It was natural that the trio couldn’t win.

She was an ordinary quiet girl and a high school student in Japan.

As one of Yuuki’s henchman, she had adored Yuuki before he became Velda.

「She was very serious. Also, she seemed to believe in Yuuki’s words that he will finalize the『Repatriation Spell[5]』.」

I was told that she seemed to be worried about her younger brother that she had left on the other side and is constantly researching for a way to cross between worlds.

She was like that, but her Unique Skill『Traveller』was restricted to this world and it seemed that she was unable to go to the other world.

However, if she combined her Unique Skill『Traveller』and Yuuki’s『Summoner』, it seemed that crossing to another world wouldn’t be just a dream.

She believed that and cooperated with Yuuki for all this time.

Once I understood that, Shinji opened his mouth as if to say something but then closed it.

Apparently, he had something he wanted to say.

“Hm?” So I thought and called him out.

「What? Is there something you want to say?」

「Ah, well…… you see……」

Was it something really hard for him to say? He stopped speaking halfway through.

「Hey, that’s impossible as expected……」

「…… I also think that’s not good.」

The other two stopped Shinji.

I didn’t know what he wanted to say, but I gradually became curious about it.

「Ah, I’m sorry. Please forget about it――」

「Oh, geez! Can’t you just say it!!」

Because Shinji was hesitating to say it and tried to swallow his words, I decided to forcibly get him to talk.

Then, what he wanted to say was simple.

It was “Please, I want you to save Furuki Mai”.

It seemed they were on good terms among Otherworlders because they came from the same country.

「Sorry, it’s just my selfishness. I do understand that I’m asking for the impossible with it, but――」

Shinji remorsefully apologized.

Well, I was the one who asked him though.

「Wai, wait a moment, Shinji! Even Rimuru can’t do anything about it…… It will incite antipathy from everyone and he will not able to keep his dignity as a Demon Lord……」

When her subordinate started to say something outrageous, Ramiris came panicking to mediate the matter.

Well, I wonder. I thought it wasn’t something to be flustered about to that extent.

After all, I was quite selfish myself.

But, we already knew that, right……

「Hahaha, Ramiris-sama. Our loyalty will not waver by such a thing.」

「That’s right. In the first place, if we cared about such a thing, we would have massacred every hostile. However, that’s not the case, right? That lazy demon lord over there was an enemy we fought until just a little while ago.」

Benimaru broad-mindedly denied Ramiris’ concern and Shuna affirmed Benimaru’s words while looking down at Dino with eyes as if she was looking at trash. (Ed. note: Shuna is scary!)

It seemed even Dino felt uncomfortable with that gaze so he stopped lying down on the sofa and seated himself on a chair. And then, he nonchalantly nodded.

「Oh well, Rimuru wouldn’t mind about such a thing.」

So, he tried to settle it with good vibes but got his head whacked with a tray by Shuna.

It kind of felt like: “You’re not someone who can say that.”, so he reaped what he sowed.

「So, what will you do, Rimuru-sama? Should I order them not to kill her for the time being?」

Benimaru asked me.

Shinji and his group looked with hopeful eyes at me.

There might be no need to discuss it since things had reached this point.

If they were my companions, then they would know my answer even if I didn’t say it.

「Rest assured, Shinji. If she swears not to be hostile towards me, I will save her.」

「Really!?」

「Yes. However, it’s only if she’s not hostile, okay?」

「If so, then no problem. Thank you very much!」

「「Thank you very much!!」」

When I accepted the request, not only Shinji, but Mark and Zhen also said their gratitude.

I wished that they would have said it after I saved Mai.

「As expected of Rimuru! That’s the spirit.」

Ramiris smacked my back while smiling from ear to ear.

What a cheeky fellow.

So I made a promise without due consideration as usual and went outside of the labyrinth to stop Mai.

　　　　◇◇◇

Well, now.

I left the rest of the things to Benimaru and flew towards the sky.

I ordered Diablo who was accompanying me to go ahead.

「Kufufufu, leave it to me. I shall buy time until Rimuru-sama arrives!」

「Yea, I leave it to you. It seems that the heaven gate has been destroyed, but as expected those three wouldn’t be able to defeat Velda after all.」

「Looks like it, this presence is indeed frightening―― I will have to hurry a little.」

Saying so, Diablo transferred and went ahead.

If it was the current Diablo, he would be able to buy some time until I arrived.

I was a bit worried, but I decided to leave it to him.

Either way, it was necessary to buy some more time.

Since my energy was still recovering, I had to absorb a large amount of energy from the defeated angels.

I thought that it would fine if I were to persuade Mai while absorbing the energy.

However, that thinking was naïve.

When I held up my hand and tried to absorb the energy with『Soul Consumption』, the energy quickly transferred and disappeared.

It seemed that the angels were set to return automatically to heaven when they got defeated.

Because it can’t be helped, I gave up on eating the angels and went towards Mai’s position.

Mai was actually strong.

Even though they were fighting as not to kill her as Benimaru instructed, it seemed that no one could touch her.

Trainee-san didn’t participate in the fight, but the dragon kings were no match against her.

That alone was incredible, but it was a surprise that even Apito was being toyed with by Mai.

As expected from someone who had mastered『Teleportation』.

Incredible.

Without losing her spirit even though the angels were annihilated, Mai calmly continued fighting.

She probably had an indomitable spirit. I could understand why Shinji and the others fell in love with her.

Although normally someone would fall into despair in a situation like that, she was still fighting while believing she could win.

Judging from what I saw so far, Teleportation was really troublesome.

Even though Apito was superior in terms of speed, Mai dodged all of Apito’s attacks.

I guess there was no chance of victory for Apito here.

However, Kumara would definitely win against Mai.

But, this time I would be her opponent.

If it was Kumara, she would win, but she would definitely end up killing Mai.

「It has been a while, Rimuru-sama.」

Kumara who noticed me came flying and behaved like a spoiled child.

She’s cute, but currently it wasn’t the time for it.

「Kumara, go deal with the remnants of the angels.」

「Understood!」

Kumara obediently obeyed my order.

It seemed that she was able to relieve some stress with a bit of rampaging around.

Apito, who was fighting against Mai, also noticed my presence and stopped her fight to yield the fight to me.

「My strength was still not enough. I wanted to neutralize her without troubling Rimuru-sama, but……」

Apito frustratingly bowed.

「Don’t worry about it. Even if you assess things just from an energy standpoint, your opponent has more than twice of yours. If you think of it that way, you’re incredible, you know.」

I said so and comforted her.

Apito also joined Kumara, both of them left to deal with the remnants of the angels.

All that's left was for me to persuade Mai.

　　　　◇◇◇

I and Mai faced each other.

Mai readied her bow and glared at me while breathing heavily.

“I see”, she was a beautiful girl.

Her aura was like Shuna’s.

She had a beautiful black hair like a Japanese doll[6] and sharp facial expression.

She retained her dignified appearance and posture even though fatigue should have accumulated.

Her posture was of a lovely, beautiful girl.

However, there were some points to be worried about.

The veins on her limbs were bulging and torn apart here and there making her bleed.

Blood?

《It seems that she incarnated as an angel with a still living body. She probably fused with a seraph without reconstructing her body. It seems her body has begun to collapse as it can’t withstand the energy.》

Ciel answered my question.

There was a limit for a human’s living flesh to accept the tremendous amount of energy of a Spiritual life-form such as Demon and Angel. Not to mention, if it was with the highest ranking angel (Seraphim), they couldn’t endure it unless it was with an awakened and carefully trained body of God-man class[7].

If this girl named Furuki Mai was able to control the seraphim’s power while still in a living flesh―― I couldn’t help but to say that she has a tremendous willpower.

「Nice to meet you, I am Rimuru.」

「――I see, it’s you. My name is Furuki Mai. I don’t have any grudge against you, but I will have you die for Yuuki-kun.」

「Yuuki is already gone, you know? He’s not Yuuki now, he should be calling himself as Velda, though?」

Although her expression moved just for an instant to my question, Mai immediately regained her calmness.

「It doesn’t matter, because I believe in Yuuki-kun. If I defeat you, I can do my research in peace. I have to go back home no matter what it takes. I know that this is for my own egoism, but still, I have to defeat you――」

Saying so, Mai aimed her bow towards me without hesitation.

She should have realized the collapse of her limbs, but Mai stared at me without breaking her concentration even once.

She should have understood that she couldn’t win, but panic couldn’t be seen in her eyes.

“Remarkable”, so I honestly thought.

Mai was quite philosophical for her age.

For one purpose, she threw away all of her hesitations……

Perhaps, she just runs through the path she believes as her only option.

「Although I’ve heard about it once, why do you want to go back?」

「Why, you ask? You ask something strange. Do you think I’m not worried about my family I left behind? Do you think we have to obediently obey orders even though we were summoned to this world without our permission? We’re not treated as a human being and only are seen as a weapon…… It won’t hurt my heart even if such a world was destroyed. I want to return home, that’s all.」

The other Otherwolders quickly abandoned their homesickness, but Mai kept on holding onto it all this time without giving up.

If you think about it, that might be reasonable.

I gave up on it because I died, but that wasn’t the case for the summoned people.

Shinji and his group seemed to have given up easily, but that didn’t mean they had no regrets.

If they could go back, they wanted to go back, there’s probably a lot of people like that.

However, such magic didn’t exist and there was no precedent of it too.

Because every one of them could easily understand such reality, they just promptly gave up.

Mai didn’t give up because of her strong willpower, and she never lost hope because of her skill.

Therefore, I had no other choice but to inform her of the cruel truth.

「That’s impossible for now. Even if someone can come from the other side to this side, a way to go from this side to the other side has not been found yet.」

「I know that! While that may be true, I can’t give up!! Besides, Yuuki-kun will surely find a way to go back. Therefore, I will not give up!」

Mai shouted and fired an arrow

However, it was futile.

I erased the arrow and continued talking.

「Like I said, Yuuki is gone, you know. Velda and Yuuki are different people. Besides……I think the one who summoned you is probably Yuuki too.」

Mai’s movement stopped when she heard my words.

And then, she shook her as if she didn’t want to accept that.

「Shut up! I’ll have to stop you from confusing me. Stardust Rain[8]!!」

She flew up to the corner of my sight and fired her strongest technique while glaring at me.

However, it was futile.

Because any emission type techniques wouldn’t work on me after all.

I sucked all of the arrows into『Imaginary Space』.

Thus, that was the curtain call.

「It, it can’t be――」

Mai dropped her bow in despair.

At last, she noticed the overwhelming difference in strength between herself and me.

「Listen, I don’t have any intention to kill you.」

「……Why……is that?」

「I was asked by Shinji and the others to save you. If they didn’t, I wouldn’t have bothered to go out because it’s cumbersome.」

「Could it be…..!? They were alive, Shinji-kun and the others――」

It seemed Mai receive quite a shock when she heard my words.

Well actually, if I could show the difference in strength like this, she could understand that my words weren’t a lie.

There was no need for me to come out, as it was true that Kumara was stronger than Mai.

「Besides, certainly that it’s impossible to cross over between the worlds. But, you see, that’s just for the time being.」

「――Huh?」

「In the future, depending on the research, it might be possible to find a passage to another world, don’t you think? “Souls are circulating back and forth, aren't they?” such is my partner (Ciel)’s reasoning, I think the possibility isn’t zero, you know?」

「Is that... true…..?」

「At least it will be more reliable than leaving it to Yuuki. You can research it yourself, after all.」

When I stated so, Mai stared at me with eyes full of surprise.

Did she also receive a shock because I told her that she should do the research herself instead of leaving it to others?

「…… Even so…… I... can’t go back anymore. I accepted this power, I ended up accepting it. I believed in the small possibility that I can warp with the tremendous amount of energy…… the result was a failure. My body is starting to collapse as it can’t endure the angel’s power. The only way left is to believe in Yuuki-kun――」

Ahh, she noticed it, didn’t she?.

Evolving『Traveller』with the seraphim’s power she got and did a dimensional warp. That was probably Mai’s aim. However, she failed to acquire the ability to warp between dimensions and was left with the only way which was to believe in Yuuki.

Thus, she was someone who got deceived by Yuuki from the start.

That means……

「Let me ask this just in case, did Yuuki say something like ”You may be able to go back, I think? There’s a possibility that your skill will evolve by fusing with an angel. However, the power is too strong and it might hurt you―― So, I don’t recommend it, but what will you do?” to you? Also, don’t tell me that you are fighting right now to return the favor to Yuuki?」

So, I said what I thought directly.

Mai’s reaction was dramatic; she opened her eyes wide and just stared at me without saying anything.

It seemed I hit the bullseye as that was probably similar to what Yuuki told her.

「Hey, hey…… As I expected. That’s a trickster’s modus operandi, you know――」

Offering an incredible offer and made the other party compliant to them, that was exactly an old trick used by a trickster.[9]

There was a catch behind the tempting offer and they wouldn’t encourage people to take the offer.

It looked like they were giving options to the other party, but the other party actually only had one option to take.

It was truly a shrewd trick.

「Now that you mention it……」

「Well, I think those who got deceived are at fault. From now on, you’d better not just relying on someone but also properly try to confirm things with your own thinking.」

I unintentionally ended up reprimanding Mai.

It had no persuasive power at all since that came from me who always leaves things to other people, but Mai didn’t know me well so she took my advice to heart.

Mai courageously held back her tears and frustratingly bit her lip.

「I understand what you're saying. There seems to be no point for me to be hostile to you. Either way, there is no chance for me to win…… You could say it as my last selfishness, but may I ask you to deal the final blow and put me at ease?」

Mai told me so and smiled fleetingly.

She probably lost the willpower to live as she had lost her hope.

「Like I said, search for the way to go back yourself. It’s too early to give up, don’t you think?」

「……But, I can’t hold much longer. My body’s collapse is――」

「Ah, I forgot.」

I said that and embraced Mai’s body.

And then, I thoroughly ate the seraphim that had fused with Mai’s body with『Soul Consumption』.

Seraphim had already been analyzed, so the work was completed instantly.

Unfortunately, I didn’t recover as much energy as I imagined, but I deemed things acceptable as I got to analyze『Traveller』without Mai’s permission.

Something like an unrestricted teleportation was an excellent super rare skill among Unique Skills. Even without my instruction, Ciel-sensei the Skill Mania[10] won’t be silent.

(How’s the analysis?)

《Completed successfully, acquired『Teleportation』from『Traveller』.》

Hmm? As expected of Ciel-sensei.

Mai also noticed that I had eaten the angel.

She lost the ability to fly and naturally held onto my arms.

「Ehh!? What happened!?」

As such, Mai got flustered and her face turned red.

「Apito!」

「Present――」

I called Apito and handed over Mai who was in my embrace to her.

「I don’t think that the collapse of your body can be healed with potions, but if it’s Shinji, he could heal it. You should ask him to get it healed.」

Mai was surprised and repeatedly opened and closed her mouth, but she looked at me as if she changed her mind.

Moreover, for some reason, she had an expression that showed “disappointment and unsatisfied”.

But, she was determined on something――

「Thank you very much! I will never forget this favor for as long as I live, and surely, I will find a way to go back!」

She declared that to me with a strong determination.

That would do.

As long as she had a goal in life, she would be free from despair.

I thought that it would be better for her to live straightforwardly towards her goal rather than having a grudge towards Yuuki.

I nodded back to Mai and sprouted a small smile.

“What is with her gullible personality that believes me so easily like this?” that was what I was worried about inside my mind, but some things are better left unsaid.

「Take her away」

「As you wish, my lord.」

Thus, I gave the order to Apito.

Apito respectfully bowed towards me and left to take Mai away.

Thus, the angel army that invaded the surface world was exterminated completely and our total victory was settled.

* * *

[1] 魂暴喰 Tamashii Boushoku. Boushoku (Lit. Violent Eating) can mean Gluttony, Engorge, Voracity. (Cause I didn’t think I left a footnote for it before)

[2] ED: Tip in war: enjoy black tea wherever, whenever.

[3] 旅行者(トラベラー) Ryokōsha (Toraberā). Same meaning in kanji and katakana.

[4] Reminder to self 瞬間移動 Shunkan’idou (Instantaneous Movement/Transfer) Teleportation is advanced version of 転移Ten'I (Transfer). No time lag at all, while normal transfer has some time lag.

[5] 送還術 Soukan Jutsu. Return Home Technique/Arts/Spell/Magic/Way/Method.

[6] Like this: https://1.bp.blogspot.com/-GriyzNA3clo/W8iyJEMm_ZI/AAAAAAAAAu0/4npr8waeYx8UlzgVSMAvKrgMGVhcHFc7ACK4BGAYYCw/s320/img_0.jpeg

[7] 神人級Shinjin-Kyū..

[8] 星屑の流星雨(スターダストレイン) Hoshikuzu no Ryuuseiu (Sutādasuto Rein). Stardust Meteor Shower/Rain.

[9] https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Confidence_trick.

[10] スキルマニア Sukiru Mania. XD





Chapter 244: Final Decisive Battle - Part 5


So, I worked hard like that.

I hope that all of you would understand that I was never slacking off.

Velda was surprised by my appearance.

That was understandable.

After all, I appeared with『Teleportation』that I just got a while ago.

At the same time I acquired it, Ciel incorporated it into『Void God Azathoth』.

It seemed Mai could only go to places she had been to before, but that was her limit as a human. That couldn’t be helped since a human’s ability to grasp space heavily relied on their eyesight.

However, I could grasp a huge amount of spatial information, including with Observation Magic. That meant that I could teleport to places that I could recognize.

I could learn about the situation through Diablo and Veldora-san’s eyes now. That was the reason I could easily come to this place.

I looked at Velda who was wary of my arrival and showed him a fearless smile.

It was to provoke him.

With that, it would increase Velda’s wariness towards me. In that opportunity, I prepared myself in order to bring down Velda.

Before Velda rushed into action, I absorbed the energy I had suppressed.

I was fortunate that my energy recovery couldn’t catch up and steadily absorbed it into my『Imaginary Space』. In there, Ciel-san diligently converted it into energy I could use.

Thanks to that, I greatly recovered from my low energy state and it seemed to be enough to fight Velda.

I guess you would never know what could turn out to be a fortunate situation.

By the way, I found out the reason why my energy didn’t recover when I came to this place.

The culprit was probably Veldora-san.

I think he created『Clones』and rampaged around.

It seemed he could replenish his energy through the “Soul Corridor” from me, no mistake about that.

I thought so, but…...

When I confirmed that with Ciel while being amazed, I heard a surprising answer.

《That’s right. In addition, a bit of it is also flowing into Diablo and Benimaru. More energy was used than expected for Velgrind's Skill Evolution.》

She replied in a carefree way like “And so, what about it?”

Because she said it too smoothly, I was stuck on how to reply to that.

No, no, she used my energy without my permission though……

However, even if I wanted to complain, it was true that I was helped by the low energy state due to her doing.

There was a heap of stuff that I wanted to say, but I gave up complaining.

Or rather, perchance….. Even this situation was within Ciel-san’s expectations?

No, no, no, there’s no way. I might indeed just be overthinking it.

It couldn’t be, right?

There was no way she could predict things that far and predicted what kind of plan Velda would take either.

《I have confirmed the phenomenon of energy returning to Heaven[1] when the angels were defeated in various places.》

Yeah. I knew that.

《I have predicted that the most efficient way to use the energy of the angel gathered in the Heaven is to make all of the energy go berserk. Therefore, as the countermeasure for it, I have persisted your state of energy exhaustion.》

Well, you said it so easily, but…… that, wouldn’t that be a big problem if you misread things?

Moreover, Velda might absorb all of the energy and super-powered up[2] himself.

I couldn’t possibly fight Velda in an out of gas state like that, what were you going to do if the energy didn’t recover smoothly?

《He can’t do such things as super-power up. He wouldn’t be struggling if he could power up himself that easily. Well, even if he were to super-power up himself temporarily, there would be no problem. I don’t think that My Master would lose in low energy state, but just in case, it was possible to forcibly retrieve Veldora and Velgrind back to recover about 60% of the energy instantly. So, there’s no problem.》

Ah, I see.

She declared that super-strengthening was impossible, but what about me?

Am I an exception?

…… I felt Ciel-san had overestimated me too much.

Ciel-san is the “If she says she’ll do it, she’ll do it” type.

So, she generously distributed the energy at a fast pace.

Since Veldora-san and Velgrind were also recovering their own energy, certainly, it would be the best idea to have them cooperate with me in the worst case situation.

Whether I would get their approval or not would become the problem, but I felt relieved to know that such way was available.

I felt I got to see a glimpse of Ciel-san’s scary side, but my doubt was cleared.

What’s left was only to defeat Velda.

Also, before that……

I examined the orb remaining in my left hand.

When I finished absorbing all of the energy, it seemed only the core remained.

It resembled the pseudo-core I made, but the concept seemed to be quite different.

What’s this――

「Yo! I thought it was the end but I didn’t think that I will survive in this form, you know? Although I can’t really say that I’m “alive”. Hahahahaha!」

It talked!?

I stared at the orb in surprise.

Even though it had no vocal cords, it seemed to produce sounds by vibrating the magic essences. It was a very skilled orb.

「Rudra! You are safe……it doesn’t seem so, but you were safe?」

Although Velgrind found herself stuck for words, she still asked the orb.

Hmm…… This orb, is Rudra?

I felt his character was completely different from the Rudra I knew though…..

「Hah! Well, being tenacious is my forte after all!」

No, no. Even if you called yourself as tenacious, your status as an orb was hard to be said as alive.

At the moment I tried to do a carefree tsukkomi like that――

Velda instantly closed the distance and came to slash me.

However, I didn’t let my guard down even while talking, I kicked up the sword stuck in the ground, wielded it in my right hand, and I stopped Velda’s sword with it.

「Naïve! I don’t underestimate you that much that I will let my guard down in this final stage, you know!」

I didn’t want to compliment him, but it can’t be helped as it was true.

Velda was indubitably the strongest person as far as I knew.

Judging from a brief look just now, his power was rising tremendously. I felt Guy’s almightiness and Milim’s strength, and the energy of “True Dragon” level.

I also thought whether to attack him in the gap while he was wary of me, but stopping was the right decision. As expected, this guy wouldn’t let his guard down, so I had to deal with him carefully. Besides……I had just one concern.

Since there was such a concern, I couldn’t possibly do something such as letting my guard down.

I exchanged several blows with Velda and took some distance from him.

That just now wasn’t even a warm-up, it was just a playful greeting.

In the first place, I couldn’t get used to fighting using a sword that wasn’t mine as I expected. Or rather, this sword was an excellent weapon and obviously of God class too.

From pure performance, this sword was better than my katana.

Even so, I wouldn’t cheat because the katana I was familiar with was easier to be used.

「Hahaha, You’re not bad. You’re able to handle my sword. However, you still have lots more to work on. Unfortunately, you don’t seem to be my true vessel.」

The orb in my left hand proudly said such an evaluation.

Or rather, what are you?

Because of you, I was fighting Velda with just my right hand. Since the basic is to wield the sword with both hands, I was unfamiliar with fighting only using my right hand.

「What are you supposed to be? The Rudra I know was full of himself because he was an emperor, but you’re above him on that.」

「I see. I did become an emperor, heh? Well, I guess I must have gotten “mellowed out” if I stopped at the status of an emperor though.」[3]

「I don’t care about that stuff and not interested. Like I said, what the heck are you?」

I ignored the complaint of the orb that started to talk about itself and asked the most important thing.

I couldn’t leisurely fight Velda in front of me after all.

「That’s right! You are exactly like Rudra, but I can’t think that you’re just reproduced memories, you know?」

Reproduced memories?

Velgrind’s words piqued my interest.

《Apparently, this orb has the effect of reproducing a dead person’s memories. However, even if it can recreate a personality as close as the original, the soul is a different matter. It should be no more than a copy, but――》

Yeah, it couldn’t be said as reviving someone just by reproducing their memories.

What’s important for a soul is a heart.

「It’s certainly very interesting. The Memory Orb that I made can only reproduce memories. There’s no function such as recalling soul. If that was possible, there was no need for me to do troublesome stuff like this.」

Velda seemed to be interested in this phenomenon as well.

Because he was well informed of the stuff he created, Rudra acquiring freewill itself was impossible.

「Hahahahaahaahaahaa! It’s that, you know. I was super excellent, or something like that I guess.」

Let’s ignore the boastful voice that could be heard from my left hand.

Rudra certainly died.

That was for sure, but……

《――Talking about a possibility, reincarnation may be one of the causes.》

Reincarnation? What did you mean by that?

《Emperor Rudra had his soul torn apart due to repeated reincarnations. It’s possible that torn parts of the soul gathered together and became another soul. Neither an existing soul nor a temporary soul, it has a heart with a high degree of freedom.》

His soul was torn apart every time he reincarnated and gathered as one?

It’s a bad example for an analogy, but is it like the residues of an eraser lumped together to make a kneaded eraser[4], or something like that?

Treating a soul and an eraser as the same might be a problem though.

It wasn’t something you would normally think about, but I could hardly say that’s absolutely impossible.

After all, I got reincarnated as a slime which you would normally consider as impossible.

So, because there was a person with fragments of Rudra’s soul somewhere in this world that the Memory Orb embedded with the memories was able to reproduce Rudra’s will.

In that case――

I suddenly hit on a good idea. And then, I carried out the idea as ordered by my mischievous heart.

「Rimuru, what are you doing!?」

「Hahaa, this is interesting!」

Velgrind confusedly raised her voice.

Rudra felt it was interesting.

I didn’t really do anything great.

I just threw the sword to Velgrind.

I fused the Memory Orb in my left hand with the sword I held in right hand, though.

I embedded the Memory Orb into the base of the hilt of the God Class Sword like a conspicuous shining jewel. Since I fused it so it became one with the sword, the orb part would be as strong as the sword.

If there was really a reincarnated person who shared his soul, that person should be able to draw out Rudra’s abilities by holding the sword.

I made it that way so you could depend on it.

In order to enable him to have conversation with the owner, I had also asked Ciel-sensei to remake and changed Rudra into a pseudo-Manas.

Naturally, the information of the Memory Orb had been analyzed.

「I turned it into Intelligence Sword[5]. Because I fused Rudra’s will and the sword, from now on only someone with the same soul wavelengths as him can use the sword. In other words, the person who has the qualification to wield the sword will be the proof that the person is Rudra’s reincarnation. Interesting, right?」

“Don’t do things as you please!” I thought that she would get angry like that, but Velgrind only took the sword into her embrace and stared at me.

Rudra was laughing jovially.

「Hahahahaha! Is that so, there’s a possibility that I got reincarnated? I see that would explain why I got a free will! It’s certainly interesting.」

So he laughed happily.

Listening to Rudra’s words, Velgrind gave a nod as if to agree with him.

Velda was annoyed, but he glared at with an expression as if he was satisfied with something.

He thought about the reason why his own plan failed and admitted that my――or rather, Ciel’s――deduction was right, I guess.

While Velda’s attention was on the Intelligence Sword, I unsheathed my katana and took a stance.

With this, I could fight seriously.

「However, given that the Will of the super-excellent me remained a whole, I guess the person who might be my reincarnation now would surely be a cowardly fellow. I’m looking forward to our meeting.」

「Fufu, that might be so. The last thing left from Rudra at the end was only his charisma, not even his prided luck remained…… But conversely, that person might only inherit that luck. I want to meet that person if that person exists. Your reincarnation, a cowardly and lucky person――」

Velgrind nonchalantly said.

A cowardly and lucky person――? There was someone who matched that description, but it couldn’t be, right.

Although the person in question had no charisma, that person was compensated with incredible luck though……

I’m sure that the ability that person had is called『The Chosen One』――

It’s a coincidence. I’m sure it’s a coincidence.

I ignored Rudra and Velgrind’s conversation and abandoned any further thoughts.

Fate would decide their encounter and if that person was really Rudra’s reincarnation, they would eventually come across even if I didn’t say anything.

Besides, if my thoughts were right, that person probably wouldn’t be able to run from Velgrind.

Well, it didn’t matter to me.

I guess I did do some unnecessary things, but the rest was their problem

I irresponsibly decided that Rudra and the others’ matter would have nothing to do with me.

Like that, it seemed I had succeeded in buying time.

Velda was too wary of me and only attempted minor attacks.

I easily parried them and waited until the preparation was completed.

Then, finally――

「We did it, Rimuru! I and Gaia completely locked up the Heaven to another space!」

So I heard Ramiris’ shout.

「Alright, good job! With this, we blocked your escape!」

This time for sure, I showed a triumphant smile towards Velda.

It would be meaningless if we cornered him this far just for him to run away.

Therefore, I brought Ramiris and Gaia――”Earth Sovereign Dragon” Velgaia――to the Heaven and asked them to lock this place completely.

It was impossible for Ramaris because she had her own labyrinth, but it was demonstrated that Gaia could create a pseudo labyrinth.

Under Ramiri’s guidance, Gaia’s labyrinth completely covered up this Heaven.

「You bastard, so that was your aim!!」

I could see the color of emotions for the first time in Velda’s expressions.

That agitation was exactly what I intended.

Furthermore, Ramiris and Gaia succeeded in rescuing Milim who got caught.

「Kyuiーーー!!」

「Gaia! When did you become strong like this!?」

Milim was safely rescued and she seemed to be surprised with Gaia’s growth.

「Mission completed on this side, Rimuru! Go on and send that guy flying!」

Ramiris proudly gave the “GO” sign towards me.

In addition to her,

「To be honest, I wanted to do it myself but unfortunately, I can’t win. Rimuru, please avenge me!」

Milim said so.

「Leave it to me. I’ll carve it properly into your body as the reward of laying your hands on my precious friends!」

I raised one hand to answer Milim and declared so towards Velda.

Well then, since all of the trouble was sorted out, let’s end this quickly.

When I thought so…..

A terrific explosion was heard and a corner of the Heaven was blown away.

I was surprised and turned my focus to that direction――

Just as I thought, I saw Veldora-san who became pitch black over there.

* * *

[1] There were two kanji used for Heaven 天上界 Tenjoukai and 天空界 Tenkuukai. Ciel used the first one which can also mean Celestial World, while the other people use the 2nd one which would be closer to Sky World. 天空 Tenkuu mean Sky but can also mean Heaven. I’ll just keep both as heaven.

[2] 超強化 Choukyouka. Super/Ultra/Hyper Strengthening/Power Up/Boost.

[3] Could be a pun. 丸くなった can also mean rounded. It also has the kanji maru in it.

[4] This kind of eraser: (Also known as putty rubber) https://3.bp.blogspot.com/-PwkxXh-aRho/W88u9Bn1s4I/AAAAAAAAAvI/NdI86v0YbM06kAbXNWmj33KYTdRKGT_oQCK4BGAYYCw/s320/eraser2.jpg

[5] 知性珠之神剣(インテリジェンスソード) Chisei Tama no Shinken (Interijensu Sōdo). Divine Sword with Intelligence Orb/Ball/Sphere.

P.S. The person in Rimuru’s mind has a name that starts with a M and end with an i.





Chapter 245: Final Decisive Battle - Part 6


What the heck are you doing……?

When I thought that,

「Guh, Guooh…… Power, I ran out of power at the last moment……」

Veldora-san insisted on something which was no more than an excuse.

I guess he was fine.

Although I didn’t really feel the need to be worried about him, I couldn’t help it considering his usual antics.

He looked awful but there seemed to be no other problems.

That’s right. After all, Veldora-san was the only one who suffered any damage from that big explosion.

Everyone else seemed to be unharmed, what a relief.

Oh well, if it’s Veldora-san, I felt a mysterious reassurance that he would turn out okay even if he was seriously injured.

Since his real body was inside me, it wasn’t an exaggeration.

「What are you doing? Didn’t you boast that you would be fine?」

「Grrr, that’s my line! Why did the “Corridor” suddenly closed even though I tried to suppress the explosion with force!?」

When I asked him mixed with a sigh, Veldora angrily asked back at me.

Corridor…… did he mean the “Soul Corridor”?

《Fufuu. It’s because Veldora had been the one most wasteful with Master’s magic essences. I wanted to teach him a lesson, so I calculated that it will go out of control, but that it would only damage him and closed the “Soul Corridor” at the perfect moment.》

You did what!?

Rather, Ciel-san appeared to be angry for some reason.

Although she had said that Veldora could use it as much as he liked in the previous conversation, what’s with this sudden change of attitude here…...

《In the first place, I’ve been suppressing the usage so that the energy won’t be used inefficiently. In regards to the energy usage, Veldora is――》

「When I saw you absorbing the energy, I thought I wanted to copy it too! Even though it was just a bit more and I would have completed it and powered-up myself too.」

「No, no, I think that’s impossible……」

I guess this is what people would call flabbergasted.

I never told him not to copy someone else, but I wished in this tense situation, he wouldn’t try something that he couldn’t do.

First of all, how can Veldora power-up himself if he didn’t have the ability to convert energy……?

It was a simple task, all he had to do was to suppress and offset it normally; It’s amazing that he could deliberately mess up.

Veldora-san probably tried to blend it with a large amount of energy he tried to draw out from me while suppressing it with his own full power.

Did he assume that by doing that he could forcibly take in the altered energy?

《Not just that, he tried to pour the energy through the “Soul Corridor” when he couldn’t get used to it smoothly. Rather than a power-up, he probably planned a recycling.》

I see……

Certainly, Ciel-san could deal with it easily, but it would be risky if sending weird things became a habit.

She’s right by refusing as she seemed to be conveniently used as someone who took care of things when he was in trouble.

Since he couldn’t deal with it himself, he pushed it to Ciel-san and took the energy as he pleased.

Even Ciel-san would flip out over that.

Though she meant to rake him over the coals, she probably wanted to punish Veldora.

As expected, not even Veldora could deal with it since Ciel-san had done it when he was unprepared for something like that.

Oh well, Ciel-san probably determined the moment when he couldn’t handle it though.

I was surprised that such foolish exchanges were happening without my knowledge.

「No matter how I look at it isn’t that your own fault!」

「Grrr…… It’s not fair that only Rimuru can use such a convenient ability……」

Don’t go “Grrr” at me. Are you a kid!

Oh, well, whatever, his foolishness was quite painful for everyone to see.

「Veldora, you――」

See?

Even Velgrind, who put the sword over her shoulder, is now glaring this way with half-opened eyes, you know?

Also, it’s very scary that Velzard is smiling but her eyes aren’t.

I told that to Veldora through eye contact.

OH NO! So Veldora, whose face turned miserable, seemingly wanted to say.

It seemed he realized that he was getting a bit too full of himself and he looked back and forth between me and his two sisters in panic.

「Well, practice is the key. Even you will be able to use it if you keep doing your best, so be diligent. Therefore, help me to defeat Velda first.」

I decided to give Veldora a helping hand.

My reason was it would be a bother if he ended up sulking, but Veldora-san who was shivering before his two older sisters looked pitiful if I didn’t do anything.

I acted as if this time he just messed up a bit and everything was going as planned from the start.

「Ha…hahaha. I guess so. It seems I have been a bit too overconfident. One has to learn humbleness or something like that, right. Alright, then I’ll return inside and lend you my strength!」

Until the end, Veldora was still glossing over his coolness and returned back inside me as if he was running away.

He owed me one for this.

Since it was a good chance, I decided to make Veldora-san reside inside my katana.

I got Veldora’s agreement and put Veldora who underwent『True Dragon Core Transformation』into the katana.

I didn’t feel like being stingy in this seemingly final decisive battle.

I thought that it was great that I could retrieve Veldora back smoothly since Velda would be very cautious if he were to see Veldora transforming in front of his eyes.

Since I pretended that I retrieved him back because he was hurt, Velda wouldn’t notice the change in my katana.

Veldora-san’s mischievous conducts were surprising, but it might result in something good.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Well, with this, my preparation was complete and I only had to defeat Velda now.

I could ignore the effects on my surroundings since this is in the sky.

If I used my full power on the surface, it would become a serious problem due to environmental destruction.

I cut apart the ocean before; the follow up afterward was very hard.

It seemed that when Guy and Milim fought each other long ago, they ended creating a barren desert.

With that said, the heavens could be said to be the perfect place.

「Hey, need help?」

Guy asked.

I was happy with the offer, but I would be fine alone.

Because I planned to swing Veldora Sword, it would be a big problem if anyone got involved.

「No, I alone am enough. However, since I’m planning to unleash a bit of my full power, it would be quite helpful if you help Ramiris with the barrier. I don’t want Velda to run away from this place and just want things to be absolutely ensured.」

「Oh? You’re quite confident. Okay, leave that to me.」

Guy nodded and began to help Ramiris in reinforcing the『Different World Barrier[1]』that covered up the heaven.

「I’m counting on you, Rimuru!」

Milim looked at me with eyes full of anticipation and following after Guy, she started to pour her power into Gaia who was in her embrace

It seemed that she was helping with the barrier’s reinforcement.

「May fortune smiles in your favor, Rimuru-sama!」

Diablo encouraged me while he was tending to Testarossa and the other two.

「Let’s finish this quickly and rebuild our country.」

「Kufufufufu, I’m looking forward to it.」

「If by any chance I got defeated――」

「Surely you jest. It’s impossible for Rimuru-sama to lose.」

Diablo declared so with a tremendous faith.

I didn’t have any intention to lose, but my victory wasn’t guaranteed either……

Diablo didn’t seem to think that I could lose at all.

「Sensei――」

「I’ll finish everything. It seems I can finally save you.」

「I…… Sensei…… If Sensei looks about to lose――」

「Don’t worry. It’s impossible for me to lose, you know? Whether that’s true or not, I’ll prove it right away.」

I cheerfully quoted Diablo’s words and Chloe finally smiled.

「Yes. I'll be waiting for it.」

I could feel the strength behind her words that she would be waiting for me as her tense expression seemed to soften a bit.

I was worried about Chloe who was kind of unstable, but she would be fine now.

Guy, Milim, Ramiris, Chloe, Diablo and Testarossa and the others had their eyes glued to me while Velzard and Velgrind, the True Dragon sisters, and Velgaia were as maintaining the『Different World Barrier』

Everyone’s gazes were concentrated on my back and I raised one hand to answer it.

I maintained my gaze to Velda.

「Sorry to keep you waiting. Well, let’s get started.」

「…… Shut up. Don’t get full of yourself just because you won over these crowds. It’ll be easy for me to massacre all of you if I get serious.」

「Ah is that so. I think it’s impossible, but try it if you can.」

My and Velda’s sights intersected simultaneously with my katana and his sword.

At that moment, a clear sound echoed in the place as a severed tip of a blade flew into the air and stuck on the ground.

Velda’s face was dyed with shock.

Naturally, it was because I slashed Velda’s sword with my katana. Moreover, the shockwaves caused by my surging slash blew away half of the remaining castle.

The delayed echoes were the sounds of the destroyed castle crumbling.

Let’s deliver the final blow on Velda with the sounds as his requiem.

Velda created a new sword without panicking.

It was impressive that he immediately regained his calm, but it had been proven before that his sword was no match against Veldora Sword.

I swung the katana and slashed through Velda’s sword again.

I thought it was amazing that he could create many God Class swords, but even I could do something similar. It wasn’t an ability that needed to be fussed over so much.

「It can’t be….. Although mine is ranked the lowest, it’s definitely a God Class sword――No, what is with his sword? Impossible…… Could it be a Genesis Class[2]!?」

He seemed to finally have noticed it.

About my katana, Veldora Sword.

It was my first time hearing Genesis Class or something like that, but I didn’t really care about such a thing.

Its silvery blade is dyed with aura thinly cladding it and emitting jet black radiance. On its blade, the golden blade pattern undulating beautifully, giving off a very fantastic beauty.

It’s really a shame to call a sword with an unserious name as Veldora Sword.

Oh well, Veldora-san’s real form is also jet black-colored and he looks magnificent and beautiful if he shuts his mouth though.

(Hey, did you think of something really rude just now?)

Nope, everything is fine.

I felt like I heard some kind of dissatisfied voice, but let’s not worry about it.

「I don’t know what class this sword is. But it has nothing to do with defeating you! Come now, let’s end our warm-ups and quickly show me what you can really do. I have plenty of time, but they are not for playing with you!」

I declared at Velda as I wanted to finish this soon.

There was no point in playing with him any longer. I thought about going serious soon.

However, I perceived something was wrong with Velda.

「――Kuh, what I can really do, you said? Don’t you dare underestimate me, for I’m the true successor of Veldanava!!」

With an expression distorted by anger and humiliation, Velda brought his hands together.

Then, he shouted「Divine Sword Summon」and a sword harboring ominous power was summoned.

Unlike his previous creations, it was a mysterious sword that clearly was of a higher rank.

「I shall give you my praise for making me take out this sword, my last resort. This Genesis: Veldanava Sword[3]!!」

It was a beautiful sword.

A large long sword with a slightly inward curved blade.

The blade shined with blue glow as if the blade itself emitted the light.

Contrary to its appearance, its mass might be comparable to a planet. It was a cluster of super-high-dense energy.

It seemed to be a Genesis Class thingy he mentioned earlier, so did we became equal in terms of weapon or something like that?

As I expected, it was unlikely for me to win easily, but this was within my expectations.

「Rimuru, it was beyond my expectation that you possess a sword comparable to this one and only Genesis Class, you know. However, since I’ve pulled out this sword, it’s over for you.」

Velda declared with his restored confidence.

Then, he swung down the sword toward me.

His movement was exactly what you would call as Godspeed, it might be impossible to react to it if it was not me.

However―― From my point of view, Velda’s movement was really crude.

Although I said that the warm up was over, is he still testing me?

Or perhaps he underestimated me this late in the game because I was lower ranked than him……

I didn’t mind either way though. Since I would just do what I had to do.

「Too slow.」

I muttered a few words and swung my katana.

Velda hurriedly changed the trajectory of his sword and stopped my katana. However, he was unable to bear with the overwhelming shock wave that occurred when our blades clashed and he was blown away while breaking several piles of rubble as he rolled over the ground.

However, that was strange.

It was certainly a terrifying shock wave, but I only felt like it was a breeze.

Was this guy perhaps…..

Could it be that was his full power?

I thought there was no way that was true and denied that thought.

When I met Velda in the Imperial Capital, I felt a very threatening presence from him.

If we fought that time, I thought that it was very probable for me to lose.

And yet, I didn’t feel the same threat from him now……

《Of course. Master is evolving every day after all.》

To answer my question, Ciel-san declared so as if what she said was natural.

Hey, hey, didn’t you say that super-strengthening or something like that was not possible? And yet, why did I feel like I’m getting super strong!?

《Master is an exception. Plus, there’s an exception even for everything else.》

Isn’t that a double standard!?

For Ciel-san to conclude her explanation with a double standard, how formidable she had become.

「Damn it, if only『Raphael』, if only I got my hands on『Raphael』, I could become the ultimate form!!」

Velda began shouting something he regretted

Raphael? Did he mean the Ultimate Skill that I had?

Ciel-san had said it was unnecessary and erased it after the synthesis, but was it really such an important Skill?

「I had that Skill before, but it’s already gone now, you know? It's unfortunate, but there was no possibility for your wish to come true.」

With the intention to break his heart and a bit of compassion, I cruelly informed Velda.

Our fight’s outcome would be decided by the one whose heart broke first.

Therefore, what I said would become a decisive blow against Velda.

「It, it can’t be!?『Raphael』is gone――? Then, I can’t prove that I’m Veldanava……」

Velda muttered unclear words with his hollow expression.

《How foolish. Even if he supposedly was able to manifest your Skill, it will be impossible for an imposter to be acknowledged as Veldanava.》

Ciel sent her thoughts as if to deal the final blow on Velda.

Could you send your thought to everyone like that? Or rather, what did you mean with acknowledging Veldanava or something like that?

《I just said what was appropriate, please don’t mind it.》

Ehh, is that true?

Ciel-san said that she said that to break Velda’s heart but…… She didn’t hide something, right?

Without my knowing, it seemed the means of communication had increased, Ciel-san was really full of mysteries.

《It’s okay. There’s no problem.》

No, it’s not that…… oh well, whatever.

She might not have lied, but I didn’t think she told the truth either.

「It can’t be, I am―― I am Veldanava…… I won’t accept this…… If only I have『Raphael』, the real Lucia will acknowledge me!!」

Velda shouted as if he went mad and attacked me without care of anything, but his weak attacks wouldn’t work on me.

I easily repelled his sword and blew Velda away for the second time.

I guess it was not a fight anymore.

His heart was broken too, what was left for me was to deal the final blow.

When I thought so――

「It’s Rimuru’s victory.」

I heard Guy said that.

Hey, if you say something like that――

「Wai, Guy! When you say something like that, if I remember correctly―― you will set off a “flag”, saying something like that is quite famous in the industry, you know!」

「That’s right! I also studied Rimuru’s manga. It’s taboo to say something like that, you know!?」

Ramiris and Milim came to stop Guy faster than I was.

However, not just Guy, the True Dragon sisters also joined the fray.

「What are you guys trying to say. No matter how you look at it, isn’t this Rimuru’s complete victory?」

「That’s true, Velda has tremendous power for a fake, but as I expected he’s not comparable with the real Aniue. He doesn’t seem to be a match for that absurd slime.」

The two of them eagerly said those words as if the crisis had passed.

「Like I said, it’ll be a lead up before the enemy gets stronger, so stop with statements like that.」

「That’s right, that’s right! They called this “cliché”, you know?」

Milim shouted and Ramiris agreed with her.

However, they were already too late……

「Fufufu, ahahahahaha!」

Velda stood up while laughing.

Has he lost it? No, rather than that, his expression is――

「I knew it. It was as I had expected, Rimuru-san.」

With a smile I knew very well, he called me with his clear voice.

This sensation, this guy is without a doubt――

「Is that you, Yuuki?」

「Yes, long time no see. As I expected, Velda couldn’t win against you. However, it’s not a problem. He had earned me plenty of time. Well―― shall we start the final battle between you and me?」

While still smiling, Yuuki said so and pointed Genesis: Veldanava Sword at me.

* * *

[1] 異界結界 Ikai Kekkai. Ikai can also mean Spirit/Foreign/Alien World/Underworld. But imo different world fit the context. Otherworld Barrier?

[2] 創世級(ジェネシス) Sousei Kyuu (Jeneshisu). World Creation Class/Rank.

[3] 創世剣(ジェネシス)：星皇竜角剣(ヴェルダナーヴァ) Souseiken (Jeneshisu): Seiōryū Kakuken (Verudanāva). World Creation Sword (Genesis): Stellar Lord Dragon’s Horn Sword/Blade/Edge. I add sword to it for easier differentiation between the sword and the person.





Chapter 246: Rimuru vs Yuuki –First Part–


“I knew it” was my honest thoughts.

I calmly pondered in the middle of a fierce sword fight.

To begin with, why would he need a 1 month delay?

If we fought in that place that day, I didn’t know what the outcome would be.

If he had sent Chloe toward me at that time, while I wouldn’t lose, the fight would still be difficult.

If he used Velda’s power, he should be able to handle Veldora and Velgrind while I was being toyed with by Chloe.

Moreover, Kagali, Vega and the angels could have killed Diablo and the others.

There were people who could use Unique Skill such as『Teleportation』 like Mai too, I think that the prediction wasn’t wrong altogether.

Even according to Ciel-san’s calculation, our chance of winning wasn’t high, just around 40%.

Although, if I could kill Chloe without hesitation, our chance of winning would be over 80% and the situation would be reversed.

That’s why I thought they acted carefully since they feared I would act without hesitation, but I changed my mind after I saw the angels’ assembly and the explosion phenomenon this time.

Or rather, I’m convinced.

Velda, whose goal is to destroy the world, would have been more advantageous if he could do that.

Because everything would have been better for him if he were to hold down and eliminate us by making the energy of the angels go berserk.

What was the reason for why he didn’t do that?

――That’s because he wants to buy time――

Ciel and I agreed on the same thing.

Although he disappeared while saying plausible things at the end, what if all of that was Yuuki’s acting?

All pieces seemed to fit together.

『Ku, kukuku, ahahahahahahaha! This is really unexpected.

I didn’t expect it, really……. You’d be the most dangerous of all.

Bravo, Rimuru-san.

I really did want to end the world with my own hands.

But, unfortunately…….

I really can’t imagine myself winning against you. Not to mention, even that Demon over there――

――Your power is just too insane. That chills I got when we first met was right on the money.

I should have ended you back then.

Did I lose my marbles somewhere? Well, it doesn’t matter at all now.

No, in fact, if you can stop me, that’d just be the will of the world.

I guess, Velda will decide the rest, heh.

Goodbye, Rimuru-san

I kinda liked you a bit too.

――Honestly, we could’ve been friends, you know……』

I ended up honestly trusting those words.

He changed into Velda at the end with those words and I thought that Yuuki had told me his true intention.

However, I was wrong.

It was already too late at this point.

Perhaps, he had started since we first met――

I must admit that he acted splendidly, I was even outwitted.

Although Ciel seemed to have doubts about it, she couldn’t find any definite fault.

I was gullible enough to believe Yuuki’s words; on the contrary, she had said that she suspected that it was some kind of a ruse.

While I laughed it off that she might be overthinking it, but if it meant something, what was it? The two of us made the prediction over it.

That answer we concluded was “Isn’t his goal for the 1 month delay to buy himself some time?” or something like that.

And, that was the right answer, Yuuki gradually made the power his while inside Velda.

「You-you’ve deceived me until the end to buy yourself some time……?」

「Ahaha, you’ve figured it out? 100 points for you, Rimuru-san. Well, it seems that Velda was completely deceived about that too. Hey, there’s a saying “To fool the enemy, first deceive your allies” after all, right?」

「Stop with your bullshit, I really believed you――」

「Haha, that what they call naïve, you know. For you to believe the words of your enemy, your mind is really simple you know, Rimuru-san.」

Yuuki mockingly shrugged his shoulders.

Looking at him, Diablo and Milim gnashed their teeth while shooting nothing but death glares towards Yuuki. However, the aura emanated from Yuuki which was incomparable from before, coerced and made them unable to move their body at all.

What a terrifying growth――No, evolution.

Our weapons were of equal class, but I felt mine was inferior.

Veldanava Sword didn’t budge even after it was struck by Veldora Sword.

And, Yuuki who wielded it skillfully parried the impact unlike Velda.

「How did you get this much power?」

「I don’t feel I need to tell you, but I did make you wait for 1 month, so I guess I could tell you that much. It’s really simple; I just suppressed Velda and turned him into my subordinate. After I fully analyzed his power, I also completely analyzed Velda’s knowledge and understood all of it. Thanks to that, I could easily get the power of an awakened Hero too. Lucky for me, I also stole some of Leon’s power. After that, I just changed our relationship from fifty-fifty relation into a complete domination with me in charge. Oh yeah, it was easy because Rimuru-san had crushed Velda’s hope and broke his heart. Thanks for that.」

Yuuki replied while smiling.

I regretted asking since what this guy said didn’t always mean the truth.

I was curious and unintentionally asked, but I could get deceived again if I carelessly speak with him.

Although I had pompously reprimanded Mai, it wasn’t funny that I also got deceived. Talking with him anymore than this was dangerous and I would rather concentrate on the fight with my full power.

《I assume that Yuuki’s words just now are true, but I agree that talking more than this is dangerous.》

Ciel seemed to have sensed the danger too and agreed with my opinion.

A top class trickster was so troublesome to deal with.

As I took pride that I wouldn’t be deceived easily, I felt angry that I ended up being led around by the nose by someone. However, if I got caught in it too much, it would lead to a great failure.

I couldn’t really laugh at Mai with this.

From our conversation just now, Yuuki had said that he got the power of an awakened Hero. Then, it wouldn’t be strange for him to have the power of an awakened demon lord too even if he didn’t say it.

After all, his subordinate, Kazaream was also an awakened demon lord.

Hero and Demon Lord, powers of different natures were united in the same Will called Velda, and a being who could control that power as it pleased――that would be what Yuuki had become now.

Surprisingly, it was clear that the current Yuuki had power equal to me.

「However, for Rimuru-san to be the one who had『Raphael』. I had thought that was possible and it seems I was correct. Since my plan didn’t work out smoothly, I suspected you might have anticipated them. But, who would have thought that the Skill Velda wanted the most was in the hands of Rimuru-san, his greatest enemy. That really made Velda look like a clown. He’s so laughable, isn’t he?」

As soon as I thought about ending our conversation, Yuuki spoke as if to block me from doing so.

I heard a pleasant tone echoed from Yuuki’s voice as if he sincerely thought that Velda was hilarious.

What a tough opponent.

I parried Yuuki’s sword and slashed him back while keeping my mouth shut.

「Ahaha. Don’t be so wary like that. You see, Velda believed that he was Veldanava’s reincarnation. There’s no way that could be true, what a foolish guy. It was no more than an ability. It was Veldanava’s original ability, so I had him inherit all of the memories. In other words, Velda was just a similar existence like Kondou and Damrada whom were called back with Memory Orb. He’s a pathetic Manas that’s even inferior to the irregular being like Rudra. What a fool, isn’t he? A tool that didn’t even have a shred of dragon factor and yet he misunderstood everything. However, even a fool like Velda was capable enough as support for me. After all, I can control all of Veldanava’s abilities now!」

Yuuki kept on blabbering about things even though I wasn’t asking, Was his plan to confuse me with the conversation?

However, his plan was actually quite successful.

It was because it made me unable to concentrate very well. Even though we were in the midst of a fight, Yuuki’s words disturbed my thoughts.

Good grief, what a really troublesome guy he was.

Nonetheless, if what Yuuki had said was true, I could understand how he got the power equal to mine.

It was probably true that Velda was a Manas. An existence that assisted all of your abilities was very helpful, just like Ciel-san.

Even if it was a spell formulation with difficult control, it could activate it as your proxy. In other words, while you are concentrating in close combat like this, further attacks could be prepared without your opponent sensing them.

However, I couldn’t comprehend why Yuuki would bother to tell me that.

I suspected the motive behind it whether it was also one of his plans. The existence of a Manas itself could be considered as a very important trump card that should be hidden, after all, I naturally felt the desire to find out his goal for telling me that.

No, I suppose making me worried like this was what Yuuki expected, there would be no end if I kept on thinking about it.

I earnestly reconfirmed that Yuuki was a very troublesome enemy for me.

「You said that can control all of Veldanava’s powers? Don’t get conceited, you lowly human!」

Guy who was listening to me and Yuuki’s conversation, shouted while glaring at Yuuki with his crimson eyes blazed with fury.

As if they were following his lead, Velzard and Velgrind also nodded.

「That’s right! In the first place, it was me who sealed Veldanava’s holy corpse. As long as the seal is not broken, there’s no way someone like you can control all of the powers!」

Thus, Ramiris instinctively shouted.

When he heard that, Yuuki wickedly grinned and smiled.

――Eh, wait a minute? Why did Ramiris blabber about such important information so easily like that? No matter how careless and scatterbrained Ramiris was, this was clearly strange……

「Too bad! Your seal was pointless. If I make you angry, why don’t you release the seal and check it yourself?」

「Don’t you dare make fun of me! Okay, let me do that――」

I was convinced when I saw Ramiris was about to respond to Yuuki’s provocation.

「Diablo, stop Ramiris!」

「As you wish.」

Diablo moved promptly to my order.

Gently, but assuredly.

He locked up Ramiris, who was kicking up a fuss about something, inside the deployed Magic Barrier.

「Hey! What is this, Rimuru!?」

「Calm down, Yuuki’s aim was for you to remove the seal, you know. Just now, you were acting according to his words.」

「Hah!?」

I calmly answered to the shout of the dissatisfied Ramiris.

Ramiris was speechless when she heard my explanation. That would make sense. After all, she probably didn’t have any recollection about it.

If you only listened to the exchange of the words, it was unlikely for you to be tricked by the contents of the conversation. Yet, she unconsciously tried to act as Yuuki wanted. It was something unbelievable if you think about it calmly so I naturally thought that there was some kind of skill involved in this.

It seemed I had to make sure of this.

There was a possibility of me being manipulated too, but I decided to trust Ciel about this matter.

《Please leave it to me. I will analyze Yuuki’s skills.》

I spoke to Yuuki after I received the reply from the reliable Ciel.

――All this occurred while continuing to respond to the fierce sword blows without averting my sight from Yuuki.

「You’re still a trickster as ever, Yuuki.」

「Ahaha, what do you mean?」

「Don’t play dumb. You put Thought Guidance in your words and you could even trick those with a strong will. I’m sure that’s it not a technique on the level of suggestiveness or hypnotism or something like that. It’s very impressive of you.」

「Oh my, thank you. But, it’s not fun now that you have seen through it though.」

「Like I care!」

Yuuki dodged my words with his aloof attitude.

Since he wasn’t fazed by it, he seemed to have anticipated that things were to be seen through.

Then, this meant Thought Guidance wasn’t his trump card…… it might be more reliable to deal with Yuuki’s words by treating them all as lies.

No, could it be that was his aim?

If he mixed a bit of truth within the lies, he could make me under the impression that even the truths were lies too.

Was it the reverse pattern of mixing a bit of lies into the truths……?

《I think that’s very likely. Unfortunately, I have analyzed the wavelength pattern of all his energy including his voiceprint, but I couldn’t discern whether he’s lying or telling the truth.》

Just as I suspected.

However, it was a pain that even Ciel was unable to tell it apart. It would be certainly difficult as we couldn’t read him even from his expressions or emotions.

Then, that meant I had no other choice but to judge for myself what information that Yuuki would want me to believe was a lie?

《Additionally, I’ve confirmed that Yuuki’s words harbored some kind of power. This is probably the Primitive Magic[1], “Power of Words[2]”. I presume that Thought Guidance might have evolved.》

What? “Power of Words”――you said!?

I asked Ciel-san for more details, any kind of Primitive Magic was placed on a higher rank than the magic used by Demons. She said that it was the source of all magic.

However, its characteristic wasn’t manipulating physical phenomenon, but the power to affect the soul.

While it had no effect on physical matters, its effect was tremendous inside the spiritual world.

In other words, it was a terrifying magic that could exert its effect while invalidating defensive barriers. I was surprised that it could even affect strong people who had awakened an Ultimate Skill.

In addition, a being who could use this magic would become the natural enemy of any spiritual life-form.

Just like how Ramiris easily got induced now, it could affect the inside of someone’s heart……

For now, our swordsmanship was on equal terms.

Neither I nor Yuuki was being impatient, but neither of us had received any blows.

Yuuki protected his whole body with a God Class Armor, but it wouldn’t be able to withstand a hit from Veldora Sword.

Likewise, I wasn’t confident that I could withstand a hit from Veldanava Sword. After all, I felt energy surpassing Veldora Sword from that sword.

Its power truly should be called as the incarnation of Veldanava――

「You, it can’t be――you really can control Veldanava’s powers?」

My hunch told me so as if I received a divine revelation.

The reason why Yuuki was buying himself time was probably to get enough power to beat us for sure.

If that was the case, it was pretty logical that meant for him to obtain Veldanava’s powers.

「What the heck are talking about? There’s no way that could be true.」

「That’s right, Rimuru. Like I said before, if the seal is not removed――」

Guy and Ramiris were denying it, but Velzard and Velgrind were silent.

Milim was silent as well.

They probably had sensed it. The same surges as Veldanava’s powers.

It was the power overflowing from the sword Yuuki wielded.

「Aha, ahahahahahahahahahaha!!」

Yuuki suddenly began to laugh as if the dam inside was now broken.

He kept laughing while blocking the blows from my sword.

Then――

「Fufu, bravo, Rimuru-san. There would be nothing at all even if that fairy over there had released the seal. I just wanted to see her face of despair when she did so. After all, it’s true that I have broken the seal, you see.」

Everyone excluding me fell quiet as if they were frozen after they heard Yuuki’s words.

My intuition told me that he was telling the truth.

It wasn’t a lie to make me cautious. The reason was there was not much merit for him to tell such a lie.

That meant Yuuki had broken Veldanava’s seal in a month.

And, the 1 month delay was for that purpose.

「Yeah, I wanted to see those faces. After all, I got really serious now. I may have lost the game to end the world using my tools, but wouldn’t it be fine for me to have some fun until the end?」

Yuuki was laughing as if he was having fun from the bottom of his heart right now.

* * *

[1] 原初の魔法(プリミティブマジック) Gensho no Mahō (Purimitibu Majikku). Original/Primal/Primordial Magic.

[2] 言霊 Kotodama. Spirit of Language/Spirit of Words/Soul of Language/Magic Words/Power Words/Sacred Words. This refers to the Japanese belief that mystical powers dwell in words and names. Names and words have special powers that can influence our surroundings, both in a positive and negative way.





Chapter 247: Rimuru vs Yuuki –Middle Part–


(Yuuki’s 3rd POV)

Yuuki relished the joy inside his mind as he felt the place freeze.

Now that he became the strongest, he almost achieved his objective. If so, he thought that it would be fun to see the bitter faces of his worthy opponents for a bit longer.

If it was a month ago, he wouldn’t have been able to fight even one of these difficult opponents directly.

But, he had no inferiority complex about that anymore.

Instead, those powerful people made him feel excited and the thought of plunging the world into chaos and making his enemies dance in the palm of his hand would give him supreme pleasure.

However, all of Yuuki’s plans had ended in failure due to the presence of Rimuru, who stands in front of him.

It had been a series of unexpected situations.

When Yuuki first met Rimuru in the Ingrassia Kingdom, he had felt an indescribable premonition.

At that time, Yuuki had sent Hinata at him as a safety measure, but Rimuru escaped with ease.[1]

It was unbelievable that the calm and vigilant Hinata could fail, and when Rimuru turned out to survive this encounter, Yuuki acknowledged Rimuru as his enemy.

From that point on, all of his plans have been crushed by Rimuru.

However, Yuuki didn’t feel any anger regarding that matter.

On the contrary, Yuuki wanted to show his respect towards Rimuru’s brilliant skills.

Yuuki made the decision to move personally for the first time when the situation on the board titled so much that he couldn’t win, even if he unleashed all of the pieces in his hands.

It wasn’t like when he was playing around during his fight with Leon. Yuuki seriously decided, for the very first time in his life, that he wanted strength.

He estimated that it would take one month for him to unravel all that power.

Meanwhile, he decided to let Velda be in the firing line and do as he pleased.

Although Yuuki’s personality was more or less positioned at the top of the pecking order, because it was a mutual switch of beings of the same rank, once they switched places, he couldn’t switch with Velda with just his own Will.

For this reason, this was a gamble for him.

Velda’s goal was also the collapse of the world, but the end result was different than Yuuki’s.

Yuuki’s end goal was to return this world to nothingness, but Velda’s was different.

After the collapse, Velda wanted to try to create a new world with him as its God.

From Yuuki’s point of view, that was a naïve idea that he couldn’t hold back his laughter when thinking about it.

While thinking that Velda would fail anyway, Yuuki gave his last order.

Thus, the result was as Yuuki had expected……

Yuuki was a genius, but he didn’t obtain all of Veldanava’s powers.

As such, being able to control all of Veldanava’s powers was a lie.

However, there was nothing that worried him.

Because it was true that he could use almost all of Veldanava’s abilities.

Yuuki already had enough power to destroy this world.

The Manas called Velda had the knowledge about all of the Ultimate Skills, but he didn’t have the ability to recreate them.

The reason was plain and simple, insufficient capacity.

Yuuki had analyzed every skill over a month’s time and made a selection.

He reduced Ultimate Skill『Greedy Lord Mammon』into energy (Existence Value) and tried to recreate the necessary skills.

It became possible for him to perfectly recreate『Creation Lord Ahura Mazda』.

However, there was also an ability that he couldn’t recreate no matter how hard he tried.

The Ultimate and Supreme Ability――called『Turn Null』which produced the primordial energy needed to create a world. But in the end, it was impossible for him to recreate it.

Even if he could recreate that ability, he would only cause the energy to go amok and disappear if he didn’t create a world like Veldanava did.

After all, 『Turn Null』, as indicated by its name, was pure and super dense energy that destroyed everything. A super-tier level ability that allowed the destruction of the existing world and even the creation of a new world.

It was said that Veldanava lost『Turn Null』after he created this world, and he was left with『Magic Essence Breeder Reactor』.

Veldanava was the strongest existence because of this ability, which produced unlimited magic essence.

Milim inherited that『Magic Essence Breeder Reactor』, making her the strongest.

It was due to the byproduct of『Magic Essence Breeder Reactor』that she could control Stardust, the condensed form of magic essence.

Yuuki had recreated this ultimate power too.

Yuuki became a God-Man and a spiritual life-form. Therefore, based on Velda’s knowledge, he created『Magic Essence Breeder Reactor』and completely controlled it.

However, as it was, he didn’t have enough capacity to use other abilities and became nothing but a rehash of Milim.

He could control the output like Guy, but then he wouldn’t be able to surpass them.

Yuuki thought as such, so he came up with the idea of recreating the abilities and put them inside Veldanava Sword.

Veldanava Sword was a crystallization of Veldanava’s powers. It was the condensed form of half of Veldanava’s maximum energy.

Milim was supposed to inherit this Sword of God someday.

Hence, such a thing as recreating the abilities in Velda’s memories was easy.

Yuuki had also disassembled his own Ultimate Skill『Creation Lord Ahura Mazda』and combined it with Velda’s knowledge. Thus, Origin Skill[2]『Information Ruler Akashic Records[3]』was created.

He installed this Origin Skill into Veldanava Sword and tweaked it so that any selected ability could be used at any time.

Because it was tuned exclusively for Yuuki’s use, it couldn’t be used by Velda.

Velda’s role was to keep『Magic Essence Breeder Reactor』always in the optimal state, acting as a kind of permanent monitoring device.

Thus, Yuuki was reborn as an incarnation of absolute power that could freely use all abilities.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Yuuki was only wary of one person.

Only against Rimuru, who had a dumbfounded expression in front of him.

This annoying monster always exceeded Yuuki’s assumptions.

For this reason, there was no need for him to hold back. As soon as he determined the extent of Rimuru’s capabilities, Yuuki would need to use his strongest technique to get rid of him.

They were equal in power.

Yuuki, who was a God-man and an Awakened Hero, was operating『Magic Essence Breeder Reactor』at its maximum output, and yet he couldn’t surpass Rimuru’s power.

This was abnormal.

(This is so troublesome, seriously. I had thought that I would surpass him with a bit more power, but――)

Yuuki was advantageous in weapon’s performance, but he didn’t know how things would turn out if the fight dragged on.

(Velda, I’m gonna use energy at full blast. Fill Veldanava Sword with power to the limits it can withstand!)

Yuuki ordered Velda and attacked Rimuru with faster speed than before.

However, Rimuru easily warded off his attacks.

As if to not damage the sword, both of their swords were clad in energy which interfered with each other and caused heavy shock waves, but they were like a breeze for Yuuki and Rimuru.

(He reacted even to the assaults just now…… But, his reactions seem to be getting slower. Perhaps our swordsmanship is at a tie, I guess?)

Yuuki snapped his fingers.

At the same time, the world stopped moving. Time had stopped.

「Time Stop now, heh? I think it’s pointless……」

「Yeah, I think that it’s pointless too.」

「――You lying bastard. Your aim is probably to crush my forte so you can fight advantageously.」

「Ahahahaha. As I expected, you figured it out.」

Yuuki grinned and laughed.

He easily stopped time with Primitive Magic.

There were two reasons why he did so.

The first one was just as Rimuru had said to restrict emission type abilities.

By narrowing the options that could be taken by Rimuru, who had various means of attacks, he could continue the fight advantageously.

And above all else, it was for the best for him to stop time as to seal the ominous magic such as the annular magic that Demon (Diablo) had shown a while ago.

It was impossible to activate magic inside the Suspended World――Yes, with the exception of Primitive Magic.

Yuuki created an environment where he could one-sidedly use magic while sealing off Rimuru’s magic attacks.

――Burn brightly, O primordial flames!――

Yuuki wished so and simultaneously Rimuru was engulfed in flames.

「Woah! How can you use magic while time was stopped!?」

Just as he expected, Rimuru seemed to be unable to predict this attack.

Yuuki continuously manifested phenomena by merely thinking of them.

Cornering him with flames, sealing his movement by hardening the ground, severing the space―― Rimuru was toyed around with by Yuuki.

This was his last resort.

One of the trump cards that he thought surely would be effective.

However, unfortunately, Yuuki concluded that this Primitive Magic couldn’t defeat Rimuru.

Naturally, there was a very deep and calculated reason for why Yuuki used Primitive Magic despite it not being able to deal the decisive blow.

Yuuki judged that Rimuru had a habit of constantly observing his opponent’s attacks. It probably was a sign of his confidence that he could deal with any kind of attacks, but there was more than that. Yuuki thought that came from Rimuru’s innate naivety as he wished to find out his enemy’s true intentions and whether they could reach a mutual understanding or not.

This time, Yuuki made use of that habit.

As he expected, Rimuru didn’t use his full power from the start so Yuuki succeeded in activating Suspended World.

If he used Primitive Magic in this stopped time, Rimuru would very likely start to analyze his actions.

Although Primitive Magic was Yuuki’s trump card, he couldn’t beat Rimuru with it.

Then, even if it was valuable, Yuuki could use it as bait without problems.

“If I don’t win this fight, there won’t be a next time”, that was Yuuki’s judgment.

Although he was somewhat advantageous right now, Yuuki thought that he wouldn’t be stingy with what he got.

That’s because Yuuki’s wish could be achieved as long as he exhausted everything that he got and won against Rimuru.

My enemy is Rimuru alone――Thinking as such; Yuuki had evaluated Rimuru very highly.

Just as Yuuki planned, Rimuru seemed to be analyzing the Primitive Magic.

Analyzing your foe’s hands while in a fight couldn’t be said to be wrong. However, being preoccupied with something trivial during a tight battle like the one Yuuki and Rimuru were currently in was a bad move.

Yuuki had done various preparations since this battle began――No, even before it started.

Naturally, while he was analyzing abilities inside Velda, Yuuki had always been formulating plans on how he would eliminate his strongest rival.

Even stopping time wasn’t just for making himself have the upper hand by restricting Rimuru’s abilities.

Rather, Yuuki’s aim was to make Rimuru think that.

His true aim of using Time Stop wasn’t for such an insignificant reason――

「How naïve, Yuuki. I gradually got the hang of it, don’t think that you’re the only one who can use magic while time is stopped!」

As Yuuki had expected, no, even faster than expected, Rimuru seemed to have completed the analysis of the Primitive Magic.

The primordial flames that Yuuki had invoked without chanting were frozen by Rimuru just now.

Yuuki’s Will was offset by the conflict between fire and ice.

Yuuki thought that he had no choice but to smile wryly about this.

One of his trump cards was nullified so quickly, even though time was stopped.

However, even this was as Yuuki planned.

The katana clashed against the sword.

Both sides fought with their sublime powers.

In this situation, Yuuki had succeeded in distracting Rimuru’s consciousness even if it was just for a moment.

――I’ve been waiting for this moment!!――

Yuuki smiled.

Then, as he clashed with Rimuru with all his power once again, Yuuki put the final phase of his plan into motion.

While enormous amounts of energy clashed against each other and spread shock waves, Yuuki activated a magic spell formulation without chanting.

Naturally Rimuru, who had understood Primitive Magic, activated his own magic to deal with Yuuki’s magic and nullified it.

(Just as I expected! I had imagined that Rimuru-san would pick the correct response exactly as I had foreseen.)[4]

Although Yuuki was satisfied, he felt slightly empty.

He could read what his opponent was thinking this far, but he realized that he couldn’t understand him in the truest sense.

After all, they were strangers to each other, so such a thing as understanding each other completely was nothing but a pipe dream.

Yuuki felt such a sentiment, but before he could understand that, he unleashed his last trump card.

In the end, Yuuki and Rimuru were enemies.

Simultaneously when Rimuru invoked magic nullification, Yuuki activated the trick that he had put inside his prosthetic left hand.

The arm smoothly transformed and unleashed the magic circles engraved on it at Rimuru.

Then, the phenomenon was rewritten and converged into one magic spell.

The Ultimate Magic Arts that never could be activated by one person.

――Chrono Saltation[5]――[6]

The Ultimate Super Space-Time Magic that forced the target to leap to space where time had ended.

The magic was formed by swallowing up all of the energy that filled the place and even the raging quakes in time.

Then, with that immeasurable energy, it took Rimuru away to the “End of Time and Space[7]”.

Even all of Rimuru’s clones were completely swallowed up by the space-time continuum……

If the “Soul Corridor” wasn’t closed, Rimuru’s subordinates and even Velgrind might also become the target of the magic.

All kind of resistance was futile against the terrifying and compelling force of this magic.

Chrono Saltation was impossible to be activated by Yuuki alone.

The reason was simple; it was a compound magic that required the activation of at least 2 or more magic at the same time. Moreover, the magic needed to be activated simultaneously by those with the exact same properties and qualities.

What Yuuki had put inside his prosthesis arm was a simple ultimate spell formula.

The effect was a reversal.

It was a spell formula to reverse the target’s magic effect.

Primitive Magic was a magic that reflected the user’s Will and it wouldn’t just activate because Yuuki understood what kind of magic to use.

Just by wishing it, the phenomenon was invoked. This characteristic was the reason why it was called as the Ultimate Magic.

By limiting the magic that Rimuru could use with Time Stop just now, Yuuki was able to induce Rimuru to activate magic that he desired.

The magic that Rimuru activated was simple and plain. That was nullification.

It was impossible to stop the magic if Rimuru were to try to analyze the magic that Yuuki activated. Given the time differences, the nullification wouldn’t catch up at the same time as Yuuki activated his magic.

Yuuki thought that way.

Instead, Yuuki induced Rimuru’s thoughts while showing his trump card and directed Rimuru to act like that in this situation.

Then, just as Yuuki had planned, Rimuru would activate the magic.

Everything was prepared by Yuuki and he had forced Rimuru to act splendidly, exactly as he wanted.

In the space where Genesis class’ energy collided and space-time quakes occurred, Yuuki had used Space-Time Magic: Time Stop[8].

Originally, there was no meaning of stopping time in Suspended World. It was impossible to stop further of what had stopped.

However, the circumstances were different this time due to Yuuki’s trick.

In order to nullify Yuuki’s magic, Rimuru had activated magic that had the same energy but with the opposite properties of Yuuki’s magic. His magic was reversed by Yuuki’s trick and transformed to magic with the same energy and properties as Yuuki’s magic.

By doing this, Yuuki met the conditions for activating Chrono Saltation.

Even if he added Time Stop to another Time Stop, the effect wouldn’t change.

However, it would cause drastic changes if he multiplied it.

Bathed in the flow of all time and received the repulsion of the space that tried to fix itself, the target was sent to beyond time.

To the “End of Time and Space”―― A void in the far off future where the end of time and space overlapped.

If he couldn’t defeat him, he only had to put off the issue――That was the decision Yuuki had made.

Rimuru was able to rival him, or maybe even surpass him.To fight head-on against a super-level being like Rimuru would be sheer stupidity.

The answer to that was sending Rimuru to the future and destroying the world in that chance.

At the very end, the difficulty of the game to destroy the world, that used to be boring and easy, jumped up insanely, but Yuuki only felt happiness now that he had cleared it.

Yuuki was very happy and showed a smile from the bottom of his heart.

　　　　◆◆◆

The Time Stop was canceled at the same moment as Rimuru disappeared.

Without waiting for anything, those left behind moved all together.

Most of them didn’t understand exactly what had happened in front of their eyes.

However, the fact that Rimuru had disappeared was the only thing they could understand clearly.

「Well, I had sent the biggest obstacle for a trip to the future. This is a checkmate, right?」

Yuuki declared while sprouting a faint smile.

Hearing that, Milim sat down on the ground as if she was about to cry.

「Rimuru has…… Rimuru has disappeared……」

Ramiris was angry by the grieving mutters of Milim.

Without Ramiris herself being aware, her figure rapidly transformed into an adult――

「If it’s Rimuru, he will surely be okay! Let’s defeat him and quickly called Rimuru back here!」

Ramiris shouted.

Strength returned to Milim’s eyes as she heard those words.

「Yeah, you’re right. Let’s do it, Ramiris!」

「Yup!」

The two made their decision.

Milim stood up once more with renewed strength, even Gaia, who was on her shoulder, glared at Yuuki too.

Next to Milim stood Ramiris who had grown into a beautiful adult.

Her hair, which changed color to rainbow-colored, spread out wide as she focused her consciousness to activate the Primitive Magic that could modify the laws of the world.

As for the other people――

「Guess we’ve no other choice but to do it. He looks like an unbelievable beast, but it would be quite fun to go out seriously if this is our last after all.」

「Hehe, it’s really been a while, Guy. I won’t leave your side until the end.」

「Whew. Even though I especially got revived and wanted to see what the world was like now. Well, it can’t be helped as things turned out this way. Velgrind, if we survived, will you show me the world then?」

「Rudra, you idiot. Searching for your reincarnation is more important than the world. And also…… I think you should realize that you didn’t get revived, you know.」

「Kufufufufu. It’s impossible for Rimuru-sama to be defeated, but let’s hold the fort in his absence.」

「Yeah, Sensei might have some ulterior motive, but it won’t be useless if we defeat him.」

Each of them said their respective thoughts and altogether faced Yuuki.

Then, they unleashed their deadly attacks filled with their entire beings toward Yuuki.



――Everything was as Yuuki expected.

Right now, Yuuki could use all skills because of Origin Skill『Information Ruler Akashic Record』.

In other words, he could even devour energy completely using Gluttonous Lord Beelzebuth.

Yuuki sprouted a dark smile as the mass of energy enough to destroy the world was approaching in front of him.

* * *

[1] Xbox’s Note: "With ease" he says...

Guro: As smooth as a Slime he is. kek

Sierra’s Note: lol tru.

[2] 源流能力(オリジンスキル) Genryū Nōryoku (Orijin Sukiru). Source/Beginning/Origin/Primordial Ability.

[3] 情報之王(アカシックレコード) Jōhō no Ō (Akashikku Rekōdo). I chose Ruler because Akashic Records is more a thing than a being and Ruler is neutral I guess.

[4] Sierra’s Note: Getting Star Wars Emperor Palpatine vibes :3

[5] 時空跳激震覇(クロノサルテーション) Jikū Chō Gekishinha (Kurono Sarutēshon) Supreme Space-Time Leap Mega Quakes. Saltation (come from Latin word of saltus which mean leap), so in a sense, this can mean Time Leaping. Instead sending yourself through time, it send your target instead.

[6] Xbox’s Note: "Can I have some salt with this time please?"

Sierra’s Note: “Only after some Stellar Peppering”

Guro: “Hey guys, this didn't have anything to do with Salt and Pepper!! XD”

[7] 時空の果て Jikku no Hate. Edge of Time, Outskirts of Time and Space.

[8] 時間停止(タイムストップ) Jikan Teishi (Taimu Sutoppu). Stopped/Suspended/Frozen Time, Time Stop.

P.S. I regret changing from Turn Null cause Nihility/Nothingness Collapse take longer to type, do you guys want Turn Null back? XD





Chapter 248: Rimuru vs Yuuki –Last Part–


As I suspected, I imagined that it might be impossible for me to ever understand this idiot.

I can’t comprehend something like him wanting to destroy the world just because of the misfortunes he experienced when he was young.

Experiencing misfortunes and accidents, that isn’t exclusively just Yuuki’s story alone.

Not everyone lived happily; some people lived finely by overcoming their misfortunes.

If I were to say, I guess my life was a happy one, so if I was asked, I doubt that I can really understand the feelings of those with unhappy lives.

However, I can affirm that involving other people because of his own unhappiness is clearly wrong.

People are not created equal.

People might be able to treat each other as equal as much as they can within this world’s system, but it can’t be denied that there’s a difference in innate abilities.

If you think in that sense, a world where everyone in this world can equally enjoy peace and happiness, something like that can only exists in fantasy.

That’s why you wouldn’t be wrong if you called this world incomplete.

Even Velda, who tried to create a world completely tuned to his likings, could only be called a fool who can’t understand Veldanava’s ideals.

However, even beyond him, Yuuki, who thinks that it’s better to end and destroy everything, has a way of thinking that is too childish and immature.

He is a rash person and only supports his own ideas without taking any kind of responsibilities.

As I expected, Yuuki is a fool that I’m incompatible with.

The world was cruel, but it granted you everything.

That was the world that Veldanava had created.

He, who was alone in the empty space, couldn’t bear the solitude.

That was the reason why he created the world: in order to distract himself from the boredom[1].

Then, just as Veldanava wished for, life was born in this world, and beings began to act freely and asserted their Wills.

Finally, after a long time, humankind was born as a vessel for the soul with free will and high intellect.

Veldanava was thrilled.

For Veldanava, who had been bored with the world of emptiness, even just observing the activities of life was fun, but the activities of the creatures called human beings were even more stirring for him.

However, there was also a problem.

Humans who acquired intellect stimulated each other and took unpredictable actions.

If he left them unattended, they would immediately begin to fight against each other and would walk on the path of self-destruction.

Several other worlds were born, but he could see that all of them had similar tendencies.

Emotions were always the cause.

Emotions were something that had been given to them and was necessary to give people the stimulus to develop even further, but emotions that had grown unchecked tended to reject the opinions of others.

Different Ideas gave rise to various forms of justices, Veldanava pondered.

He decided to accept such phenomena were some necessary evils and the way of the world as a training ground for the soul.

If humans were to be controlled completely, conflicts would disappear.

However, they would lose the stimulus from emotions and the world would end up as a Dystopia, where people were all equal but without free will.

Such a world was not what Veldanava desired.

After that, he experimented many times and tried to develop humans into the direction that he hoped for.

The conditions in many of the Parallel Worlds minutely deviated from one another, which led them to achieve different evolutions.

Meanwhile, he carefully chose humans with matured souls and created Angels and Demons as the manager of the souls without a lifespan.

He constructed a system so that the souls circulated to all dimensions.

He restricted the managers so they wouldn’t cause excessive interference and appointed the role of the Observer[2] so that the foundation of the world wouldn’t be destroyed.

Those he appointed to be Observers were Guy, Ramiris, and Dino.

I didn’t seem to be able to see anything spiritual because the little amount of magic essence in my former world, but perhaps that world might have an Observer, too.

Oh well, not like that thing mattered to me now though.

Anyway, the construction of the system was completed.

The subjugation of the Giants and the likes that appeared irregularly was finished and the world had stabilized.

When all things began working smoothly, the Wheel of Fortune spun greatly.

By meeting Lucia, Veldanava learned what love was.

Then, they proved their love, and Lucia ended up pregnant with Milim.

At that time, Veldanava lost all of his powers, but I could deduce that was probably due to the compelling force of the world.

The reaction called Enforceability―― the constructed system had declared Lucia’s existence as harmful.

From the system’s standpoint, God’s love must be poured out to everyone equally.

However, Veldanava’s action of loving a specific individual seemed to have caused errors in the system.

As a result, the price paid in order to repair the system failure was Veldanava and Lucia’s life.

Velda’s thought to condemn the system that even destroyed its creator wasn’t irrational, at least from an emotional standpoint. However, what Velda wanted to do was something for pure self-satisfaction, which went against Veldanava’s intention.

After all, Veldanava loved this world and he wished for Milim, his daughter, to survive.

The proof of that desire was the fact he had sacrificed himself to the system.

――Even if it was said that he had lost all of his abilities, a story of him who was a god to be killed by humans would be a tall tale.

It was impossible for Velda to understand that.

So he cooperated with Yuuki and tried to destroy the world, I guess…… what a truly foolish story.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

I opened my eyes slightly.

I’m sure I had begun my final battle with Yuuki, and yet――

《You finally woke up?》

Oh! Ciel-san said something to me.

Where are we?

Also what happened to Veldora-san?

《This is the End of the World. It could also be referred to as the “End of Time and Space”. As for Veldora, he was isolated inside the『Imaginary Space』and completely protected, so please rest assured.》

I see. Veldora-san is alright.

Thank goodness….. Eh? This needlessly large and empty world is the “End of Time and Space”, she said?

Certainly, time doesn’t flow and is in a stopped state. I can’t sense the spread of space either…..

《Yes. In this world, the flow of time has stopped. The spread of space had ceased as well, and in accordance with the Law of Entropy[3], this world has arrived at nothingness.》

Has arrived? You are talking as if you have watched it?

《That’s right. We were hurled to beyond space and time due to Yuuki’s attack. The lifespan of the planet has already ended a long time ago, but the collapse of the world hasn’t yet been reached. From that I deduced, Yuuki probably couldn’t destroy the world itself yet. When he was at the phase where he destroyed the celestial bodies as well as the space-time continuum, I presume that Yuuki’s lifespan had come to an end. However, I can’t judge whether his wish was fulfilled or not. After that, we wandered around as we drifted in the space and I witnessed the end of this universe.》

――I can’t understand what Ciel-san is saying at all……

“I witnessed the end of the universe?” What is she talking about…..?

Rather, there’s no way we can be alive in a situation like that.

If you want to lie, come up with a more believable one――So I thought, but I remembered Ciel-san never lies.[4]

She deceives me sometimes, but she didn’t lie as I simply misunderstood――Or rather, she made me do so――That’s all of it.

That means this is really the end of the world!?

《Yes, that’s right. Then, I’ll get straight to the point, what will master do after this?》

What will I do?

《Because a long time has passed,『Turn Null』has accumulated an enormous amount of energy. Although Veldanava is said to have lost『Turn Null』by creating the world, there’s no problem since Rimuru-sama has『Imaginary Space』. Because『Imaginary Space』has an infinite capacity, it can’t be filled up. However, it has already been filled with enough energy that even recreating the world tens of thousands of times is possible. Additionally, it’s possible to reproduce the memories of those connected to Rimuru-sama and intentionally create a world that’s nearly identical from before. What will you do?[5]》

Huh……?

Ciel asked me as such, which made me speechless.

Yes, if this place was the “End of Time and Space”, that meant Benimaru, Shuna, my friends in Tempest, Diablo and the other Demons, Guy, Ramiris, Milim and the other Demon Lords, all the people that I loved, all of them didn’t exist anywhere in this world. I finally understood that.

In other words, I lost to Yuuki.

「Bullshit!! Damn it!!! Doesn’t this mean I completely lost to Yuuki!!」

《No, that’s incorrect. Yuuki couldn’t even destroy Rimuru-sama.》

But, I couldn’t protect those I loved.

Therefore, it’s meaningless. There’s no meaning if I’m the only who survived.

Even if I can recreate nearly the same memories and even if their DNA is exactly the same, can I really say that they are “them”?

Can I interact with them in the same way as always before if I created them with my own hands?

DAMN IT, SHIT!!

「Those things like that would just be fakes! No matter what the excuses are, I have lost to Yuuki……」

Rationally, Ciel seemed to think that I should create a new world without a heretic like Yuuki in it.

That certainly would be a good choice.

It could be said that there were no problems with that.

However, that wouldn’t satisfy my heart.

Reviving my dead friends as fakes just to heal my loneliness, she said!? I’d rather die than stoop so low as to do something like that.

I’m aware that I’m selfish.

However, that’s the reason why I couldn’t approve of creating a convenient world just for myself.

In a world like that, my whole existence itself will rot away and die.

I would rather proudly choose to bear the loneliness than cling to the past just to comfort myself.

《I knew it. I had expected that Rimuru-sama would answer like that》

I shouted in anger, but on the contrary, Ciel replied happily.

Then she continued her words

《Besides, you have not lost to Yuuki yet. You just have to go and defeat him now.》

Ciel-san casually said those words.

I just have to go and defeat him now? Does she mean to go back to the bygone past?

Can something like that be done……?

Chloe seemed to be able to read the memories of the future with Time Leap[6], but that was just an ability to return to your past self.

Besides, it couldn’t be activated while time was stopped.

Yuuki would carefully plan to block a way out like that by stopping time.

《No, there’s no problem. The『Teleportation』newly acquired from Mai was originally just a mere prototype of a different ability. The ability is not『The ability to move to a place you’ve visited』, but『The ability to transcend time and space to reach the location you desire』. For Rimuru-sama, who rules over time and space, such a thing as going across time is simple.》[7]

I was speechless.

So that was her reason, no wonder Ciel-san was calm even though I was angry.

From the beginning, she probably had anticipated everything that I desired.

「Alrighty then, let’s get into it and defeat that idiot immediately. You know it, don’t you? I don’t like losing, after all!」

《As you wish, my Lord.》

Ciel responded to my order.

Brief as usual, her response was stated matter-of-factly.

However, I just woke up a little while ago, but Ciel had been waiting for me to wake up for countless years.

An unconcealable joy seeped out from her voice as she responded to my order.

In order to not betray that feeling, I choose the world that I think is the right one.

I’m not going to lose anymore.

Well then, let’s end this quickly.

At the same time I thought so; I used Time Warp[8] and warped to the past.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

I instinctively knew that I warped to a different spot from before.

At the same time, I noticed that a mass of energy, that seemed to be able to destroy the world, was approaching toward my direction.

However, I didn’t panic and swallowed it whole in one gulp.

It was surprisingly delicious.

I seemed to have recovered the energy consumed by Time Warp.

「Who are you!?」

It was probably a surprised shout from Yuuki who stood behind me.

Even though I was planning to return at the same time as my disappearance, it seemed that just a little bit of time had passed.

Well, it could be said that I arrived at the perfect time. It couldn’t be called as calculation error, even if it was my first time using it.

In addition to my perfect timing, nobody seemed to be hurt.

「…… Rimuru, is that you?」

A beautiful woman with rainbow-colored hair timidly asked me.

Back at ya, who are you!? I was about to say that impulsively.

However, I realized that person might be Ramiris from her atmosphere and slightly foolish look.

「Ramiris, is that you? You’ve grown up?」

「Geeeee!!! Stupid stupid stupid stupiddddd!! You made us so worried, you know!!」

「Tha-that’s right! To hide just to scare us, there’s a limit for a prank. Even I believed that you had been hurled to the future since your presence had completely gone from the world, you know!!」

「You easily went and nullified our greatest attacks…… Besides, what with that appearance? Haven’t you also grown up??」

Although not much time had passed, my disappearance seemed to have caused them to be worried.

And apparently, the energy that I had eaten just now seemed to be full power attacks unleashed by Guy and everyone else toward Yuuki. I felt I did a bad thing, but I didn’t think it was a big deal since their attacks of that level would only strengthen Yuuki anyway.

More importantly...

What does Guy mean about my appearance?

I thought so and looked at my own appearance, and it seemed my appearance grew into that of an adult.

However, since I have neither breasts nor a ‘son’, I would have to say this change has no meaning.

Ciel-san seems to have continued to create energy the whole time, so I guess this might be the effect of that.

「Oh well, don't sweat the small stuff. The fight isn’t over yet, and I’ll put an end to Yuuki. So, you guys just need to wait for a bit.」

I said so and turned to face Yuuki.

Without saying anything, Guy sheathed his sword and folded his hands.

「Guy?」

「No matter how you look at it, I don’t think that Rimuru will lose. This is surely a checkmate.」

Guy answered while shrugging his shoulders to Ramiris whose sight directed on him.

「Like I said before, saying something like that is a flag…… But, there seems to be no room for a flag in that…...」

Ramiris muttered so.

Afterwards, she murmured in a small voice “Even though I have returned to my long-awaited original form…… This is completely meaningless, isn’t it?” and looked a bit pitiful. It seemed I had to cheer her up later.

Diablo looked very pleased, as if to say that it was natural for him to believe I would return. He looked at me with an ecstatic expression, but I wonder if I could return to my former form without any problem? I was a little bit worried.

Chloe looked like she was about to cry, but just like Guy, she sheathed her sword and began to watch me. I guess they put their trust in me. Leave it to me! I won’t let you guys down.

I received everyone’s feelings on my back and pointed my katana at Yuuki.

「Well, let’s finish this. I have accompanied you in your foolish game for some time. But it’s time for the game to end, don’t you think?」

「I-Impossible!? Rimuru-san, I should have sent you to the “End of Time and Space” without fail!!」

Yuuki began to shout with bloodshot eyes, as if he didn’t want to accept it.

I could understand that feeling.

However, he just faced the wrong opponent.

If he fought someone else other than me, his eyes might have looked triumphant..

「Yeah, you’ve sent me there. I fell for your plan because my partner was engrossed in the analysis of the Primitive Magic. Oh well, your plan was very impressive, but, unfortunately, it’s useless against me.」

I told Yuuki that as if it was nothing.

《It upsets me that you said it’s my fault you fell into his plan. However, it’s true that I had interest in Primitive Magic. It’s vexing, but I can’t refute it.》

Ciel-san was upset as if she was displeased with something I said, but I decided to ignore her.

Mainly, it was because I didn’t say anything wrong.

「It-it can’t be…… Time Leap……? Moreover, its perfected form, to the place you desired…… even from the “End of Time and Space”……? Impossible…… A person, a person who can do something absurd like that should’ve not existed…… This is, doesn’t this make you just like a Supreme Deity[9]――」

Yuuki kept on muttering like that.

I could see from his appearance that he absolutely wouldn’t accept the reality.

Then――

Suddenly, he came slashing toward me, with all his power in his sword.

I didn’t dodge his slash, but quietly thrust my left hand forward and stopped his sword.

The blade, which he swung down at an extreme speed, was caught between my thumb and index finger, and its momentum stopped completely.

I glanced at the shocked Yuuki and delivered a light kick to him.

Having received a kick directly, Yuuki lost his grips on his sword―― Veldanava Sword—— and was blown away.

He would survive, but he would lose the majority of his fighting strength.

That’s because I extracted the negative energy from『Turn Null』that jammed life support and merged it into my kick.

After having a fit of violent coughs, Yuuki looked up to me with a dumbfounded expression.

「YOU, WHO THE HELL ARE YOU――――!?」

Yuuki shouted at me with the emotions of shock and agitation.

As I heard him, I laughed.

Yuuki’s silliness is too damn funny.

Yuuki is too ignorant to a fault, I can only laugh.

Mikami Satoru.

Rimuru Tempest.

――Or perhaps I can even be called Veldanava?

Me? Who am I?

Isn’t that obvious!

My name is――――――――

A flash.

A torrent of dazzling lights filled the surroundings.

Then, an ominous dark-colored demonic aura poured out from my body as if to swallow the lights.

The torrent of lights gently wrapped Ramiris, Milim and my other friends. The lights healed all their injuries and protected everyone from the ominous dark-colored demonic aura.

As for those who weren’t protected by the lights――Speaking of Yuuki…...

「Stop, go away! The world, I’ll――」

Yuuki seemed to have resisted it with everything he had, but his body was eroded away without him able to do anything to stop it.

「Give up.You've gone too far, Yuuki. If you do bad things, you’ll need to reflect on your actions, right? At least, you should repent about it. Repent for your foolishness and immaturity while inside my『Imaginary Space』. That’s all I allow you to do.」

I emotionlessly declared.

Yuuki was trying to struggle until the end, but everything ended in vain.

It seemed he had transferred all of his abilities to Veldanava Sword, I guessed there was nothing he could do now.

――No! Don’t lock me in here. This is, like this I’ll……

――Yuuki, you’re really being a problem child[10] until the end, you know, I wonder if this is because I couldn’t guide you completely?

――Sensei……? I… I see….. Sensei is also in here……

――Yes, I am. I’ll also reflect together with you. I’ll never abandon you.

――I understand. Just where did I go――

With those words as his last, Yuuki’s consciousness completely disappeared.

I closed the『Imaginary Space』.

Escaping from it was impossible until I died――Or, even after I died――he would never be freed.

In the first place, I doubt I still have a lifespan……

However, the one who conversed with Yuuki at the end was――

If so, this was not a punishment for him, this might be an unexpected salvation for Yuuki.

I thought like that, as if I was immersing myself in sentiments.

Thus, the final battle was over with my victory.

* * *

[1] Sierra: No internet to keep him busy. Poor Veldanava!

Xbox : All he needed was a pen pal...

[2] 監視者 Kanshisha, Guardian/Watcher. The same term that Dino used to refer to himself in Chapter 187.

[3] The second law of thermodynamics (the entropy law or law of entropy) was formulated in the middle of the 19th century by Rudolf Clausius and William Thomson following the French physicist Sadi Carnot’s earlier observation that, like the fall or flow of a stream that turns a mill wheel, it is the "fall" or flow of heat from higher to lower temperatures that motivates a steam engine. The key insight was that the world is inherently active, and that whenever an energy distribution is out of equilibrium a potential or thermodynamic "force" (the gradient of a potential) exists that the world acts spontaneously to dissipate or minimize. All real-world change or dynamics is seen to follow, or be motivated, by this law. So whereas the first law expresses that which remains the same, or is time-symmetric, in all real-world processes the second law expresses that which changes and motivates the change, the fundamental time-asymmetry, in all real-world process.

Guro: I’m not a Physicist, I just found it in internet.

Xbox: This law's influence on the end of the universe is still being heavily debated. The death by entropy theory never accounted for dark matter and dark energy. There is actually new evidence showing that the universe expansion acceleration theory isn't actually correct. Stephen Hawkins along with many other astrophysicists starting pushing the cyclic universe theory as this theory actually accounts for dark matter and dark energy.

[4] Sierra: Fuse-sensei. Once, just once, have Ciel play a prank on Rimuru

Poulay: Raphael did it when he said rimuru would die if he took a hit from Hinata just to take an ability.

Guro: I wonder if Rimuru considers Ciel and Raphael as separate entity……

[5] Sierra: Is this a text adventure?

Xbox: The essence of role-playing! Dungeons and Dragons anyone?

[6] 時間跳躍(タイムリープ) Jikan Chōyaku (Time Rīpu). Chouyaku here means Leap.

[7] Sierra: Oh shit. He's done it. Slime boy is now officially unbeatable.

[8] 時間跳躍(タイムワープ) Jikan Chōyaku (Taimu Wāpu). Chouyaku here means Warp.

[9] 超越神 Chousetsujin. Lit. mean Transcendental God/Deity, but I feel transcendental lacked a bit to show how awesome Rimuru became, so I thought of using Supreme Deity/God, which would mean a God/Deity who’s above everything (People and limitations) else in the all world (The Highest). Alternative; A God/Deity who transcends all.

[10] 手のかかる子 Tenokakaruko. Difficult/Troublesome/Handful/Problematic Child.

Sierra: Problem children really DO come from another world, don't they? Anyone get the reference?

P.S. I changed Nihility/Nothingness Collapse back to Turn Null cause it's shorter and easier to type. Xd Tehee





Epilogue: Regarding Reincarnated――


A year has passed since my fight with Yuuki.

A lot of things happened after that.

Yep, whole lotta things happened.

It was very hard to recall everything.

Velda’s defeat by my hands was broadcasted all over the world.

My figure was projected over the skies of each country with Optical Magic which was the application of Observation Magic.[1]

Then, the global crisis was declared over in my name.

The world was filled with great joy and the unprecedented chaos gradually ceased.

Needless to say, the one who helped with that were the citizens of Tempest.

Anyway, with that, the world finally regained its former peace.

………

……

…

After I defeated Yuuki, I released Veldora.

When freed, he went,

「Kuaaaah, I slept so well. It’s finally my turn, right?!」

And blurted out something like that.

Even though he had been isolated from the outside world inside the『Imaginary Space』, it could be said that his statement came about because he couldn’t really read the situation.

The price he had to pay for that was very high.

It can’t be helped that he got caught by his two older sisters and was being punished appropriately.

Nonetheless, his two sisters――Velzard and Velgrind—— their interest quickly changed towards Velgaia, the new “True Dragon” on Milim’s shoulder.

It could be said that he was saved by that, but since he got neglected by his sisters because of that, Veldora totally got what he deserved.

「Grrrr…… That Gaia……」

So, it was my job to cheer up Veldora who was jealous of his little brother (?). Just between you and me, it was very troublesome.[2]

Oh well, with all that said, Veldora was still the same as he always was.

Our relationship of him spreading nuisances everywhere and me dealing with them somehow would continue, even after this.

The thought made me feel happy, but that was kept as a secret from Veldora.

Why, you ask?

Well, it’s obvious that he would get cocky if I ended up saying that.

Just like how our relationship wouldn’t change from now on, that much goes without saying.

　　　　◇◇◇

Speaking of Veldora’s sisters, Velgrind had left on a journey immediately.

She probably went to search for Rudra’s reincarnation.

「Rimuru, do you have a clue or anything about it?」

「Ehh!? No-nope... I don’t know anything!?」

She suddenly asked me before she left, but I splendidly brushed it off.

I didn’t stutter a little because her appearance of tormenting Veldora was scary or anything.

I just got a little bit nervous because the impactful face of a beautiful woman got closer to mine.

……No, it’s true.

Actually, I had a suspect in mind.

However, if I gave out his name here, it would appear as if I yielded to Velgrind.

Besides, I felt a bit bad about selling him out.

We finally got our peace, so I thought that it was okay for him to enjoy his happy time for a bit longer.

……But, my considerations aside, he seems to have been found by Velgrind quickly later.

I prayed for him to have good fortune while thinking, “You have my condolences”.

――After that, the tale of a Hero who carried a talking sword, and was accompanied by a Dragon and a Demon raises its curtain, but it’s a story that has no connection to me.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Velzard returned along with Guy to the northern continent.

It seemed they built a paradise of demons in the coldest land, where people couldn’t interfere.

Their castle had completely collapsed, but Velzard said they recreated it with Guy’s ability.

Based on the experience of the final decisive battle, it seemed Guy had acquired Ultimate Skill『Abyss God Nodens[3]』by evolving Ultimate Skill『Prideful Lord Lucifer』.

This skill seemed to even include Gaia’s『All Creation Embodiment』and became a truly almighty skill.

It seems Guy attempted Skill Evolution while trying to process Rudra’s rampaging energy.

He appeared to be dissatisfied about the last battle since he couldn’t use this skill due to my well-timed appearance.

He didn’t try to hide his dissatisfaction, so I asked him directly about it.

「I don’t plan to fight with you. My principle is ‘don’t start a fight that you can’t win,’ after all.」

Those were the words that he said then.

I didn’t know whether it was his true feelings or not, but since I didn’t want to fight with Guy either, it was just what I was hoping for.

At least, I felt the indication that if Guy was serious, he might be able to fight against Yuuki on equal terms or more.

I didn’t think that I would lose with how I am now, but I would rather not get myself injured because of such pride.

Since there was no reason to fight, so it would be best if we could get along with each other.

Guy was also a battle freak to some extent, so let’s just assume that he wouldn’t challenge me unnecessarily.

Despite saying something like that, I would fight against Guy several times after this, but let’s talk about that another time.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

The Heaven was decided to be Milim’s territory.

With Gaia’s『All Creation Embodiment』, the castle and the Heaven Gate that were broken in our fight were restored.

The citizens from the former demon lord territories that Milim ruled were migrating to it one after another.

The Harpies led by Frey and the Lycanthropes led by Karion were a part of that.

Not only that, but the Heavenly Demons[4] who were following Dino now were also included.

Regarding the Heavenly Demons, is it really okay for me to say they are a new race born from the incarnated Angels being altered?

In the first place, it’s said that the Harpies and the Tengus are derived from angels who fell down to demonic attribute, so it can’t be taken as the only rule.

Even Dino’s race is called a Fallen[5] as he fell when he was an Angel.

Since Angels in the truest sense didn’t have a physical body, they could only act in Heaven. And so, Milim’s main force consisted of the three races: Heavenly Demons, Harpies and Lycanthropes.

It had been decided that there would be cultural exchanges with Heaven, as it was in secret relationship with the Monster Country Tempest, so the trial tests for new technologies were arranged to be conducted there.

It was obvious that the development of science here would be different from my former world since magic essence existed in this world, which could be converted directly into energy.

The research and development would be conducted inside the labyrinth as usual, but Heaven would be the first to implement the finished technology.

Then, the technology would be perfected based on the obtained data and planned to be utilized in Tempest.

Naturally, things based on physical technology and magical technology would be sent back to the Dwargon Kingdom and Sorcery Dynasty Sarion first, respectively.

In this way, while upholding each country’s uniqueness, we would be leaking the older technology to the Western Countries.

It goes without saying that the high technical fees[6] will enter my pocket.

Speaking of Milim, she was the same as usual…… She frequently came to my place to play behind Frey’s back.

Oh well, I also played together with her――No, no, I was taking a breather, so I didn’t have any complaint.

Dino also came along under the pretext as Milim’s escort, but I had no doubt that his intention was to slack off and eating confections.

Anyway, as Frey appeared at the moment our play was over, both Milim and Dino’s faces turned pale as if they were in sync.

Seemed to me that both master and servant had no motivation to work, but is Heaven going to be alright?

Well, as long as the worrywart Frey there, Heaven would manage somehow.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Speaking about Milim made me remember something. There’s one problem...

Recently, it seems that Shuna, Shion, and Milim are competing intensely against one another while I’m away.

Souei implicitly reported it to me, that they are in a holy war (Jihad)[7] concerning who gets to be my legal wife.

What the hell? I was amazed by this, but it also gave me a headache.[8]

To begin with, I don’t have a “son”, and marriage is unnecessary since I don’t have a lifespan.

How should I put it, I only have a hunch of what caused the fight.

Chloe.

Chloe was emotionally attached to me and said「Sensei is (my only) Sensei!」, so I thought she was genuinely cute.

「It’s not fair! I’m Rimuru’s bestie, so I’m the number one!」

「You’re just deceiving yourself with that! If you say it that way, then I am the only secretary of Rimuru-sama!」

「Chloe――She seems to be quite the tactician. Even better than I expected…... She is the opponent that I should be most wary against, not meatheads like Milim-sama and Shion……」

The three people came rushing while I was relaxing and having a cup of tea with Chloe.

Then, the noisy time began, just as usual.

Since this has also gradually become an everyday affair, it might be better for me to think about the solution for this soon.

Besides, once I acknowledge a legal life, I feel they will start proposing themselves as concubines, right? No, no, let’s stop thinking about such a thing.

It’s something too troublesome for me after all.

《Fufufu, Master’s partner (Legal Wife) is me[9]――》

I felt I heard something, but it seems I better stop thinking about it too deeply.

Just as usual, I promptly decided to postpone the problem.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

The Monster Country Tempest also changed dramatically.

After the executives led by Benimaru and the hobgoblins under Rigurdo were commended for their deeds, we began the reconstruction of the city.

The town was rebuilt in the blink of an eye by the combat engineers under Gerudo.

The re-establishment of the city which surround the Labyrinth was easily finished by Ramiris.

The adventurers also cooperated and the Empire’s soldiers were mobilized.

What about their salaries? That was not my concern.

Myormille-kun came clinging onto me and said「Rimuru-sama~~~」in a crying voice, but I warmly cheered him up with「Do your best! You can do it!!」so he would be fine .

It seemed that he was being consoled by Rigurdo, who patted his shoulder, but more than anything they were getting along with each other.

However, thanks to his hard work, Tempest was reborn as an unparalleled super-futuristic city.

I came up with ideas without restraint and Gerudo made them all real.

The new inventions under his research were put to practical use and implemented freely.

Some of them were adopted without even waiting for the trial run in Heaven.

The futuristic remodeling had been completed splendidly while leaving the tourist destination areas like Onsen District aside.

To be honest, I suspected that they wouldn’t intentionally empty the above-ground areas.

Multiple Defensive Barriers were actualized by a large-scale magic circles.

The distribution channels inside the city were connected together by Transfer Devices.

Because Transfer magic circles were set up at each area, traveling inside the city became smooth.

The skyscrapers crowding around the city center were efficiently positioned so that the sunlight hit the ground below.

In the vicinity, the citizens’ residential spaces spread out in harmony with the forest.

It was the completion of a fantastic city that even have a soothing area.

Because magic harmonized with science, it was possible to achieve high-convenience technology that was centuries ahead of the world’s time.

Naturally, work for the exchanges with the other countries was also piling up.

The installation of the Transit Gates was urgent, but the railway networks needed to be established for usage in conjunction with the gates.

With that in mind, we decided to deploy magic essence-powered trains as transportation networks to each city.

By putting together various refined magic techniques, the train could now be operated at the speed of exceeding 300 km/h[10] without leaking any shock or noise to the surrounding areas.

The laying of the railway tracks was done by the Empire’s soldiers.

From the Western Countries, Dwarf Kingdom, Sorcery Dynasty Sarion to the former demon lords’ territories, the transportation network with the countries around Tempest was also advancing at a rapid pace.

Between the Dwarf Kingdom and the Empire, it was decided for the railway tracks to be created and set up by the dwarves.

By the way, the former demon lords’ territories were still untouched after Milim faction left.

The territories were rich lands and had abundant resources.

Regarding the future management, I think I will decide after consulting with the rulers of each country.

These developments would be achieved over ten years as a national project.

Nobody opposed it.

Just by proposing the project in my name, all countries willingly offered their cooperation.

As expected, the title of the Great Demon Lord who saved the world was not just for show.

Due to the introduction of new technologies, it was predicted that a large amount of unemployed people would appear. There would not be any reason to call it bad since it would also give those people new jobs.

Instead, for those who had foreseen the future, they might realize that the establishment of these transportation networks would give nothing but merits.

In the future, those who hold information hold all the cards.

I decided to not hold back, and any obstructing people were gone too.

Then, the speed at which the implementation of the new technology derived from the Monster Country Tempest would surely become a card to be ahead of the other countries.

Economic warfare was very difficult that even made me consider something like a honest and straight war looked ridiculously easy in comparison.

Information and citizens’ efforts were what supported a country.

If each person didn’t do their part, the level of that country’s living standards would remain low, and the disparity would widen tremendously――That was what shown from Ciel-san’s future prospects.

How should I put it, it can be interpreted that I’m trying to effectively rule the world with economic and technological strength...

No, no, I might be just overthinking it.

Although I said that I won’t hold back, I didn’t say anything such as ‘I want to take over the world!’ or something alike.

It would be good if everyone worked hard and made the world a better place from now on.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

I decided to establish two new cities in the Great Jura Forest.

Both were currently under construction of the critically acclaimed construction forces.

One was a mining city where the High Orcs resided, and the other was a city on the water where the Lizardmen resided.

High-quality ores were yielded from the mining city.

The produced ores would then be transported to the central city of Tempest.[11]

The city on the water would be a metropolis floating in the middle of Lake Shisu[12] and was planned to serve as a maintenance dockyard for the airships.

There was a workshop in Tempest, but there was no space to store large quantities of ships there.

Since Lake Shisu was vast, we could float as many ships as we wanted on the lake.

Tempest was governed by Rigurdo as the Prime Minister.

The mining city would be run by Gerudo and the city on water would be run by Gabil. The two of them would become kings and govern each tribe respectively.

I was a bit worried about Gabil, but he had grown up ever since he reconciled with Abil.

He was no longer the Gabil from the past, so there would be no problem.

Thus, a system that runs without my involvement will be smoothly built.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

As for “Otherworlders” discovered around the world, they safely came under my protection now.

Those who chose to live in this world were sent to the “Academy” in the Ingrassia Kingdom, and would be educated with this world’s common sense, combat techniques, and other stuff.

After graduation, they would be free, and they were also provided with options to work at important institutions in many countries if they desired to do so.

For those who wished to go back, they would join the “Otherworld Dealings Research Department[13]” with Mai who took the initiative in the research.

Actually, I could return them back to their original world.

However, I felt it was somewhat wrong to send everyone back to their hometowns like doing a philanthropic work.

Moreover, I could confirm that there were several other worlds so I couldn’t group them all together with “Otherworlders”.

Some of them might come from a different otherworld than mine.

I would provide them with information. Basically, I want them to work hard themselves to discover the method to transfer across dimension―― Inter-Dimensional Navigation[14].

For that reason, their strong wills of wanting to go back would become the largest motivation, stronger than anything else.

I think that I should send them back secretly if their hard work seems to be useless after several years, but…… that may be unnecessary since I have a hunch that they will accomplish their goal.

Their effort eventually bore fruit and the Inter-Dimensional Navigation was developed.

Then――

With interactions across dimensions, a new story begins.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Ramiris was angry.

「Even though I was planning to do a great achievement, I’ll have to stay as a kid for thousands of years again, won’t I!!」

She complained to me.

Even if she said something like that, my honest impression would be “I dunno”.

Trainee-san and the others looked full of regret since they couldn’t witness Ramiris’ glorious appearance.

But, just for a few years in every several thousands of years? It's weird that she can only assume her adult form for such a short period of time.

She said that she was awakened forcibly this time, so she needs to start over from the scratch again or something like that.

「Oh well, isn’t this good? A kid can play freely and you won’t want to be assigned with unpleasant works like Milim, right?」

「Well, I suppose so. My favorite research turns into my work and this place is the best so……」

「Right? In the first place, you don’t have anything you wanted to do after becoming an adult, right?」

「Hmm, now that you mention it…...」

Oh well, there was such a conversation, but after that, she went back to her usual cheerful self.

It seemed Ramiris just wanted to show me her adult form, so her anger dissipated quickly.

As for the labyrinth, its difficulty had risen so high that, without a doubt, it would be impossible for humans to capture it.

It would be difficult for them even if they armed themselves with cutting-edge combat weapons such as Mobile Weapons[15] or Magitek Weapons[16].

The lower floors were starting to become testing sites for new weapons.

So, I decided to issue a passport to the City of Elves for those who managed to pass through the 50th floor.

Otherwise, the high-class soothing area would become completely pointless.

We and the royalty from other countries were using the city as VIP facilities, but it would feel secluded if the city was only used for that.

Apart from that, the labyrinth group led by Ramiris and Zegion would increase their power more and more from now.

………

……

…

Oh well, it was such a hectic year.

Looking back at it, it’s a very meaningful time.

However, as things here gradually calmed down, I guess I’ll go to deal with one of my regrets.

　　　　　　◇◇◇

Skyscrapers are lining in a row.

The surroundings are filled with clamors of shrieks and shouts.

The sounds of the siren coming from the police car can be heard in the distance.

It was nostalgic scenery that made me feel dizzy.

「Senpai, Senpai!? Please hang in there, Senpaiーーーー!!」

A young man is crying and screaming at the nice guy who collapses after getting stabbed in his arms with a woman looking at them sadly.

They are Tamura and Sawatari-san.

These guys, they really haven’t changed――oh well, they haven’t changed is not surprising.

I approached Tamura and tapped his shoulder.

「Move aside for a bit, Tamura」

「!? Who… are you……? How did you know my name――」

「Don’t sweat it. You are being a meticulous guy as usual.」

He turned around to complain towards me, but he was speechless due to my excessively pretty face. Right?

I thought “Sawatari-san would get angry, you know.”, but I held back from saying that.

I pushed Tamura aside and held the pseudo core I took out from my pocket up over the corpse of the nice guy.

Well then...

Since the corpse and the pseudo core fused smoothly, all that’s left to do is to transfer my『Multiple Parallel Existence[17]』into it and I’m done.

Oh, I forgot.

Human body feels pain so I’ll need to heal it properly.

With that in mind, I took out a healing potion from my pocket and poured down its content on the corpse.

I saw the wound healed instantly and was convinced that the effect of potion was working even on this side.

If the potion didn’t heal the corpse, I thought that it was a bit troublesome since I had to heal the corpse by swallowing it first.

The fact that the healing potion was working really saved me.

The preparations are complete with this.

I focused my consciousness and transferred my『Multiple Parallel Existence』to the pseudo core.

《Successful. It seems skills can be activated without any problem even on this side.》

Hmmm, thank goodness.

It seems I have succeeded in transferring my split consciousness to the nice guy――in other words, my body in my original world.

Well then, let’s leave this place immediately before I――Mikami Satoru――wake up.

「Who on earth are you…..」

「Ah, Tamura. From now on, respect your Senpai properly and don’t think of trying to show off, okay? Also, I will take care of the PC myself so that request is cancelled!」

「Ehh!?」

I smiled to Tamura whose expression is mixed with confusion and shock, and then I leave the place.

There’s no need for me to say more than that.

I――Mikami Satoru――would explains the rest to him.

………

……

…

I woke up

On a hospital bed in my nostalgic original world.

Inside a very familiar male body that had been together with me for 37 years.

I gently confirmed the presence of my “son” which was in good health.

‘Thank goodness!’ I think so from the bottom of my heart.

However, I was a bit worried about whether I could still use it or not.

“Eh, it’s not like you gonna ever use it anyway?” You bastard, I will beat you to death!!

To make sure it’s usable at any time, that’s the proper manners.

After all, preparation is important.

Oh well, leaving those aside.

Things that happened till now were not a dream, right?

“I saw a dream because the shock of getting stabbed” or something like that, please spare me from the “It was all a dream” ending[18]……

If every hardship I felt was a mere daydream, I couldn’t laugh even if I want to.

However, seeing how peaceful the dream is, I may actually believe that if I were told that it was a dream and not a joke.

「Ah, Senpai! You woke up?」

「…… Tamura, is that you? Is this the hospital?」

「Yes. The police came until a while ago, but it seems they have returned after the doctor told them that you should be resting just in case.」

「Police……? Why……」

「Please calm down. Senpai, do you remember you almost got stabbed by a Slasher[19]? The police came to ask you for eyewitness testimony about that Slasher.」

「Oh, I see…… Then, I really didn’t get stabbed?」

Huh? Was all of it seriously just a dream?

If I only fainted without getting stabbed, the possibility that everything was really a daydream is ――

「――Actually, you see, I don’t think you will believe me, but…... A mysterious woman――also, she was a spectacular and beautiful woman who can easily beat any model or celebrity――had brought Senpai back to life. Well, I guess it can’t be helped even if you laugh and say ‘What are you talking about’ at me, but what I’m saying is true! As the proof, please look at that!」

Tamura answered my question.

Looking at what he pointed, I see my suit which was hanging on the wall with a small tear in the back and stained with the dark red color of blood around it.

It seems for sure that I have bled out quite a bit..

So that means, as I expected, everything was not a dream and I could understand that I got pranked by the mischievous me――Rimuru.

That bastard――even though I say that, he’s me though――He went and make even me a target of his prank……

「I knew it, it’s unbelievable, right?」

「No, I believe you, Tamura. Also, it seems the police are going on a fool’s errand. After all――」

「Eh?」

「No, it’s nothing.」

He would not believe me even if I say it.

I can forgive the culprit who killed me, but Diablo can’t.

By now, the culprit should be regretting that he was even born due to Diablo’s Endless Pains[20].

Since it’s pointless even if I say it, I decided to dodge the question with a smile.

「By the way, Tamura――Would you believe me If I told you that I went to another world after I died?」

Tamura had a puzzled expression for a moment due to my whisper.

He probably thought something like “What are you talking about, Senpai?”

“I guess that the normal reaction.” so I thought, but――

「I would believe you, Senpai. I had seen something unbelievable and I felt that woman was strangely Senpai-like. Now that I think about it, “That person was Senpai, isn’t she?” or things like that. I even thought of such silly stuff like that, you see.」

「I see. Then, I can talk about it to you, but do you want to hear it?」

I asked him while smiling slightly and Tamura replied while also smiling.

「Yes, please.」

So was his answer.

I see……

Well then, let’s talk about it.

――About my『Regarding Reincarnated to Slime[21]』――

THE END

* * *

Author’s Note:



Thank you very much for your support in such a long time!

It would be great if everyone kept reading either the Extra Chapters or the book/LN version after this.

* * *

[1] I personally think this like in Realist Hero, TV-like screen floating on the sky. It can be 3d appearance of Rimuru too.

[2] Sierra: Just give him a special manga or something.

Xbox: Either that or a new game.

[3] 深淵之神(ノーデンス) Shin'en no Kami (Nōdensu). A Celtic Deity which also a fictional character in the Cthulhu Mythos (Based on the Celtic Deity).

[4] 天魔族(エンジェル) Tenmazoku (Enjeru). Heavenly/Sky/Celestial Demon/Monster/Demonic Race with the reading of Angel. They still angel in a sense, just with their race and status changed.

[5] 堕天族(フォールン) Datenzoku (Fōrun). Fallen Race. I think when this first appear I just translate it as Fallen Angel.

[6] TAXESSSSSS

[7] 聖戦(ジハード) Seisen (Jihado).

[8] Sierra: After dying a virgin, he has girls fighting each other to be with him. Can I die too?

Xbox: Only if you are willing to accept a knife to the back...

[9] Sierra: YESSSS!!! Ciel is best waifu (after Rimuru)!

Xbox: ...Are you saying Rimuru is his own wife?

Sierra: Yes?

Guro: Well Ciel is a separate individual from Rimuru, I don’t see the problem here... lol.

[10] About 186 mph.

[11] In the WN, Rimuru rejected the name Rimuru City (which in the LN, ppl just keeps calling the city with Rimuru so he yielded and accepted it) and insisted the name Tempest, so both Rimuru’s country and the first city both share the same name.

[12] シス湖 Shisuko. Alternative names are Lake Sith/Cis/Sis/Seis/Saez. I think Shisu is how Clown-san translated it before.

[13] 異世界交流調査部門 Isekai Kōryū Chōsa Bumon. Kōryū means Exchange/Relations/Interaction/Dealings, Chōsa means Investigation/Inquiry/Research, Bumon means Division/Section/Group/Department. Isekai is… everyone already know very well about it.

[14] 次元間航法 Jigen-kan Kōhō. Kōhō can also mean sailing.

[15] 機動兵器 Kidō Heiki. I almost want to call this Mobile Suit kek. It’s a term used in Gundam Series, this term includes Tank, Aircraft, Mobile Suit, Mobile Armor etc. Any moving vehicle with guns and stuff I guess.

[16] 魔導兵器 Madō Heiki. The term Madō would mean Sorcery, but in Final Fantasy Series, Madō is translated as Magitek. Alt for Madō is magical technology. Technology powered by magic XD. Magitek Armour in FF is called with this too.

[17] 多重並列存在 Tajuu Heiretsu Sonzai. Combined version of Multiple and Parallel, now Rimuru can be anywhere and in anyworld.

[18] https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/AllJustADream

[19] 通り魔 Toorima. A random attacker (Someone who attacks people on the street) Slasher (Someone who wantonly attacks/kills people with any blade i.e. knife, razor and etc.).

[20] 無限の責苦 Mugen no Semeku. Infinite Torture, Eternal Pains, Neverending Torture.

[21] Title Drop.





Credits





Translator: Clown / Guro / Lion Mask





Epub: Estevam / dotNOVEL




